Authors
Greg King
Number of Reviews
207

Title
Review for Passion (1999)
"Passion can destroy a genius if it is not contained."  
There's probably a great film yet to be made about the life
and excesses of legendary, eccentric Australian pianist Percy
Grainger, who dominated the world stages long before David Helfgott.
Unfortunately Peter Duncan's ambitious but rather dull biopic is not
it.
Passion only begins to scratch the surface of Grainger's
genius, and assumes that audiences will have some prior knowledge of
his life and his accomplishments.  Passion will be, largely
unfavourably, compared with the recent Shine, as it lacks that film's
dramatic heights and accessibility.
Written by Don Watson and based on an earlier screenplay from
Roy George and Peter Goldsworthy, Passion concentrates on the few
years that Grainger spent in London immediately before the outbreak of
the Great War, at the expense of far more intimate and potentially
interesting biographical detail.
Passion primarily explores the complex relationship he shared
with his domineering mother Rose (beautifully played by Barbara
Hershey), and his relationship with the beautiful Danish musician
Karen (Emily Woof).  The film also explores the contempt he had for
the staid musical establishment of the time.
However, most of the controversy surrounds Duncan's delving
into his insatiable sex drive, which scandalised the rather
conservative circles in which he lived.  The most confronting element
of the film comes from Duncan's depiction of Grainger's kinky sexual
habits, in particular his predilection for flagellation and a bit of s
& m, which has earned the film an unjustified R rating from the
censors.  However, these brief sequences are tastefully handled by
Duncan, and presented without any hint of sensationalism or
exploitation.  (It would indeed be interesting to compare Duncan's
restraint with the verve and excess that Ken Russell would have
brought to his undoubtedly colourful treatment of this aspect of
Grainger's life.)
For all that though, Duncan's film ultimately lacks any real
passion or insights into the character, and falls short of other
brilliant biopics about other famous and deeply troubled musical
geniuses, like Amadeus, Scott Hicks' Shine, or even the recent Hilary
And Jackie.  Duncan, whose previous films include Children Of The
Revolution and the awful A Little Bit Of Soul, is a director with a
lot of ideas, but not necessarily the wherewithal to bring them to the
screen in a cogent and coherent fashion.
On the positive side, though, Passion is exquisitely filmed
and looks gorgeous.  Duncan has a meticulous eye for the period detail
of pre-war London, and some lavish cinematography from Martin McGrath
enriches the film's look.
The lead performances are also particularly strong.  Richard
Roxburgh, who apparently bears a resemblance to the younger Grainger,
brings energy and enthusiasm to his performance that brings the
character to life and allows his personality to almost leap of the
screen.  Hershey is terrific as the tragic, syphilitic Rose, and she
makes the most of this complex and fascinating character and her mood
swings.
For all its visual style and superb performances though,
Passion is a vaguely unsatisfying biopic about an eccentric genius.
There is, ironically, a sense of real passion missing!

Title
Review for Topsy-Turvy (1999)
TOPSY-TURVY (M).  
(October Films/UIP)
Director: Mike Leigh
Stars: Jim Broadbent, Allan Corduner, LesleyManville, Timothy Spall, 
Kevin McKidd, Ron Cook, Wendy Nottingham, Eleanor David, Shirley Henderson,
Dorothy Atkinson, Martin Savage, Vincent Franklin
Running time: 160 minutes.
With hits like The Pirates Of Penzance and HMS Pinafore to
their credit, lyricist William S Gilbert (Jim Broadbent) and composer
Arthur Sullivan (Allan Corduner) are the toast of London theatre in
the latter half of the 19th century.  But by the mid 1880's the pair
have hit a slump as their creativity dries up.  Their latest musical
comedy Princess Ida receives only lukewarm reviews and audiences stay
away in droves.
Gilbert's lyrics have become repetitive and his ideas stretch
credibility.  Meanwhile Sullivan wants to be taken more seriously and
turn his hand to classical compositions rather than light weight
ditties for low brow burlesque shows.  When he steadfastly refuses to
provide the music for Gilbert's latest piece of "topsy-turvydom",
despite their contractual obligations, the pair reach an impasse that
threatens to destroy their friendship and working partnership.  Then
Gilbert's long-suffering but patient wife Kitty (Lesley Manville)
takes him to an exhibition of Japanese culture.  Suddenly inspiration
strikes, and he sets to work on writing The Mikado, arguably their
most enduring and enjoyable work.
Rather than a straightforward biopic tracing the careers of
Gilbert and Sullivan, Topsy-Turvy is an exploration of the backstage
dramas and creative clashes that went into the making of The Mikado,
with plenty of insight into the world of Victorian theatre This
ambitious but beautifully conceived period piece would seem an
uncharacteristic project for award winning director Mike Leigh, whose
films are normally confronting, bleak contemporary dramas exploring
the plight of the urban working classes (Secrets And Lies, etc).
However, under his skilful direction Topsy-Turvy becomes a
surprisingly colourful, robust and vastly entertaining romp.
In typical Leigh fashion, the director also taps into the
darker side of this world, exploring the insecurities and vanities of
the talented pair, and even briefly glimpsing the lives of their
extraordinary theatrical company.  Sex and drugs also rear their
heads, even in these puritanical times.  With meticulous care, Leigh
brings this world to life.  The costumes, set design and production
values are all magnificent, and reek of authenticity.
The wonderful gallery of characters come to life through the
superb performances of a talented, but largely unknown, ensemble cast
that includes Leigh regular Timothy Spall and Kevin McKidd in key
roles.  In particular, the two leads create a wonderful contrast
between the two collaborators, suffusing the film with a mixture of
humour and pathos.  Broadbent stands out as the stiff, bombastic and
emotionally detached Gilbert, while Corduner does a superb job as the
more liberated, free-spirited but ailing Sullivan.
Although the music may not be to the tastes of today's younger
audiences, the wonderful re-enactments of several scenes from The
Mikado are splendid stuff.  Somewhat surprisingly, Topsy-Turvy's 160
minutes just seem to fly past, without many dull spots to slow the
film down.

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
JAWBREAKER (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Darren Stein
Stars: Rose McGowan, Rebecca Gayheart, Judy Greer, Julie Benz, Chad 
Christ, Carol Kane, Pam Grier, Ethan Erickson, Marilyn Manson, Jeff
Conaway, William Katt, P J Soles, Charlotte Roldan
Running time: 86 minutes.
This black comedy about murder, makeovers, rock 'n' roll and
high school politics is like a B-grade version of Heathers, albeit
with a mile wide mean streak.  First time writer/director Darren Stein
takes the essential formula of those old John Hughes teen comedies and
crosses it with liberal touches of Carrie.
          Courtney Shane (Rose McGowan, from Scream, etc) is the bitch
queen of Reagan High.  A selfish user without a conscience, Courtney
is the undisputed leader of an elite pack who rule the school fashions
and in-set.  Courtney has her sights set on becoming prom queen when
things begin to go wrong.  A birthday prank backfires, leaving the
pretty and popular Liz Purr dead.
Courtney immediately takes charge, arranging it to look like
Liz was the victim of a perverted sex fiend.  Unfortunately, her plan
is accidentally discovered by Fern (newcomer Judy Greer), the dowdy,
unprepossessing school misfit, who has idolised Liz from afar.
Courtney buys her silence by promising to make her beautiful, popular
and accepted as one of the in-crowd.  But soon, Courtney realises that
she has unleashed a Frankenstein.  Fern, who has been given the exotic
name Vylette, rivals Courtney for the title of the queen bitch in
school.
Meanwhile, Courtney's friend Julie (Rebecca Gayheart, from
Urban Legend, etc) has a crisis of conscience over the death of Liz.
Courtney quickly dumps her, ostracising her.  In desperation she turns
to Zach (an Ethan Hawke look-alike Chad Christ), another outcast who
heads the school drama group.  Together they plot to bring down
Courtney and expose her during her moment of triumph on prom night.
The performances of the primarily youthful cast are adequate
to the demands of the material.  Veteran Carol Kane lends her presence
to the role of Miss Sherman, the school's mousy principal, while
sultry Pam Grier (Jackie Brown, etc) is wasted as a tough detective
who is investigating the brutal murder.  Bizarre rock star Marilyn
Manson (who is also McGowan's boyfriend) contributes a weird cameo as
a sleazy bar patron.  Jeff Conaway, from Grease, etc, also contributes
a brief cameo that captures the deliberately irreverent flavour of
this teen comedy/horror drama.
Jawbreaker explores themes of friendship, loyalty, and those
social and political cliques that make adolescence a nightmare for
those who don't fit in.  Stein has drawn upon his own experiences as
an outcast at high school for the background of Jawbreaker, which
contains many familiar clichés of screen high school dramas.  While
it is moderately entertaining, the film ultimately brings little that
is fresh or original to a tired formula.  Like the intimidating candy
of the title, Jawbreaker is a little hard to swallow.

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Yet another biting satire that savagely deconstructs the
notion of wholesome family values in the heartland of American
suburbia.  As an exploration of dysfunctional families, the erosion of
family values and the souring of the American dream, American Beauty
is a fascinating and insightful character driven piece that explores
similar territory to films like The Ice Storm and the recent
Happiness.  However, this is a far more enjoyable film than Happiness,
with which it shares a number of thematic similarities.  Although
there is a nasty edge to this ironically titled comedy, there is also
a strong vein of irreverent humour and compassion running throughout.
Kevin Spacey is superbly droll and bitingly acerbic as Lester
Burnham, a middle aged man who is suffering burn out.  He is bored
with his life and his marriage to the ambitious, shrewish, neurotic
and sarcastic Carolyn (Annette Bening).  But then he becomes attracted
towards Angela (Mena Suvari, recently seen in American Pie, etc), the
shallow, self-centred cheerleader, who is also the best friend of his
teenage daughter Jane (Thora Birch).
Apathy soon gives way to a new enthusiasm for life that
confuses his family.  He quits his job as a sales executive with a
media company, wrangles a hefty $60,000 pay out, and sets about
changing his life.  Meanwhile Carolyn, a real estate agent, is
sexually attracted towards her rival (Peter Gallagher).  Adding to the
combustible mix are the Burnum's new neighbours, a homophobic retired
Marine (Chris Cooper), his mousy and withdrawn wife (Allison Janney)
and his enigmatic son Ricky (Wes Bentley), who obsessively captures
his surroundings on video.  It seems rather ironic that only the gay
couple (Scott Bakula and Sam Robards) who live next door may be the
only characters in this film who are truly happy with their lot.
Even the lesser characters are deftly observed in this
incisive, cutting and beautifully nuanced script from Alan Ball, a
veteran of television sitcoms (Cybill, etc).  The performances
throughout are uniformly impressive, and Oscar nominations seem
assured.  Spacey delivers easily his best screen performance for
years, and he brings a pathos and honesty to his character that is
perversely endearing.  Bening revels in her richly drawn character,
bringing an exuberant quality and a nicely hysterical edge to her
bitchiness and selfishness.
American Beauty is the first feature film from noted British
theatre director Sam Mendes, and he develops a superb rapport with his
ensemble cast and a great understanding into the complexities and
insecurities of the characters.  He brings an outsider's eye to this
bleak, edgy view of suburbia, and turns the camera into a scalpel,
with almost surgical precision.  Veteran cinematographer Conrad L Hall
brilliantly charts the gradually darkening tone of the film, from the
bright colours that characterise the deceptively sedate opening scenes
through to the grittier, more oppressive tones that mark the grim
finale.
American Beauty is a raw, uncompromising and archly cynical
view of contemporary America that should not be missed.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
ENEMY OF THE STATE (M).  
(Touchstone/Beuna Vista International)
Director: Tony Scott
Stars: Will Smith, Gene Hackman, Jon Voight, Regina King, Loren Dean, 
Jake Busey, Barry Pepper, Ian 
Hart, Scott Caan, Lisa Bonet, Jason Lee, James Le Gros, Jack Black, Jamie 
Kennedy, Bodhi Pine Elfman, 
Tom Sizemore (uncredited), Jason Robards (uncredited), Gabriel Byrne, 
Stuart Wilson, Laura Cayouette, 
Dan Butler
Running time: 136 minutes.
In the wake of the Watergate scandal of the '70's, Hollywood
produced a number of first rate paranoid conspiracy thrillers.  Films
such as The Parallax View (1974), The Conversation (1974), and Three
Days Of The Condor (1975), etc, called into question the government's
integrity and accountability, and astutely tapped into the mounting
sense of public disillusionment with officialdom.  Enemy Of The State
combines the best elements of these into the formula of a gripping and
exciting high tech chase thriller.
The film also raises some disturbing questions about the use
and blatant abuse of power by government agencies and the covert
erosion of democracy.  Writer David Marconi (who recently collaborated
on the Mission: Impossible sequel) provides plenty of insight into the
devious, high tech world of espionage.  This polished, taut and
unsettling thriller from gun producer Jerry Bruckheimer (The Rock,
Armageddon, etc) and director Tony Scott (Top Gun, Crimson Tide, etc)
is a welcome addition to the genre.  With Scott at the helm though,
the emphasis is definitely on heart stopping action, and there is
plenty of that.
The film kicks into gear when ambitious NSA administrator
Thomas Reynolds (Jon Voight) murders a congressman (an unbilled Jason
Robards) who opposes legislation that will increase the powers of the
omnipresent agency to spy on private citizens.  Unfortunately, the
murder is captured on film by an environmentalist (Jason Lee), who
becomes a target of Reynold's private hit squad.
However, the incriminating film finds its way into the hands
of lawyer Robert Dean (Will Smith), who is involved in a nasty case
involving heavy weight union thugs.  Dean suddenly finds himself
pursued by the NSA.  His life and reputation destroyed as they set out
to discredit him before he can expose the truth.  His only hope for
survival is the enigmatic Brill (Gene Hackman), an embittered ex- spy,
a dinosaur who has largely managed to remain underground for twenty
years.  Enemy Of The State is the antithesis of the typical buddy
formula, and the volatile relationship between Dean and Brill adds to
the dangerous situation.
Smith delivers a strong performance as the innocent citizen on
the run from government agencies and unsure of whom he can trust.  His
physically demanding role here is a change of pace from the confident,
wise-cracking persona he has projected in recent films.  Hackman
delivers his usual solid performance, although Brill bears some
resemblance to his eavesdropping private eye from The Conversation,
although twenty years on, and much more aggressive and willing to take
the fight up to his enemies.
Voight relishes this opportunity to play another villain, and
is convincingly suave, yet sleazy and sinister at the same time.  His
private hit squad is played by a cast of hot shot rising young stars,
including Barry Pepper (from Saving Private Ryan), Jake Busey, Scott
Caan, and Loren Dean (recently seen in Gattaca).  Gabriel Byrne
contributes a brief cameo, while Tom Sizemore appears uncredited as
Pintero, a union thug who plays a crucial role in events.
Scott really knows how to make solid and exciting commercial
thrillers, and he is in fine form here.  His direction is slick and
energetic, and he demonstrates an assured command of the cutting edge
technology available to the intelligence community.  The numerous
exciting chase sequences and narrow escapes are superbly staged, and
will have the adrenaline pumping.  Scott maintains a punishing pace
throughout that will have audiences on the edge of their seats.  He
has shot much of the action on the streets of Baltimore, bringing a
sense of urgency and realism to the material.

Title
Review for Martha, Meet Frank, Daniel and Laurence (1998)
Romantic comedies like French Kiss, Sleepless In Seattle and
When Harry Met Sally have explored the idea that our life is often a
frustrating and sometimes unsatisfying search for the perfect partner
to share our lives.  A number of recent films in this overdone genre
have also looked at how coincidences and accidents can shape our
lives.  This charming, funny and very enjoyable British comedy shares
a number of themes and ideas in common.
The film's central premise deals with an unusual romantic
triangle that involves three friends who all fall in love with the
same woman.  Frank, Daniel and Laurence have been friends since
childhood.  Then Martha (Monica Potter) comes between them, and her
presence tests the nature of their friendship.  An American who is
leaving her messy life behind her, Martha is determined to begin a new
life in London.  In a series of chance encounters, the three friends
all meet Martha separately, and believe that she is their perfect,
ideal woman who will make their miserable, vaguely unfulfilled lives
richer.
Daniel (Tom Hollander), a narcissistic record company
executive, is the most successful of the three.  Returning from a
business trip in America he first meets Monica on the plane and tries
to impress her.  Frank (Rufus Sewell) is an unemployed and
unsuccessful actor lacking in confidence, who always suffers stage
fright and misses auditions.  He meets Monica in Hyde Park, and tries
to empathise with her about their own shared hardships.  Laurence
(Joseph Fiennes, from Shakespeare In Love, etc) is a sensitive artist
who also teaches bridge to elderly ladies.
The story unfolds largely in a series of extended flashbacks
as Laurence relates the story of how Monica's presence strains their
friendship to a psychiatrist (Ray Winstone), who conveniently lives in
a downstairs apartment.  Misunderstandings snowball with comic
consequences.  But, with a charming and witty script from Peter Morgan
and some deft direction, the idea actually comes off.  The film's
structure is occasionally a little clumsy in the early stages, but
once it hits its stride The Very Thought Of You becomes an intriguing
little tale of friendship, love and deceit.  Nicholas Hamm directs in
a suitably light manner that keeps the film bubbling along.
Fiennes, who injected the sex appeal into the Elizabethan era
in his two previous period films, slots perfectly into this more
contemporary setting.  He smoulders his way across the screen, and his
sympathetic performance here builds upon his previous solid credits.
Potter (recently seen as the romantic interest in Patch Adams) looks a
lot like a younger version of Julia Roberts, and she brings much of
the same beguiling charm and screen presence to her role.  The pair
develop a wonderful chemistry that lifts the film whenever they are on
screen together.
Sewell has a glum and brooding presence, and he seems a little
too intense for his role.  Hollander brings some humour to his
performance as the self-obsessed, obnoxious and immature Daniel.
The choice between these three lovesick lads would seem pretty
obvious, although Hamm manages to stretch out the suspense.  Hamm also
brings London to life, beautifully using the city as a backdrop to the
action.
The film's title is pretty clunky, and only marginally better
than the original, awkward, but far more revealing Martha - Meet
Frank, Daniel & Laurence, which says it all, really.

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
A beautifully wrought, touching and sensitive coming of age
tale set in small town America in 1957, October Sky is one of the most
satisfying and enjoyable films of this year.
This inspiring film is based on the true story of Homer
Hickham (played with great insight and charm by Jake Gyllenhaal, from
Homegrown, City Slickers, etc), who eventually became a NASA engineer.
Homer grew up in Coalwood, West Virginia, a company town centred
around the coal mining industry.  Like his father, and most of his
friends, Homer seems destined to a life working in the pits.  It seems
that the only way to break out of this grim, preordained cycle is to
win a football scholarship to an out of town college.  Until the
Russians launch Sputnik, the first manned space rocket.  As Homer
watches the space craft race across the night time sky, he is inspired
to become a rocket scientist.
With three school friends, including his best friends Roy Lee
(William Lee Scott) and O'Dell (Chad Lindberg) and the school geek
Quentin (Chris Owen, from American Pie), Homer begins experimenting
with rockets.  Most people in town view this fool hardy activity with
scepticism, especially Homer's dad John (Chris Cooper, from Lone Star,
etc), the foreman of the mine.  Only his sympathetic teacher Miss
Riley (Laura Dern) encourages Homer in his pursuit.
The beautifully written script from Lewis Colick draws a
symbolic contrast between Homer, who is looking forward to the future,
and his strong-willed father, who is still stuck in the past.  John is
angered by Homer's decision to seek a life beyond the mines, and the
tense conflict between the pair threatens to tear the family apart.
The superb performances of Gyllenhaal and Cooper bring a solid
emotional punch to this estranged relationship.
October Sky is all about following your dream, and remaining
true to that ideal no matter what obstacles are put in the way.  The
film's affirmative and inspiring message is backed up by some positive
values, strong writing, and wonderful performances from a solid cast.
Director Joe Johnston (Honey, I Shrunk The Kids, Jumanji, etc) eschews
the special effects and technical gimmickry of his previous films in
favour of some solid emotional and human drama.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
TOY STORY 2 (G).  
(Disney/Pixar/Buena Vista International
Director: John Lasseter
Stars: voices of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammar,
Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, Wayne
Knight, Annie Potts, Jonathan Harris, John Morris, Laurie Metcalf,
Estelle Harris, R Lee Ermey, Jodi Benson, Joe Ranft, Andrew Stanton,
Jeff Pidgeon
Running time: 92 minutes.
The Phantom Menace may have been the most eagerly anticipated,
and most over-hyped, sequel of the year, but Toy Story 2 is
undoubtedly the best!  This wonderfully entertaining animated tale
from the Disney and Pixar studios is a rarity amongst sequels in that
it is every bit as good as the original.  Director John Lasseter (Toy
Story, A Bug's Life, etc) knows how to entertain audiences, and Toy
Story 2 is fast, funny, endlessly inventive, and won't disappoint.
Toy Story 2 again explores themes of friendship, innocence,
and also further develops the premise that the primary role of toys is
to bring happiness to children, even though their owners will
eventually outgrow them and move on to other interests.  Since the
original movie four years ago, the technology has evolved even
further, and the state of the art computer generated animation here is
superb.  This is especially evident with its almost lifelike depiction
of some of the human characters.  Whereas the original Toy Story
mainly explored what went on in children's bedrooms when no-one was
around, this clever sequel takes the characters in new directions,
while still maintaining its freshness and originality.  Woody, Buzz
Lightyear and the rest of the familiar toys return, as do the talented
voice cast.  Not having to waste time introducing audiences to these
familiar characters, Toy Story 2 leaps straight into the action.
While his young master Andy is away at camp, Woody (Tom Hanks,
reprising his role) accidentally ends up in a garage sale.  He is
kidnapped by Al (voiced by Wayne Knight), a greedy toy retailer, who
recognises the intrinsic value of a Woody doll in good condition.  Al
has all the other collectible toy figures dating from the '50's, when
Woody was the star of a popular kids' show on television.  They are
now rare collectors' items, and Al stands to make big money for
selling a complete set to a Japanese toy museum.
In Al's office Woody meets his former co-stars, including the
tomboyish cowgirl Jessie (voiced by Joan Cusack), his horse Bullseye,
and the prickly prospector (voiced by Frasier's Kelsey Grammer), who
are looking forward to becoming part of a permanent collection after
years of neglect in storage.  Woody faces a dilemma when he is torn
between loyalty to his old friends and his master Andy and the
concerns of his two new friends.
Meanwhile, Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen again) leads some of his
fellow toys on a daring mission into the dangerous outside world in an
attempt to rescue Woody before Andy returns from camp.  In a toy store
he encounters a new and improved, but hopelessly naive, version of
himself, which brings another dimension to the action.
The writing is again very clever, and takes a number of well
aimed shots at the crass commercialism and cynical exploitation
practised by the toy manufacturers.  The script is peppered with
plenty of clever in-jokes.  While younger children will enjoy the
antics of the toys and the sense of adventure, the broad humour and
universal themes will appeal to audiences of all ages.  Unlike many
sequels, Toy Story 2 actually leaves audiences wanting more!

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
BELOVED (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Jonathan Demme
Stars: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise,
Lisa Gay Hamilton, Irma P Hall, Albert Hall, Beah Richards, Kessia
Kordelle, Jude Ciccolella, Jason Robards, Tracey Walter
Running time: 172 minutes.
In hindsight, maybe it wasn't such a good idea for Oprah
Winfrey to give up her day job.  America's queen of daytime television
talk shows has quit the small screen to establish a new career in
movies with Beloved, her first feature film since the memorable The
Colour Purple 14 years ago.  Based on Toni Morrison's acclaimed 1987
novel, Beloved has been something of a labour of love for Winfrey, who
has nurtured the project for over a decade.  However, this
disappointing film should have been much more powerful, especially
given the time and effort spent on refining and developing it.
The film tells of the hardships confronting former slaves as
they try to come to terms with their freedom and the costly legacy of
their recent blood soaked past.  This is rich territory we have
explored before, most notably in the epic tv series Roots.  Beloved is
an unsatisfactory and occasionally unfathomable mix of history, family
drama, horror, mysticism, and unexplained magic that fails to leave
such a lasting impression.
Set in the mid-1870's, the film centres around Sethe
(Winfrey), a former slave haunted by her past and the soul destroying
sacrifices she had to make to ensure her own survival.  Sethe lives in
the old family house on the outskirts of Cincinnati and is slowly
coming to terms with her independence.  She is shunned by most of the
townsfolk, for reasons that we only slowly learn about.  The scars of
the past also affect her daughter Denver (Kimberly Elise, from Set It
Off, etc), who is reluctant to leave the house.
The healing process begins with the arrival of two very
different people.  Paul D (Danny Glover) is a former slave and family
friend, who re-enters Sethe's life after 18 years.  He brings
happiness and love back into Sethe's life, until even her unassuaged
guilt proves too much.  The other catalyst is Beloved (Thandie Newton,
from Flirting, etc), a scarred and twisted young woman of mysterious
origins, whose presence in the house becomes both threatening and
unnerving.
This is the first film from Oscar winning director Jonathan
Demme (The Silence Of The Lambs, etc) since 1993's Philadelphia.
Although he handles the material with restraint, except for a couple
of notable exceptions, his direction seems to lack a strong focus.
It's almost as if he lacks the same depth of passion and commitment to
the story as Winfrey and most of the production crew.  Three writers,
including Richard LaGravenese (The Bridges Of Madison County, etc) and
Adam Brooks (Practical Magic, etc) have shaped this multi-layered
story, but there are still a number of problems with the narrative
structure.  Despite its lengthy running time, there is a suggestion
that many characters and scenes were sacrificed on the cutting room
floor.  Veterans Jason Robards and Tracey Walter (who both appeared in
Demme's Philadelphia) are wasted in small, wordless roles.
Brief, sepia toned flashbacks provides glimpses of some of the
horrors endured by the slaves in America's south before the Civil War.
Tak Fujimoto's cinematography is superb, and Rachel Portman's score,
which draws heavily on Afro-American chants, is also evocative.
Winfrey runs the gamut of emotions here, and her complex
performance provides the film with much of its emotional depth.
Glover is understated in a role that never really goes anywhere.
Newton is superb, and delivers an emotionally and physically demanding
performance as the childlike Beloved.
Despite its rich source material and its fine production
credentials, Beloved is a huge disappointment, and doesn't really
endear itself to audiences.

Title
Review for "McLibel!" (1997) (mini)
This fascinating documentary records the longest civil trial
in England's legal history - a David and Goliath like struggle between
the multinational McDonalds corporation and two environmental
activists who had made some damaging statements about the company.
Dave Marsh and Helen Steel were members of an environmental
group.  In the early '90's they published a pamphlet entitled What's
Wrong With McDonalds, in which they alleged that the giant burger firm
used misleading advertising tactics, exploited children and their
young workers, and condoned cruelty to animals.  McDonalds spends some
$5 billion a year on advertising, and its golden arches are a more
recognisable symbol than the Christian cross.  The company is also
notoriously litigious, and quick to sue anyone who criticises it - as
the film demonstrates with a list of companies and celebrities who
have been forced to retract statements in the face of threatened legal
action.  But Marsh and Steel were a pair of battlers who had nothing
to lose, and stood firm.
McDonalds ultimately spent some $50 million in pursuing the
case, while Steel and Marsh defended themselves on money raised
through donations from supporters.  But they scored some major
victories against their more polished and highly trained legal
adversaries.  The pair eventually scored a comprehensive moral victory
over McDonalds as the judge decided that some of their allegations
were true.  But the whole case itself was something of a public
relations disaster for McDonalds, as it thrust the pair and their
allegations into newspaper headlines around the world.  A web site was
even set up to further broadcast the details of the trial.
This documentary following the lengthy trial and its impact
has been put together by Franny Armstrong, a novice film maker with no
experience, but plenty of passion.  Noted English director Ken Loach,
a champion of the working classes, helped direct the dramatic
recreations of the court scenes, and one wonders how much input he had
into shaping the overall structure of this intriguing 55 minute doco.
McLibel is fascinating stuff, and Armstrong and co certainly cram a
fair bit of information into the brief running time.  Armstrong is
aware of the absurdity of the case, and consequently the film is full
of a sly humour, most of it at McDonalds expense.
But the film is not without its flaws, many of them due to the
restrictions of working within an extremely low budget.  Objectivity
seems to have completely gone out the window, although, to be fair,
McDonalds management was approached to participate in the filming
process but declined.  Obviously they figured they'd already been
burned enough the first time around!

Title
Review for Dîner de cons, Le (1998)
THE DINNER GAME  (LE DINER DE CONS) (M).  
(Gaumont/Sharmill Films)
Director: Francis Veber
Stars: Jacques Villeret, Thierry Lhermitte, Francis Huster, Daniel 
Prevost, Alexandra Vendernoot, Catherine Frot
Running time: 80 minutes
(French, with English subtitles).
Writer/director Francis Veber is a dab hand at fast paced
comedies centring on odd couple relationships, and The Dinner Game (Le
Diner De Cons) finds him at his peak.  This is a fast, frantic and
hilarious farce, and one of the funniest films of the year!
The premise of this delightful and thoroughly enjoyable comedy
centres around a group of friends who regularly gather to hold an
unusual dinner party.  The object is for each of the participants to
bring along as a guest the "biggest idiot" they can find so that they
can maliciously make fun of them during the evening.  Usually the
targets of this bizarre entertainment are dull people with unusual
hobbies about which they can discourse at long and boring length, full
of trivial detail.  Publisher Pierre Brochant (Thierry Lhermitte)
thinks he has found a pearler when he stumbles across Monsieur Pignon
(Jacques Villeret), a scruffy, dishevelled taxation clerk who builds
elaborate structures out of match sticks.  He invites him to the next
dinner party, assured that he has a winner.  But things start to go
wrong, as Brochant hurts his back in a golf game and is initially
reluctant to go to the dinner.  To add further insult to injury his
wife leaves him.  The evening quickly turns into a litany of
disasters, as Pignon's well meaning attempts to solve Brochant's
problems lead to one hilarious misfortune after another.  But there is
also a humanity and a strong moral to this tale that hits home.
The Dinner Game is based on Veber's own stage play.  Although
its origins are sometimes evident in the setting, this is nonetheless
an entertaining film that overcomes the limitations brilliantly.
Veber's crisp direction and writing wastes precious few moments
throughout the film's tight and sometimes unpredictable 90 minutes.
Villeret is superb as Pignon, and he brings a wonderful physical
presence and energy to the role.  His facial expressions and
contortions provide plenty of humorous moments.
Many of Veber's previous comedies have been turned into bland
American comedies (The Birdcage, Three Fugitives, etc), and one can
almost see The Dinner Game also being turned into a typically pale
Hollywood-style imitation, with Danny De Vito in the role of Pignon.

Title
Review for Love Letter, The (1999)
THE LOVE LETTER (M).  
(Dreamworks/UIP)
Director: Peter Ho-sun Chan
Stars: Kate Capshaw, Tom Selleck, Tom Everett Scott, Ellen DeGeneres, 
Blythe Danner, Geraldine 
McEwan, Julianne Nicholson, Gloria Stuart, Alice Drummond
Running time: 87 minutes.
This twee romantic comedy has been something of a labour of
love for Kate Capshaw, who is both star and producer.  Inevitably, it
is she who must also shoulder much of the blame for the film's
failings.  This surprisingly bland and ultimately uninvolving film is
set in the old fashioned and laid back, picturesque seaside village of
Loblolly By The Sea, and centres around a number of residents whose
lives are changed by an anonymous love letter.
Helen (Capshaw) runs the town's small bookstore, which
amazingly enough, survives even though it never seems to do any
business.  One day she discovers the titular epistle nestled in the
store's couch, and immediately assumes it was addressed to her.  She
hopes that it was written by George (Tom Selleck), the town's fireman,
who was also her childhood sweetheart before they went their own way
with plenty of unresolved differences still simmering between them.
Now that he is in the throes of a divorce, she hopes for a long
overdue reconciliation.  But she is a little surprised when she
suspects that it was possibly written by Johnny (Tom Everett Scott,
from That Thing You Do!, etc), the handsome college student working in
the bookstore for the summer vacation, who has developed a crush on
her.
A series of misunderstandings and liaisons follows, as several
other townsfolk are similarly entranced by the lyrical letter and its
mysterious author.  The script from Maria Maggenti (The Incredibly
True Adventure Of Two Girls In Love) is nicely done, but doesn't
really provide a lot of insight into this sleepy little town, with its
hidden secrets, or its eccentric inhabitants with their secret
passions.  Nor does it satisfactorily answer a number of questions
that continue to nag long after the final credits.
The ensemble cast try hard to breathe some life into the
underdeveloped script, but to little avail.  We know that Blythe
Danner is Gwyneth Paltrow's mother, but it takes some leap of the
imagination to accept her as Kate Capshaw's mother here.  Ellen
DeGeneres gets the bulk of the one liners as Janet, the co-manager of
the book store, a role that is not that far removed from the one she
played in her television sitcom.
This disappointing but mercifully brief film marks an
inauspicious Hollywood debut for acclaimed Hong Kong director Peter
Ho-sun Chan (Comrades: Almost A Love Story, etc), who handles the
material in an almost leisurely fashion.  Unfortunately, the film
lacks any real sense of passion, inspiration or heartfelt emotions.
This is one letter that should never have been opened!

Title
Review for Pushing Tin (1999)
Pushing Tin takes us inside the rarely seen, high pressure
world of air traffic controllers.  These are the men who are
responsible for the safe landing of thousands of planes at New York's
three busiest air ports daily.  It's a stressful job, with a high rate
of suicide, severe depression, alcoholism and marriage breakups.  Like
MASH, this comedy/drama explores the sense of camaraderie that binds
over-stressed workers together, both at work and at play.
Pushing Tin is based on a magazine article written by a tower
insider and, frighteningly enough, reeks of authenticity.  While the
film often presents the human face of this intense but little known
environment, it doesn't exactly instil those who may be flying
somewhere in the near future with a sense of confidence.
Nick "the zone" Falzone (John Cusack) is New York's cocky
young hot shot controller, who is good at his job and revels in the
notoriety.  He finds his status challenged by the arrival of Russell
(Billy Bob Thornton), a maverick veteran who has come to New York
seeking greater challenges.  Russell once stood under a landing 747
just for the experience.  Testosterone quickly fills the air, and a
fierce spirit of competitiveness erupts between the two star
controllers as they attempt to upstage one another and prove their
machismo.
But then Nick breaks an unwritten rule of the tower fraternity
when he sleeps with Russell's seductive young wife Mary (Angelina
Jolie, from Hackers, etc).  Wracked by guilt, Nick slowly comes apart,
and both his career and his marriage are threatened by his
uncharacteristic and increasingly erratic behaviour.
Writers Glen and Les Charles, who wrote for tv sitcoms Cheers
and Taxi, explore this world with plenty of humour, although the
script contains a few slow and awkward patches.  British director Mike
Newell (Four Weddings And A Funeral, Donnie Brasco, etc) maintains a
fairly light tone throughout, although he does bring an edgy humour to
the material.
The central performances are all superb.  Cusack gives a solid
and increasingly neurotic edge to his performance and catches that
fragile line that most controllers walk.  Thornton brings his
characteristic droll style and down to earth charm to his role, and
does his best with a slightly underwritten role.  Aussie actress Cate
Blanchett is strong and appealing as Nick's bored suburban wife,
heavily into self-improvement courses, while Jolie brings a seductive
and sexy quality to her lesser but pivotal role.
Pushing Tin is an enjoyable enough film, but somehow its
melodramatic plot development leaves one feeling vaguely unsatisfied
that it didn't cut closer to the bone in exploring the on-the-edge
lifestyle of these men.

Title
Review for Living Out Loud (1998)
LIVING OUT LOUD (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Richard LaGravanese
Stars: Holly Hunter, Danny De Vito, Queen Latifah, Martin Donovan, 
Richard Schiff, Elias Koteas, Mariangela Pino, Suzanne Shepherd, Clark Anderson
Running time: 100 minutes.
Writer Richard LaGravenese (The Bridges Of Madison County, The
Fisher King, etc) makes his directorial debut with this edgy romantic
comedy about a pair of middle aged divorcees looking to put a spark of
romance back into their lives.  He understands the demands of his
perceptive and intelligent script, and probes the quiet desperation of
his central characters with a painful honesty.
Judith Nelson (a strikingly blonde Holly Hunter) has recently
divorced her womanising husband (Martin Donovan), and attempts to
start her life all over again.  Pat Francato (Danny De Vito) is also
recently separated.  He is coping with a terminally ill daughter while
also trying to pay off his mounting gambling debts.  He works as night
watchman in Judith's apartment block.
 The film explores the unexpected relationship that develops between
these two lonely people from vastly different backgrounds, and the way
in which it changes their lives.  Unfortunately, Judith does not share
Pat's depth of feelings, although his friendship is quite important to
her sense of stability.  Hunter has a penchant for off beat
characters, and she is very good in this emotionally demanding role.
She effectively conveys Judith's loneliness and frustrated passion,
and hints at the thinly veiled madness that drives her.  Cast largely
against type, De Vito is quite touching and unusually vulnerable in a
role that allows him few opportunities to show off his acerbic and
sarcastic wit.  Rap singer Queen Latifah (Set It Off, etc) provides
solid support as Liz Bailey, a blues singer who befriends Judith.
Living Out Loud heralds an impressive debut from LaGravenese,
whose direction is restrained and economical.  The film is suffused
with a palpable air of loneliness and sadness, but there is also a
strong undercurrent of warmth and humour.  Living Out Loud is a film
of huge emotions, honesty and small pleasures.
Despite a pair of solid central performances and some classy
production values, it will struggle to find an appreciative audience.
In a crowded cinema marketplace traditionally dominated by movies
aimed at 18-25 year olds there doesn't seem to be much demand for
romantic comedies about two lonely, very ordinary, middle aged New
Yorkers looking for love.

Title
Review for Assistant, The (1997)
For director Daniel Petrie (The Betsy, etc), bringing Bernard
Malamud's Pulitzer Prize winning 1957 novel to the screen has been
something of a labour of love.  The result is a profound, intelligent
and affecting tale that has some provocative messages.  However, the
film, which was completed in 1997, has taken a couple of years to
reach our screens.  This delay is not due to any inherent lack of
quality, but rather to the distributor's lack of faith.
It is the middle of the depression and jobs are hard to come
by, and a lot of small businesses are struggling to survive.  The
Bobers are a family of Jewish emigrants who have fled the rising tide
of anti- Semitism and prejudice within their homeland to make a new
start in America.  Morris Bober (German actor Armin Mueller-Stahl, who
is probably best know for his role as David Helfgott's father in the
brilliant Shine) runs a small grocery store.
Enter Frank Alpine (Ally McBeal's Gil Bellows), a drifter who
is unable to find honest work in this uncertain climate.  He somehow
hooks up with Ward Minogue (Jaimz Woolvet, from Unforgiven, etc), a
petty thief, who robs the Bober' store and pistol-whips Morris.  Frank
is consumed by guilt over the crime, and returns to the Bober's store
the next day and offers to help out.
Morris sees in Frank a reflection of his own son, who had died
years earlier.  His wife Ida (Joan Plowright) is less trusting, and
urges caution.  A romance slowly blossoms between Frank and the
Bober's daughter Helen (newcomer Kate Greenhouse), largely against the
wishes of the conservative Ida.  But the catalyst that irrevocably
changes the uneasy relationship between the Bobers and Frank comes
when Morris learns that he was one of the robbers.  While Ida's worst
suspicions are confirmed, Morris' belief in tolerance is put to the
ultimate test.
The presence of Mueller-Stahl and Plowright brings to mind
Barry Levinson's elegiac epic Avalon, in which the pair played
emigrants establishing their own family in Baltimore in the early
1900's.  Rather than a sprawling family saga though, The Assistant is
a powerful and quietly affecting tale of prejudice, tolerance and
forgiveness, crime and punishment.  Although the film has a darker
tone, Petrie deliberately keeps the whole thing low key and
understated.  His restrained and gentle pace perfectly suits the
material.  The ugly spectre of fascism raises its head in a brief but
evocative scene in which Frank and Helen witness a Nazi rally and
march.
Petrie draws insightful and honest performances from the
ensemble cast, who nail the essence of their characters with unerring
accuracy.  Working together for the third time, Plowright and Mueller-
Stahl strike sparks and develop an easy going, comfortable
relationship as the Bobers.  Bellows brings a certain charisma to the
role of Frank, and elicits the audience's sympathy.
please note that my reviews are rated on a scale out of five stars.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
THE MOD SQUAD (M).  
(MGM/UIP)
Director: Scott Silver
Stars: Claire Danes, Giovanni Ribisi, Omar Epps, Dennis Farina, Josh 
Brolin, Michael Lerner, Steve Harris, Richard Jenkins.
Another old tv series is revisited and updated for the '90's.
However, this lacklustre big screen version of The Mod Squad, which
originally ran from 1968 to 1973, joins other dud adaptations such as
The Beverly Hillbillies, Lost In Space and the recent My Favourite
Martian.
The original series centred around a squad of delinquent
teenagers put back onto the streets by a tough but sympathetic cop,
who used them to infiltrate seedy bars and clubs and street gangs in
an effort to fight crime.  This big screen version takes the same
premise, but basically trashes it with a formulaic and unoriginal plot
that involves crooked cops and illicit drug deals.
This '90's version also loses the rebellious
anti-establishment undercurrents that were prevalent in the '60's and
'70's, and which gave the series an unusual edge.  This new look Mod
Squad is little more than an average television movie, and is unlikely
to appeal to the same audiences that remember the similarly themed 21
Jump Street with more affection.  The script is trite and predictable,
the dialogue terribly clichéd and the characters one dimensional.
Scott Silver's direction is pedestrian.
The three stars lack rapport, and their performances are
uncomfortable, flat and uncharismatic.  Claire Danes does the best she
can with the undemanding role of Julie Barnes, the street wise former
drug addict.  Giovanni Ribisi (from The Other Sister, Saving Private
Ryan, etc) brings an intensity to his performance as Pete Cochrane,
the rich kid turned bad, that seems misplaced given the almost comic
book quality of the material.  Omar Epps (from Higher Learning, etc)
gives his Linc Hayes all the life and energy of a lump of wood.
Veteran Dennis Farina is wasted as the squad's mentor Adam Greer,
whose murder kick-starts the plot.
The ending conveniently leaves the way open for a sequel.
However, if prolific producer Aaron Spelling was hoping to turn The
Mod Squad into a successful new movie series he has sadly under
estimated the intelligence of the audience and over estimated the
quality of the banal script.

Title
Review for Paperback Hero (1998)
Jack Willis (Hugh Jackman) drives a road train across the
Australian outback for a living.  To fill in time during the long
stretches of open road, he has written a novel, a mushy romance set
against the background of World War I.  Anxious to maintain his he-man
image, Jack submitted the novel to a Sydney publisher under the
pseudonym of Ruby Vale, a close friend.  The tomboyish Ruby (Claudia
Karvan, from Dating The Enemy, etc) owns the Boomerang Cafe in the
middle of nowhere and loves flying her old crop duster plane.  Ruby is
blissfully unaware of Jack's harmless deception until Ziggy (Angie
Milliken), a publishing representative, shows up.
Ziggy whisks Ruby off to Sydney on a whirlwind publicity tour
to promote the book, and Jack accompanies her, posing as her manager.
Romance slowly blossoms between the pair, who have always maintained a
polite distance back home.  As is the norm in these comedies, romance
does not always follow an easy path, although audiences will quickly
recognise where the film is headed.  Ruby eventually has to choose
between the adventurous and irreverent Jack or her fiance, the
fastidious stick-in-the-mud Hamish (Andrew S Gilbert), the local vet
who has his own views on marriage and the role of women.
Most of the fun with modern romantic comedies lies in the
journey that brings the two reluctant lovers together.  This rather
bland and innocuous romantic comedy from local writer/director Antony
J Bowman is cliched, and follows a somewhat predictable formula.
In some ways this is also a fish out of water scenario, as the outback
pair hit the unfamiliar bright lights of Sydney, and encounter the
false sincerity of industry parties.
The film derives its humour from the tension between Jack and
Ruby, and also from the gentle way in which Bowman pricks away at the
usual stereotypes.  However, his attitude towards the locals of the
small, unnamed outback town is a little patronising and condescending.
Despite the seven years that Bowman apparently spent perfecting the
script, Paperback Hero is still flawed, and some of its promising
ideas are not fully developed.
There is plenty of chemistry and sexual tension between stars
Jackman and Karvan, and there is enough genial wit to keep audiences
chuckling along for much of the duration.
Jackman, who has wowed audiences on stage in productions like
Sunset Boulevard, easily handles the transition to the big screen, and
makes the most of his role as a likeable larrikin.  He has the looks,
the presence and the charisma to become our next major international
film star if he chooses the right roles.  Karvan delivers a solid
performance as the no-nonsense Ruby.  Bowman's wife Jeanie Drynan
makes the most of her smaller role as Suzie, the manager of the
Boomerang cafe, who wants to establish her own independence.
Despite its faults, Paperback Hero is certainly much more
entertaining than the recent, abysmal Dear Claudia.  This lightweight
comedy does have its moments, and will please undemanding audiences!

Title
Review for Happiness (1998)
HAPPINESS (R).  
(October Films/Dendy Films)
Director: Todd Solondz
Stars: Jane Adams, Dylan Baker, Lara Flynn Boyle, Ben Gazzara, Philip 
Seymour Hoffman, Cynthia 
Stephenson, Camryn Manheim, Jared Harris, Louise Lasser, Elizabeth 
Ashley, Rufus Read, Jon Lovitz, 
Dan Moran, Evan Silverberg, Matt Malloy 
Running time: 135 minutes.
Todd Solondz is one of America's few truly independent
directors, who doesn't bow to convention or safe formulas.  In his
debut film, Welcome To The Dollhouse, Solondz looked at a
dysfunctional New Jersey family largely through the eyes of the
troubled teenage daughter.  In his disquieting and confronting new
black comedy Happiness, Solondz yet again taps into the lives of a
dysfunctional family from suburban New Jersey and unearths more rich
and fertile material.  Here he also deliberately pushes back the
envelope and tackles some of the few remaining cinematic taboos -
including masturbation and paedophilia - in a brave, frank and
forthright fashion.  Although he is tackling some important themes and
issues, many in the audience will find elements of Happiness
disturbing.
It is a pretty ironic title, as all the characters here are
looking for happiness, but never seem to find it.  Love often ends in
betrayal and hurt and bitterness.  Solondz seems to tap into much that
is wrong with personal relationships and families in the latter part
of the 1990's.  For him, sex is not the answer, it seems to be an
integral part of the problem.  The film concentrates mainly on the
three Jordan sisters, and the narrative follows their interrelated
stories without glossy embellishments or unrealistic or melodramatic
plot devices.
The film unfolds mainly as a series of conversations, which
reveal much about the various characters.  There is a sense of real
pain and anguish lurking just beneath the surface of their seemingly
content and fulfilled lives.  There is an aching loneliness, as they
are all desperately trying to make a connection in a largely uncaring
world.
Trish (Cynthia Stevenson, from Forget Paris, etc) is the
typical suburban housewife, who has no idea that her psychiatrist
husband Bill (Dylan Baker, from Murder One, etc) harbours a secret
lust for young boys.  A seemingly normal family man and father of
three, Bill turns out to be a paedophile who coldly preys on the
vulnerable friends of his 11 year old son.  We watch, appalled yet
morbidly fascinated, as he drugs his own family one night so that he
can take advantage of the young boy who is sleeping over.  While we
never actually see Bill's actions on screen, Solondz still paints a
pretty chilling picture of him as a predator, without remorse or
compunction.  While Adrian Lyne's remake of Lolita is currently
attracting controversy for its depiction of a man's torrid affair with
his 12 year old stepdaughter, Happiness seems to have slipped in under
the guard of the self-appointed and self-important moral watchdogs.
Trish's sister, the self-absorbed and bitchy Helen (Lara Flynn
Boyle, from Twin Peaks, etc) is a best selling author full of self
loathing and pity, who looks down on her two sisters.  She develops a
relationship with an obscene phone caller (Philip Seymour Hoffman,
also appearing opposite Robin Williams in the far more mainstream
comedy Patch Adams), who turns out to be her next door neighbour.
Taking a plunge, she decides to invites him in one evening.  The
meeting unfolds in an uncomfortable, embarrassing silence that is
abruptly ended when she throws him out of her apartment, declaring
that he is not her type.  Helen's other neighbour is Kristina (The
Practice's Camryn Manheim), a lonely and overweight murderess.
The other sister, Joy (Jane Adams, from Kansas City, etc), is
the pitiful, insecure and naive loser who lurches from one hapless and
unsatisfactory encounter to the next, yet remains full of optimism.
Solondz also introduces us to their parents (Ben Gazzara and Louise
Lasser), who live in Florida, but are in the throes of a separation
after forty years of marriage.
Happiness has something of an Altmanesque quality to it, as
Solondz draws together with deceptive ease and skill the disparate
plots and characters.  Solondz draws wonderful and perceptive
performances from his ensemble cast that bring this collection of
colourful losers to life.  Especially good is Baker, who gets under
the skin of his character and manages to make him more sympathetic
than you would expect.
Happiness is, by turns, sardonic, cruel, relentlessly
uncompromising, earthy, funny, poignant, honest, confronting,
compassionate, insightful, uncomfortable, bleak, despairing, and
challenging.  Many may well find it tasteless and shocking.  Solondz
balances his observations about life, love and other bruises with
humour and casual horror.  Some scenes are excruciatingly
uncomfortable to watch.  Happiness is a powerful and provocative film
that cuts close to the bone, yet lingers in the mind long after the
final credits.

Title
Review for Anywhere But Here (1999)
ANYWHERE BUT HERE (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Wayne Wang
Stars: Susan Sarandon, Natalie Portman, Shawn Hatosy, Hart Bochner, 
Bonnie Bedelia, Roy Baker, Paul Guilfoyle, Eileen Ryan
Running time: 116 minutes.
Anywhere But Here charts the tempestuous but often moving and
complex relationship that exists between mothers and daughters.  This
is similar to territory that director Wayne Wang (Smoke, Blue In The
Face, etc) previously explored in The Joy Luck Club.  While that film
was shaped by more specific cultural and ethnic overtones and the
weight of historical antecedents, Anywhere But Here is a more
contemporary tale.  This is the kind of rich emotional territory that
has become the preserve of American independent cinema, but here it is
given the lavish, big budget treatment.  Thanks to a perceptive script
from Oscar winner Alvin Sargent (Julia, Ordinary People, etc), the
film also looks at the dilemmas of adolescence - divorce, moving home
and making a new start, first love, the loss of close friends, and a
troubled relationship with interfering mothers - with broad humour,
warmth, honesty, and surprising flashes of insight.
Bored with the pace of life and lack of opportunities in small
town Bay City, Wisconsin, flighty Adele August (Susan Sarandon) packs
her bags and young teenage daughter Ann (Natalie Portman, recently
seen in The Phantom Menace) into her second hand Mercedes and heads
off for Beverley Hills and a more exciting life.  Ann however is
annoyed at being uprooted so abruptly from her friends and family, and
resists her new life with a passion.  Meanwhile, the ambitious Adele
tries to adjust, making the most of the slender opportunities that
come her way.
The film spans a couple of years and explores the difficult
relationship that exists between the pair as they try to redefine
themselves and their new life in a strange city.  This gives the film
something of an episodic feel, and Wang's direction is occasionally a
little languid.
At the root of their turbulent relationship are some very real
fears and emotional issues that need to be resolved.  Adele is rather
vulnerable and mostly fears the loneliness she will feel when Ann
grows up and eventually leaves her.  Ann on the other hand is often
embarrassed by her mother's overbearing behaviour and erratic ways.
She constantly swears that she hates Adele and that she will leave
her, but lacks the courage and confidence to do so.
The character of Adele is the type of familiar role that
Sarandon plays with consummate ease.  She delivers a wonderfully brash
performance, capturing Adele's recklessness, her optimism and her deep
love for her daughter.  Sarandon is matched every step of the way by
the superb Portman, who seems to grow in stature and maturity with
every film, and again proves why she is one of the best actresses of
her generation.  Wang largely wastes the talents of an impressive
ensemble supporting cast, that includes Bonnie Bedelia and Shawn
Hatosy, in small roles.
Anywhere But Here is an unashamed weepy and a good old
fashioned "woman's film" in the mould of Alice Doesn't Live Here
Anymore, etc, and will mainly resonate with modern female audiences.

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
BOWFINGER (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Frank Oz
Stars: Steve Martin, Eddie Murphy, Heather Graham, Christine Baranski, 
Jamie Kennedy, Terence Stamp, Robert Downey jr, Barry Newman,
Adam Alexi-Malle, Kohl Sudduth
Running time: 96 minutes.
A sprightly and wickedly funny spoof on Hollywood, low budget
film making, ambition, and the egocentric behaviour of stars,
Bowfinger heralds an overdue return to form for Steve Martin.  This
often manic comic's career has languished in a series of largely
unfunny, laboured comedies that only hint at his capabilities.
Arguably his funniest comedy since Dirty Rotten Scoundrels, Bowfinger
reunites Martin with director Frank Oz, who seems able to get the best
out of him.  Martin also wrote the script for this manic comedy, which
further proves that his best films are often those he pens for himself
(Roxanne, Dead Men Don't Wear Plaid, etc).
Martin plays Bobby Bowfinger, a disillusioned and desperate
film maker on the periphery of the Hollywood scene.  He finds his last
chance to make a name for himself when he stumbles upon the script for
a schlock sci-fi action flick he believes will propel him to the big
time.  However, the only way to get the film approved by the town's
money men (including a nicely smarmy Robert Downey jr) is to cast Kit
Ramsey, the world's biggest action star and current box office
champion.  Unfortunately, the increasingly erratic and paranoid Ramsey
(Eddie Murphy) wants nothing to do with the film.
Bowfinger hatches a crazy scheme to covertly shoot his
no-budget movie around an unaware Ramsey, and assembles a crew of
hangers-on and wannabes.  He follows the actor around, and has his
actors approach Ramsey and deliver their lines.  All of which
bewilders the paranoid star, and provides for some spectacularly funny
encounters.  But then the spooked Ramsey inexplicably disappears,
leaving Bowfinger and his amateurish crew to find a lookalike
replacement to continue the project.
Murphy and Martin play off each other beautifully in the
scenes they share, and one wonders why they've never worked together
before.  The role of Bowfinger is the sort of likeable rogue and
genial con artist that Martin plays so well, although here he gives
his pitiful desperation a comic edge that is endearing.  Murphy plays
a dual role here, appearing both as the suave, if slightly unbalanced
Ramsey, and also as his mild mannered, dentally challenged brother,
but his performance features many of his familiar mannerisms.
Heather Graham (Boogie Nights, etc) is superb as the ambitious
ingenue who ruthlessly sleeps her way to the top.  Christine Baranski
is marvellously droll as the faded actress who thinks this movie is
her last chance at stardom and is determined to make every moment on
screen count.  With films like What About Bob? to his credit, Oz is a
dab hand at comedy, and he maintains a frantic pace throughout.
However, there are a few moments that fall flat and don't work all
that well.  Oz and Martin have resisted the temptation to fill the
screen with celebrity cameos, which would have pushed the film in a
different direction, and made it uncomfortably close to yet another
Player-like satire.
Ultimately, Bowfinger is an enjoyable enough comedy that provides 
plenty of laughs.

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
THREE KINGS (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: David O Russell
Stars: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonze, Nora Dunn, 
Jamie kennedy, Mykelti Williamson, Said Taghmaoui, Cliff Curtis, Liz
Stauber, Holt McCallany
Running time: 114 minutes.
In the 1970 war film Kelly's Heroes, Clint Eastwood led a
ragtag bunch of soldiers who looted Nazi gold as they made their way
across occupied Europe as part of the allied invasion.  David O
Russell's smart action thriller takes a similar premise, but sets it
against the background of the Gulf War of the early 1990's and imbues
it with a healthy dose of cynicism.
In 1991 the Gulf War conflict was winding to a close, as
President Bush and Saddam Hussein negotiated a peace treaty.  However,
for four disenchanted soldiers, another war was just beginning.
Troy Barlow (Mark Wahlberg) and Conrad Vig (Spike Jonze, the
director of Being John Malkovich making his acting debut) are bored
with the lack of action they have seen.  When they find a map
supposedly leading to Saddam's bunkers laden with the spoils of war,
they set out to plunder some gold bullion and set themselves up for
life.  Along for the trip is the deeply religious Chief Elgin (Ice
Cube) and veteran soldier Archie Gates (George Clooney), who is on the
verge of resigning his commission anyway.
Unlike Kelly's Heroes, which was purely a caper film, Three
Kings is a war film with a conscience and a political message, and
Russell actually pushes the material in a markedly different
direction.  Somewhere along the way these flawed heroes get caught up
in the aftermath of the war as they end up trying to lead a group of
refugees through dangerous territory to the border and freedom.  They
cannot stand by idly and watch as Saddam's army takes out its
vengeance on these refugees and dispossessed nationals.
Clooney is good as the laconic Gates and gives probably his
best screen performance to date, while Wahlberg is also dynamic as the
brash Barlow.
A cynical exploration of America's involvement in the war,
Three Kings is the Iraqi/Gulf War equivalent of Platoon.  Written by
John Ridley (U-Turn, etc) and Russell, the film questions America's
involvement in the Gulf conflict, as well as the role played by the
media in sensationalising the war.  The film examines the cynical way
in President Bush abandoned the Iraqi people to their fate once the
Kuwaiti oil was safe guarded.  This politically contentious and
controversial sub-text gives Three Kings far more depth, substance and
intelligence than the average Hollywood action flick.  The film marks
something of a change of pace for Russell, better known for the low
budget independent films Spanking The Monkey and Flirting With
Disaster.  However, he also brings a quirky sensibility and stylish
visual quality to the material that sets it apart from most genre
films.  Russell suffuses the action with lots of graphic violence,
slow motion action, stylish camera work, a streak of black humour, and
an inventiveness that is rare in mainstream movies.

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
RUNAWAY BRIDE (PG).  
(Paramount/Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Garry Marshall
Stars: Julia Roberts, Richard Gere, Joan Cusack, Hector Elizondo,
Rita Wilson, Christopher Meloni, Paul Dooley, Jean Schertler,
Jane Morris, Laurie Metcalf (uncredited), Larry Miller (uncredited)
Running time: 116 minutes.
The chemistry between Richard Gere and Julia Roberts propelled
Pretty Woman, a contemporary reworking of the Pygmalion story, to the
top of the box office in 1990.  The pair are reunited with director
Garry Marshall for the belated follow up, Runaway Bride, a film so
light weight that it is in danger of floating away.  However, the
obvious charisma and magic between the pair again works a treat, and
lifts the formulaic material.  Runaway Bride delivers laughs and charm
in equal measure, and provides more than enough to satisfy audiences.
This delightfully charming if improbable romantic comedy will be
another runaway hit at the box office.
Ike Graham (Gere) is a New York columnist with a cynical and
misogynist outlook that earns him the ire of his readers.  Suffering
from writer's block with the deadline for his column only hours away,
he nurses his sorrows in a neighbourhood bar.  There he hears the
story of a serial runaway bride who has a habit of leaving her
potential husbands at the altar.  Graham writes the story without
checking the facts, and is promptly fired.  Still intrigued by the
story he heads off to picturesque Hale, in upstate Maryland, hoping to
gain vindication.
Maggie (Roberts) is deep in preparation for her fourth wedding
attempt.  This time her fiancé is the town's football coach
(Christopher Meloni).  Graham decides to follow Maggie around, hoping
to understand her fear of marriage.  The prickly animosity between the
mismatched pair slowly melts and gives way to romance as they realise
they have more in common than they care to admit.  The plot from this
point is fairly trite and predictable.
There is more of a slap stick sensibility to this film, and
the two stars throw themselves into their roles with an obvious
enthusiasm and relish.  The eccentric townsfolk are treated as little
more than stereotypes - the alcoholic father (Paul Dooley), the foul
mouthed octogenarian (Jean Schertler), and the man hungry widow (an
uncredited Laurie Metcalf) - although the dependable Joan Cusack makes
the most of her role as Peggy, Maggie's understanding best friend.
Chicago Hope star Hector Elizondo, who has appeared in all ten of
Marshall's previous films, gets some of the best lines, which he
delivers in superbly droll fashion.
Marshall's direction is uninspired, but the chemistry between
the two stars makes this innocuous souffle worth watching.  This is
the sort of thing that Roberts does best.  My Best Friend's Wedding,
Notting Hill, and now Runaway Bride have re-established her as the
queen of Hollywood romantic comedies.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
AUSTIN POWERS: THE SPY WHO SHAGGED ME (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Jay Roach
Stars: Mike Myers, Heather Graham, Michael York, Robert Wagner, Seth
Green, Mindy Sterling, Verne Troyer, Rob Lowe, Gia Carides, Elizabeth
Hurley, Will Ferrell, Burt Bacharach, Elivs Costello, Willie Nelson,
Tim Robbins, Jerry Springer, Kristen Johnston, Charles Napier, Woody
Harrelson, Rebecca Romjin Stamos, Muse Watson, Clint Howard.
Groovy, baby!  Mike Myers returns as Austin Powers, the over
sexed, impossibly hirsute, yellow toothed and sartorially challenged
'60's super spy, in this hilarious and thoroughly enjoyable spoof of
the whole canon of '60's spy films.  Incredibly, this shagadelic
sequel is much better than the first film, which failed to amuse or
impress some audiences.  The Spy Who Shagged Me takes the basic
formula of the original and inverts it.  However, there are less
wasted opportunities here.
Co-writers Myers and Michael McCullers (who honed his satiric
talents writing for Saturday Night Live for many years) take the
familiar clichés and memorable moments of the Bond films and savage
them mercilessly.  Film buffs will also recognise lively spoofs of
other '60's spies, like Matt Helm and The Avengers, in the broad mix.
Whereas the first film saw the cryogenically frozen Powers
unleashed on the late 1990's, this sequel sees him return to London in
the swinging '60's.  Dr Evil also ventures back in time, accompanied
by his pint sized clone Mini-Me (Verne Troyer).  Dr Evil has hatched a
dastardly plot to steal the frozen Powers' mojo (his libido, his life
force), thus thwarting the spy's efforts to stop his plan for world
domination.  To defeat Dr Evil's plan to blackmail the world with a
high tech laser planted on the moon, Powers teams up with beautiful,
sexy and extremely capable CIA agent Felicity Shagwell ("Shagwell by
name, shag very well by reputation"), played with enthusiasm by
Heather Graham (from Boogie Nights, etc).
There is a distinct lack of subtlety here, and many of its
targets are obvious.  The very busy and wildly inventive plot includes
lots of corny special effects and is liberally sprinkled with clever
pop cultural references.  Somehow it all works a treat under Jay
Roach's proficient direction.  He maintains a cracking pace, and there
are few flat moments in this non stop barrage of bad taste jokes.  The
film is chock full of the sort of puerile humour, smutty jokes and
cheap double entendres that make the Carry On films look
sophisticated.  Nonetheless it will be enthusiastically lapped up by
adolescent schoolboys everywhere.
Everyone from the original film returns for the sequel,
although Elizabeth Hurley's character is despatched very early in the
piece.  While Myers is sometimes a little irritating as the heroic and
narcissistic Powers, he is marvellous as Dr Evil, the pinkie-sucking,
Blofeld-like villain of the piece.  Buried under a mountain of
prosthetics, Myers is virtually unrecognisable in a third role as the
grotesque and aptly named Fat Bastard, one of Evil's agents, who
steals Powers' mojo.
Mindy Sterling is wonderfully abrasive and funny as Frau
Farbissina, while Rob Lowe does a marvellous job of impersonating
Robert Wagner as a younger version of Dr Evil's loyal and taciturn
lieutenant, Number Two.  Seth Green is droll as Evil's test tube son
Scott, who continually points out the ludicrousness of his father's
plans.  Burt Bacharach, Elvis Costello, Woody Harrelson, Willie
Nelson, Tim Robbins and talk show host Jerry Springer are along for
the ride with wonderful cameos.  Everyone involved looks like they
were having a smashing time, and their infectious enthusiasm soon rubs
off on the audience.
If nothing else, the whole exercise is also another chance to
crank up a soundtrack of great '60's rock classics!
The Spy Who Shagged Me knocked the over hyped and
disappointing The Phantom Menace off the top of the US box office.
That it will likely repeat that feat here gives heart that audiences
still prefer films with human characters and a bit of style over
computer generated visual effects.  May the farce be with you!

Title
Review for In a Savage Land (1999)
IN A SAVAGE LAND (M).  
(Beyond Films/Universal)
Director: Bill Bennett
Stars: Rufus Sewell, Martin Donovan, Maya Stange, Max Cullen, John 
Howard, Andrew S Gilbert, Susan Lyons, Marshall Napier
Running time: 106 minutes.
Just before the outbreak of World War Two, a pair of newly wed
anthropologists venture to the Trobriand Islands off New Guinea to
study the sexual habits and rituals of the local tribesmen.  However,
their experiences soon expose the cracks in their unsatisfactory
relationship, and tension grows between the pair that affects their
work.
Phillip Spence (an unusually lethargic and insipid Martin
Donovan) is a renowned anthropologist and teacher looking forward to
the challenge of studying the sexual mores of a tribe largely
untouched by the twentieth century.  His wife Evelyn (newcomer Maya
Stange) is a former student and idealist with outspoken views on the
direction that their research should take.  Far from being a demure
assistant and typist, Evelyn takes to pursuing her own research, which
upsets Phillip.  Evelyn also manages to offend both the stuffy
colonial administrator (a tired Max Cullen) and a pompous priest (Sea
Change's John Howard) determined to bring Christianity and
civilisation to the savages.  As the tension between her and her
husband increases, Evelyn is attracted to Carpenter (Rufus Sewell),
the ruggedly handsome, roguish pearl fisherman and trader.
In her first major film appearance, Stange delivers a solid
performance in a quite complex and emotionally demanding role, and she
carries the film.  Sewell and Donovan are far less impressive in
clichéd roles.
Writer/director Bill Bennett has tackled some ambitious themes
here - changing sexual roles in the 20th century, the clash of
cultures, western imperialism and the destruction of so-called
primitive societies - but he is let down by the somewhat clichéd
and melodramatic narrative.  In A Savage Land is based on a true
story, but Bennett and his co-writer Jennifer Bennett have opted for
some soft options and familiar stereotypes rather than more hard
hitting stuff.
Production values are solid, with plenty of attention paid to
accuracy concerning period detail and costumes.  Bennett spent some
two years researching the film and studying the Trobriand Islands, and
has captured some of the tribal rituals in detail.  He has undertaken
the difficult task of filming in the inhospitable wilds of New Guinea
itself rather than in a more friendly environment, but his decision
has added authenticity to the dramatic locations.  Cinematographer
Danny Ruhlmann, a former director of high profile commercials, uses
the wide screen to great effect here, creating some vivid and
memorable images that leave more of a lasting impression than the
sometimes routine drama itself.
In A Savage Land is almost a conventional film, and lacks the
assured cinematic style and energy that Bennett brought to the screen
with his stylish, award winning thriller Kiss Or Kill.  The pace is
occasionally plodding, and the film lacks any real sense of passion
and emotional depth.

Title
Review for Messenger: The Story of Joan of Arc, The (1999)
JOAN OF ARC (M).  
(Columbia Tristar/Gaumont)
Director: Luc Besson
Stars: Milla Jovovich, John Malkovich, Faye Dunaway, Dustin Hoffman, Rab 
Affleck, Vincent Cassel, Tchecky Karyo, Pascal Greggory, Richard Ridings,
Desmond Harrington, Timothy West, Carl McCrystal
Running time: 158 minutes.
Joan of Arc was the illiterate peasant girl who, in the 15th
century, believed that God told her how to defeat the all-conquering
English army and restore Charles II to the throne.  She united the
dishevelled French army and routed the English at the siege of
Orleans.  But later she was denounced as a witch and burnt at the
stake.  Some five hundred years later she was canonised by the
Vatican, although her life is still the subject of much speculation
and controversy.
It's a story that has been told on screen many times before,
most recently in the earnest television miniseries, starring Leelee
Sobieski and Peter O'Toole.  However French director Luc Besson (La
Femme Nikita, The Professional, etc) gives this familiar story a
suitably epic treatment in this bold and bloody retelling of the
legend.  Besson has spared little expense in bringing the story to the
screen.  The costumes, the lavish production design, and the authentic
looking Czech locations all bring the era to life beautifully.
Thierry Arbogast's cinematography is also superb.
Although visually quite splendid, the initial sequences, which
deal with Joan's early visions, are a little clumsily handled.
However, Besson soon comes into his own with his assured direction of
the film's bloody and brutal battle sequences.  With Braveheart, Mel
Gibson established a new standard for medieval battle scenes.  Besson
enthusiastically follows that example with his spectacular centre
piece, the bloody siege of Orleans, which occupies much of the film's
150 minutes.  Besson efficiently captures the carnage and confusion of
battle, and he takes his cameras right into the thick of the
confusion.
But he also explores in some detail the fascinating politics
of church and state that ultimately decided Joan's fate.  Having
decided that she had outlived her usefulness, they both conspired to
rid themselves of the troublesome and charismatic Joan.
Milla Jovovich (The Fifth Element, etc) is superb as the
complex Joan, and she handles both the physical elements and the more
cerebral and emotional elements of the role effectively.  She is
especially good in portraying the difficulty Joan had in reconciling
her bloody actions as a fierce warrior with her deep religious
convictions.  Faye Dunaway is also great as Charles II's scheming
mother-in-law, who was also obviously the power behind the French
throne.  Dustin Hoffman makes the most of a small role as Joan's
conscience, while John Malkovich makes a nicely pragmatic Charles II.
Andrew Birkin's script often smacks of trite American
cliches and rather 20th century sounding dialogue.  While this may
offend the purists, it is nonetheless a wonderfully effective way of
bringing this 500 year old legend alive and making Joan's struggle
seem relevant for contemporary audiences.  
**1/2 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
BULWORTH (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Warren Beatty
Stars: Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle, Joshua
Malina, Jack Warden, Paul Sorvino, Christine Baranski, Richard
Sarafian, Isaiah Washington, Sean Astin, Laurie Metcalf, Amiri Baraka,
Wendell Pierce, Michele Morgan, Ariyan Johnson, Larry King, George
Hamilton (uncredited cameo)
Running time: 108 minutes.
        Bulworth is a daring film from Warren Beatty, a film maker
whose politics have always been left of centre and whose long career
has been driven by his very personal choice of projects.  In this
cynical and scathing political satire Beatty tackles many of the more
obvious problems of the American democratic process, and the social
and economic divisions caused by race and class.  Beatty, who is
credited as writer, producer and director, takes aim at a number of
targets and hits a few raw nerves along the way.  Beatty could also be
accused of biting the hand that feeds him, as he attacks the major
motion picture studios, the corporations that buy political favours,
and the whole political process itself.
In the week before the Senate elections, Democrat Jay
Bulington Bulworth (Beatty) has become disillusioned by the hypocrisy,
the lies and the machinations of American politics and wants out.  He
takes out a $10 million life insurance policy and then hires a hit man
to assassinate him.  Freed of any sense of obligation, Bulworth then
feels able to speak his mind during the campaign.  Rather than deliver
the same tired old speeches, he begins to tell the truth, informing
the voters of how little they actually mean to the politicians.
Suddenly, Bulworth becomes popular and reinvents himself as that
rarity - an honest, straight talking politician.
In the wave of euphoria following his sensational admissions,
Bulworth has second thoughts about his earlier decision, but finds
himself unable to call off the hit.  Bulworth also finds romance with
the fiery, beautiful and intelligent Nina (Halle Berry, from Executive
Decision, etc), who hails from LA's black ghettos and the opposite end
of the political spectrum.  However, her ideas and opinions open his
eyes to a lot that is wrong with his country and the government.
Another unexpected source of inspiration is found in L D (Don Cheadle,
from Devil In A Blue Dress, etc), a drug lord.
Bulworth follows on from those other sharp political satires
from last year, the timely Wag The Dog and Primary Colors.  However,
Bulworth is nowhere near as clever, biting or as credible as those two
films, and at times is something of an undisciplined mess.  As
co-writers, Beatty and long time collaborator Jeremy Pikser (Reds,
etc) seem to have bitten off more than they can chew in this ambitious
script.  There are a couple of good ideas here, but they seem to get
lost in some unnecessary over plotting.  The film ultimately lacks a
strong central focus.  And those scenes where Bulworth, an angry old
man, proceeds to rail against corruption and apathy through rap songs
don't quite convince.  For once, Beatty is playing closer to his age,
a haggard, weary and tired 60 something, and he seems to be enjoying
the experience.  Oliver Platt gives a wonderfully manic performance as
Murphy, Bulworth's increasingly frustrated aide who attempts damage
control as he tries to keep his charge on the straight and narrow.  A
number of celebrity cameos, from the ubiquitous Larry King through to
George Hamilton, add to the flavour of the film.
Despite its structural flaws though, Bulworth looks great,
thanks to Vittorio Storaro's superb cinematography and Dean
Tavoularis' production design.

Title
Review for Mansfield Park (1999)
MANSFIELD PARK (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Patricia Rozema
Stars: Frances O'Connor, Jonny Lee Miller, Alessandro Nivola, Embeth 
Davidtz, Harold Pinter, Lindsay Duncan, Sheila Gish, James Purefoy, 
Victoria Hamilton, Justine Waddell, Hugh Bonneville, Hannah Taylor Gordon
Running time: 116 minutes.
The third, and most autobiographical, of Jane Austen's novels,
Mansfield Park tells the story of a young girl from an impoverished
family who is raised on the estate of wealthy relatives in the English
countryside.  This is a witty, articulate and beautifully observed
tale that retains the lyrical quality of Austen's prose as well as the
irony with which she observed the social mores and conventions of
British society during the late 18th and early 19th century.
This delightful comedy remains faithful to those themes common
to Austen's novels (Emma, Sense And Sensibility, etc), but gives the
material a decidedly feminist outlook.  It explores the class system
of England and savages the hypocrisy and double standards of the upper
class, who preach morality and virtue at home but practice debauchery
when abroad visiting their holdings in the colonies.  It also suggests
that marriage for wealth and status does not always lead to happiness.
And, while marriage for love is a more noble option, it also brings
with it some emotional baggage.
Sex has always been a part of Austen's novels, but until now
it has merely been hinted at, never seen.  In Mansfield Park, Canadian
director Patricia Rozema (When Night Is Falling, etc) brings it out
into the open, making for a bolder, more lusty interpretation that may
shock the purists.  Rozema has also drawn on Austen's own letters and
journals to flesh out the narrative.  Rozema may have taken numerous
liberties with Austen's novel, but her witty and intelligent script
and its modern sensibilities make Mansfield Park relevant for today's
audiences.
Australian actress Frances O'Connor (Love And Other
Catastrophes, etc) does a superb job as Austen's semi-autobiographical
heroine Fanny Price, who undergoes a rags-to-riches like
transformation.  At a young age Fanny is taken away from the squalor
of her impoverished family in Portsmouth and sent to the country
estate of her rich relatives, the Bertrams.  There she is put to good
use in the household, as well as gaining an education along the way.
Fanny blossoms into a beautiful, articulate, literate young
woman with strong opinions and an independent spirit, although some of
her ideas are met with disapproval by her guardians.  Despite her
forthright nature though, Fanny is also the typically virginal Austen
heroine, who finds herself caught between two suitors.  On one hand
there is the handsome but narcissistic and shallow cad Henry Crawford
(Alessandro Nivola, recently seen in Best Laid Plans, etc), who
showers her with protestations of love and happiness.  On the other
hand there is Edmund Bertram (Jonny Lee Miller, from Trainspotting,
etc), whom she has known since childhood, but who is retiring and
reluctant to admit his feelings for her.  Meanwhile, Henry's sister
Mary (Embeth Davidtz) has designs for Edmund and the Bertram fortune.
Rozema handles the romantic entanglements and machinations
with a dexterity that brings this potentially staid period melodrama
to life.  The characters are beautifully brought to life by the
wonderful cast.  O'Connor is superb and suffuses her character with
plenty of fierce determination and spunk.  Playwright Harold Pinter
brings plenty of bluster to his performance as the patriarchal Sir
Thomas Bertram.
While Mansfield Park may not be for the purists, it is a
vastly enjoyable, lavishly cinematic spectacle.  The production design
is superb, and Michael Coulter's cinematography simply luscious.

Title
Review for Summer of Sam (1999)
SUMMER OF SAM (R).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Spike Lee
Stars: John Leguizamo, Adrien Brody, Mira Sorvino, Jennifer Esposito,
Michael Rispoli, Anthony LaPaglia, Saverio Guerra, Brian Tarantino, Al
Pagalonia, Ken Garito, Bebe Neuwirth, Patti LuPone, Mike Starr, Roger
Guenveur Smith, Ben Gazarra, Michael Badalucco, Jimmy Breslin, John
Savage, Joe Lisi, James Reno, Arthur Nascarella, Spike Lee, voice of
John Turturro
Running time: 131 minutes.
This controversial, disturbing and visually stylish new film
from Spike Lee is certainly not for the faint hearted.  Dealing with
the killing spree of David Berkowitz, dubbed the Son of Sam, during
the hot summer of 1977, this uncompromising film is something of a
return to form for Lee, whose last couple of films have lacked impact,
and have even failed to secure a release in this country.  But Summer
of Sam is no mere police procedural depicting the intense
investigation to track down the killer, who later claimed that he was
ordered to kill by his neighbour's barking dog.  Rather, Summer Of Sam
recalls Lee's superb Do The Right Thing, which explored how events
reverberate throughout a neighbourhood, like a rock thrown into a pool
sends out ever increasing ripples that disturb the smooth surface.
Lee beautifully evokes the heat and steamy tension of New York
during that unforgettable summer, characterised by an unusual heat
wave.  Real life events from the time are also woven into the
narrative, giving a sense of authenticity.  Lee captures feverish
Saturday nights spent dancing in hip discos, the palpable sense of
fear that permeated the neighbourhood with Sam stalking the streets,
the sweaty heat wave, and the deep seated suspicions and tensions that
upset an otherwise close knit Italian American community.
John Leguizamo (the awful Spawn, etc) gives a career best
performance here as Vinny, a swaggering and macho Brooklyn
hairdresser, whose marital infidelities finally catch up with during
that fateful summer.  Sex, drugs and an increasingly chaotic lifestyle
soon take their toll on Vinny, and creates a rift between him and his
long suffering wife Dionna (Oscar winner Mira Sorvino).  His best
friend is Ritchie (Adrien Brody, recently seen in the star studded The
Thin Red Line, etc), who proudly struts around the neighbourhood
sporting his new look, heavily influenced by the British new wave of
punk rock, much to the chagrin of his buddies who profess a far more
reserved and traditional outlook.  But as Sam's killing spree
continues, fear and suspicion soon permeate the neighbourhood.
Vigilante gangs form, the mob offers a hefty reward, and some outraged
citizens take the law into their own hands, targeting those whose
behaviour they view as suspicious.  Soon Vinny and Ritchie find
themselves on a violent and nasty collision course that will forever
taint their friendship.
Summer Of Sam is a very violent and confronting film, and Lee
sails close to the wind with his recreation of both a time and a place
that has left some very deep psychological scars.  The scenes dealing
with Sam have a gritty intensity and palpable sense of madness to
them, and Lee gives these sequences a bizarre, almost surreal touch
that sometimes jars with the other elements of the film.  Lee has
bathed the film in hits from the '70's, which creates a nostalgic mood
for many in the audience.  But rather than merely using the music as
an accessory on which to hang the obligatory soundtrack album, Lee
carefully integrates the songs into the structure and fabric of the
Somehow he has married two vastly different story strands into
what is largely a nostalgic look at the glory days of disco.  It's
almost as if Son of Sam had wandered into Saturday Night Fever and
started blasting away at random!  Lee also cleverly bookends the
narrative with a monologue from Jimmy Breslin, the former reporter who
wrote the definitive book on the Son of Sam killings, which gives the
material a nicely ironic touch.
Performances throughout are quite solid, with The Practice's
Michael Badalucco, cast against type, delivering a rather intense
performance as the driven killer.  Sorvino is also strong as Dionna,
who finally summons up the courage and strength to leave her
philandering husband.  One weak link is Lee himself, who gives a very
wooden and uncomfortable performance as a television journalist
attempting to seek out community responses to the murder spree.
Lee uses a lot of his usual cinematic tricks to give the film
an idiosyncratic look and feel, but Summer Of Sam will test the
patience and stamina of many within the audience.  As strong and as
compelling as Summer Of Sam may be, though, one is left with the
overwhelming impression that the definitive film exploring the Son of
Sam killings has yet to be made!
  
**1/2
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Violon rouge, Le (1998)
THE RED VIOLIN (M).  
(New Line Features/Village Roadshow)
Director: Francois Girard
Stars: Samuel L Jackson, Carlo Cecchi, Irene Grazioli, Jean-Luc
Bideau, Greta Scacchi, Jason Flemyng, Sylvia Chang, Colm Feore, Anita
Laurenzi, Chistoph Koncz, Liu Zi Feng, Don McKellar
Running time: 131 minutes.
Canadian director Francois Girard, best known for his
inventive Thirty-Two Short Films About Glenn Gould, again uses music
as an inspiration in his new film, which is ostensibly five short
films about a fabled violin.  This beautiful, visually lush, and
breath-takingly romantic epic tells the story of a fabulous violin,
the last creation of master builder Nicolo Bussoti, and follows the
instrument across three continents.
The film opens in 17th century Italy, where Bussoti (Carlo
Cecchi) creates the violin as a lasting legacy for his beautiful young
wife, who died during childbirth.  Supposedly possessed by his wife's
soul, the magnificent violin plays haunting music that inspires all
who come in contact with it, and it becomes an object of obsession for
all who cross its path.  Over the centuries the violin passes across
Europe to England, and then on to China, where it narrowly escapes
destruction at the height of the Cultural Revolution.  The 300 year
old instrument then finds its way to a famed Montreal-based auction
house, where it is put up for sale.
The thread that links all the various stories is the auction
itself.  This key sequence is replayed several times, from the
different perspectives of the various interested parties who have come
to bid for the violin, which brings an element of suspense to
proceedings.
Girard has written the film in collaboration with Canadian
writer/director/actor Don McKellar (Exotica, etc), who plays a small
role here as an antiquities expert called in to help verify the
violin's authenticity.  However, not all the strands of this
multi-layered narrative dealing with lust, greed and the enduring
power of love and music, are successful.  Subsequently, the film is a
little uneven.  The modern day scenes in particular lack a sense of
passion and beauty.
Girard has assembled an impressive international cast to
breathe life into the story and the characters, but many of them play
small roles.  Samuel L Jackson lends dignity to his ambivalent role as
an expert called in to trace the provenance of a shipment of rare
violins due to be auctioned.  He becomes obsessed with the famed red
violin of history when he discovers it amongst the collection.  Jason
Flemyng (from Lock, Stock And Two Smoking Barrels, etc) and Greta
Scacchi steam up the screen as a flamboyant nineteenth century English
musician and his demanding and jealous mistress.  Christoph Koncz is
memorable as Kaspar Weiss, a young child prodigy.
The film has been beautifully shot by cinematographer Alain
Dostie, and the stunning visuals are further enhanced by John
Corigliano's compositions.  Francois Seguin's production design is
also impressive and brings alive the 17th century European settings.

Title
Review for Wood, The (1999)
This dull, tedious and relentlessly bland
semi-autobiographical coming of age comedy is characterised by wooden
performances, wooden direction and a leaden script.
Set in the middle class Los Angeles suburb of Inglewood
(affectionately known as "the Wood" by its residents) in the
mid-1980's, the film follows the friendship between three black
youths.  The film opens in the present, with the imminent wedding of
Roland (Taye Diggs).  But with only a couple of hours before the
ceremony, Roland has disappeared, and it falls to his two best friends
Mike (Omar Epps, from Higher Learning, etc) and Slim (Richard T Jones,
from Kiss The Girls, etc) to find him and get him to the church on
time.
This is the cue for some flashback sequences recalling their
first meeting at school and some key events in their enduring
friendship.  We follow the young Mike (played by Fresh's Sean Nelson),
Slim (Duane Finley, making his feature film debut) and Roland (Trent
Cameron, also making his debut) through school, the senior prom, a
comic hold-up, and the embarrassment of their first sexual experience.
In a sequence that seems like a tasteless cross between Porky's and
the recent American Pie, the three make a pact to try and lose their
virginity within a month, with money riding on the outcome.  We also
follow the slowly developing romance between Mike and Alicia (Malinda
Williams) from its awkward beginnings, and learn why the couple
eventually went their separate ways.
 
However, there are few insightful moments or cathartic
experiences to make this semi- autobiographical tale worth telling.
Even though it is a film about the experience of contemporary black
youth, The Wood fails the basic test of all good coming of age films.
Nostalgic films are supposed to evoke memories and a sense of shared
experiences that resonate with audiences of all backgrounds and
persuasions, but The Wood fails to arouse any such emotional response.
The film lacks any warmth, humour, or insight, and we feel little
empathy for these boys in the wood.
First time writer/director Rick Famuyiwa sets up a number of
potentially interesting ideas, but fails to satisfactorily develop
them or follow through.  The Wood has nothing of interest to say, and
takes nearly two hours in which to say it.  In fact, it makes the
recent tedious How Stella Got Her Groove Back seem like a masterpiece
by comparison.  The Wood should come with its own subtitles so that
audiences can understand the peculiar jive talk of the characters!
Famuyiwa even resorts to the horribly clichéd technique of having
one character directly address the camera during the opening scenes,
but somehow this clumsy device is mysteriously dropped by the
climactic wedding sequence.  For me, the best part of this awful film
came when it unexpectedly broke down during the preview screening.  At
first, the dialogue was out of synch, making the film look like one of
those old badly dubbed Bruce Lee films of the mid-'70's.  Then the
screen mercifully faded to black (so to speak) for a few minutes.
Unfortunately, the problem was rectified and The Wood plodded on for
another interminable 80 minutes.
Even without these technical glitches, The Wood would have to
rank as one of the worst films of the year!

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
THE SIXTH SENSE (M).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: M Night Shyamalan
Stars: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Haley Joel Osment, Olivia Williams, 
Trevor Morgan, Donnie Wahlberg, Mischa Barton
Running time: 107 minutes.
The Sixth Sense is a gripping and intriguing combination of
psychological thriller and ghost story, with a solid emotional core
that reminds one of Jerry Zucker's Ghost (1990).
Eight year old Cole Sear (beautifully played by Haley Joel
Osment, a veteran of television and film, whose roles include playing
Forrest jr in Forrest Gump) is a deeply troubled kid.  However, his
mother (Aussie actress Toni Collette) and doctors are unable to
discover the cause of his problems.  Enter renowned child psychologist
Dr Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis), who builds a rapport with Cole, and
eventually discovers that the kid is visited by ghosts.  Cole is
unusually sensitive to their presence, and these spirits want him to
help pass messages to their living relatives and ease their grief and
suffering.
A year earlier Crowe was shot by one of his former patients,
and is determined not to fail Cole, even at the cost of his failing
marriage.  His long suffering wife Anna (Olivia Williams, from
Rushmore, etc) has grown cold and distant.  In helping Cole come to
terms with his supernatural visitors, Crowe also understands the
source of his own personal problems.
Writer/director M Night Shyamalan ends the film with an
unexpected but rewarding twist.  So many films end with a twist that
is both contrived and unconvincing.  However, the sting in the tail
here works beautifully, and, like the surprise ending of The Usual
Suspects, it will have audiences re- evaluating everything from a
completely different perspective.
The Sixth Sense is in many ways an atypical Willis thriller.
Here he is not saving the world, merely a young child.  However, in
contrast to the recent Mercury Rising, he does it without blazing
guns.  Willis rises to the occasion with a far more perceptive,
restrained and intelligent performance that perfectly suits the mood
of the film.  However, it is young Osment who steals the film with his
sensitive, sympathetic, intelligent and hugely endearing portrayal.
Collette is superb as Cole's concerned but confused mother, and
delivers a solid, rich and gut-wrenching performance that easily ranks
amongst her best.
It seems fitting that The Sixth Sense is filmed in
Philadelphia, a city steeped in history and the ghosts of the past.
Shyamalan beautifully builds up an unsettling atmosphere with lots of
symbolism and mysticism.  He succeeds in unnerving audiences without a
heavy dependence on clever effects or carefully staged shocks.  Tak
Fujimoto's cinematography further enhances the film's eerie mood.
          This intriguing psychological thriller is actually the third
film from Shyamalan, a Philadelphia-based film maker who turned his
back on his family tradition of a career in medicine to pursue a film
career.  While his previous films are virtually unknown outside
America, The Sixth Sense has gained international release.  Shyamalan
directs with the assurance and confidence of a film maker in complete
command of his material, and this eerie thriller heightens
expectations for his next film.
It is a little surprising that a film devoid of the usual
Hollywood trappings of big effects, pyrotechnics, chases and lots of
violence, has done so well at the box office.  But then again, as with
the superb Ghost, its central theme of mortality strikes a personal
and deeply emotional chord with the audience.

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Like the superb A Few Good Men, The General's Daughter is a
murder mystery that puts the military on trial and probes the rotten
core of the corps.  The film also similarly questions the unblinking
obedience to strict codes of behaviour and disciplined adherence to
"the army way" that leads to abuses.
The catalyst here is the discovery of a bound and brutally
beaten body on a military base.  The victim is a female officer and
psychological warfare expert.  She is also the only child of legendary
general Joe Campbell (James Cromwell, from Babe, etc), a highly
decorated officer who is about to retire from the military and take up
a very high profile position in public life as a vice presidential
candidate.  Campbell is anxious to avoid any hint of scandal, and
wants the murder quietly and quickly investigated before the FBI is
called in.
Assigned the unenviable and politically prickly task is CID
investigator Paul Brenner (John Travolta), who has special powers of
arrest.  We quickly learn that Brenner is something of a maverick, who
shoots first and asks questions later, and who also has a healthy
disdain for following military protocol.  Assisting the investigation
is Sarah Sunhill (Madeleine Stowe), a rape specialist with whom
Brenner had an affair many years earlier.  The pair trample through a
minefield of military secrets, long buried scandals, corruption, and
sordid sex that eventually leads all the way to West Point.  They also
uncover a list of high profile suspects that includes the dead woman's
boss Colonel Moore (a wonderfully smarmy James Woods) and the
general's personal aide (Clarence Williams III, from the original Mod
Squad).
Based on Nelson De Mille's best selling novel, The General's
Daughter is a somewhat brutal and ugly film, with an emphasis on
graphic violence and sordid sex, that will do little for the image of
the army.  The clever and sinuous plot features a number of red
herrings that will keep audiences hooked until the denouement.  One
suspects that veteran script doctor and dual Oscar winning writer
William Goldman is largely responsible for polishing the crackling
dialogue, especially the wonderful interrogation scene between Brenner
and Moore which snaps with clever barbs and verbal one- upmanship.
Director Simon West (who burst onto the screen with the
sensational action thriller Con Air) leaves behind the spectacular
pyrotechnics and spectacular action sequences of his debut to
concentrate more on character and atmosphere here.  Nonetheless his
direction is proficient and he maintains a keen level of suspense
throughout the film.
Travolta brings a dangerous edge and rare intensity to his
performance as the driven Brenner, while Stowe is both tough yet
vulnerable as Sunhill.  Cromwell brings dignity and class to his role
as the veteran general who has devoted his life to the military.  West
has assembled a veritable rogue's gallery, including Timothy Hutton,
Williams, and the brilliant, scene stealing Woods, to flesh out the
list of colourful suspects.

Title
Review for Two Hands (1999)
The gritty urban crime thriller is one genre that Australian
film makers have rarely tackled, and not very well at that.  Tyro
feature film director Gregor Jordan is to be congratulated for not
only treading a path less well worn, but for also carrying it off
beautifully.  Two Hands follows the same irreverent, jokey and blokey
approach that worked so appealingly with last year's hit British
thriller Lock, Stock And Two Smoking Barrels.  However, Jordan
carefully steers away from too much gratuitous violence and deftly
avoids the misogynistic touches of that film.
Rising young Aussie star Heath Ledger, recently seen in the
enjoyable if formulaic teen comedy 10 Things I Hate About You, brings
plenty of charm and sex appeal to the film.  He plays Jimmy, a naive
youth who works as a doorman at a Sydney strip club.  But Jimmy has
aspirations of making it big through mutual connections with Pando
(Bryan Brown), the unforgiving villain who rules Sydney's Kings Cross
area.  He finally gets his chance when Pando offers him an opportunity
to prove himself.  All Jimmy has to do is drop off $10,000 at a flat.
But complications quickly set in.  Thinking that no-one is
home, Jimmy goes to the beach to fill in time before trying again.
While he is swimming, two homeless kids snatch the money.  Jimmy is in
deep trouble as Pando is out for his blood.  His only hope of
salvation lies in replacing the money, and quickly.  Which is how he
comes to be involved in a bank robbery, organised by his sister-in-law
(Susie Porter, from the awful Welcome To Woop Woop, etc) and the
incompetent Wozza (Steve Le Marquand).
The various characters continually cross paths and interact
with each other on an inevitable collision course that will end in
death and violence.  Jordan has a razor sharp writing style, and
brings touches of black comedy to the energetic plot.  He directs with
remarkable assurance and confidence, and also keeps the action moving
at a rapid pace.  Jordan makes good use of Sydney's streets and the
sleazy, neon drenched area of King's Cross, giving the film a sense of
realism.
The characters are well-drawn and brought to life by a cast
attuned to the nuances of the script.  Jordan draws a wonderfully
menacing performance from Brown, an often wooden performer.  Brown
actually looks like he's enjoying himself with his role here and he
seems far more comfortable than he did in the recent, embarrassingly
awful Dear Claudia.  Ledger confirms his status as the next Australian
to hit it big on the international scene with his confident and brash
performance here.
The only weak point of the film is the creaky device centring
around the almost supernatural character of the dead man (Steven
Vidler), who acts as a narrator and moral conscience of the story.
Fast-paced, action-packed and immensely enjoyable, Two Hands
is easily one of the most exciting and entertaining locally produced
films for quite some time.

Title
Review for 20 Dates (1998)
20 DATES (M).  
(Fox Searchlight/Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Myles Berkowitz
Stars: Myles Berkowitz, Robert McKee, Richard Arlook, Tia Carrere
Running time: 88 minutes.
In 1996, Aussie film maker Robert Gibson exposed his personal 
life and failed relationships to 
excruciatingly painful scrutiny with his video diary Video Fool For Love. 
 First time film maker Myles Berkowitz attempts something similar,
albeit it on a grander and less intimate scale, in this mock
documentary recording his often embarrassing search for true love.
Thankfully, 20 Dates lacks the self- indulgent and voyeuristic
excesses of Gibson's film, although it, too, has its flaws.
In 20 Dates Berkowitz deliberately offers a contrast to the
glamorous version of love as depicted in numerous light weight
Hollywood romantic comedies.  Combining the two greatest disasters of
his life thus far - his professional career and his personal life -
the ambitious Berkowitz sets out to make a low budget film about being
single and dateless in contemporary Los Angeles.
 We've seen this sort of stuff 
before - the central premise of being desperate and dateless in LA also 
sounds vaguely similar to the broad 
plot of Steve Martin's LA Story.  
Berkowitz optimistically hopes to find the perfect woman
within 20 dates.  Berkowitz has his own camera man and sound recorder
follow him on a series of dates, documenting his sometimes clumsy
journey through this minefield of modern dating rituals.  Of course,
the intrusive camera crew is not exactly conducive to creating
intimate moments, but it does make for some awkward and hilarious
experiences.  Not every one appreciates being the subject of
Berkowitz's film, and a succession of law suits and restraining orders
quickly follow.  Complications develop when he meets Elisabeth, a
sales clerk and interior decorating student.  A genuine relationship
develops between the pair, which is threatened by Berkowitz's need to
date other women in order to finish his film.
This mock documentary also takes a swipe at the Hollywood
studio system, as Myles desperately tries to remain true to his
project and not compromise his artistic vision.  He becomes involved
with a dodgy and volatile producer and financier who tries to convince
him to inject more sex into his film.  Noted lecturer and film
theorist Robert McKee also advises Myles to turn his film into the
ultimate classic love story, full of longing and romantic possibility.
Some moments work wonderfully in this occasionally hilarious
film, but other moments misfire badly.  Technically, the film is
cleverly assembled, as Berkowitz uses a variety of film stock and
formats to add to the rawness and documentary-like realism.  It is
sometimes easy to believe that 20 Dates is cinema verite at its best.
But the rigid structure of the film ultimately suggests that
Berkowitz's approach is somewhat less spontaneous and unscripted than
he would have us believe.
Berkowitz comes across as a poor man's, west coast Woody
Allen, albeit without the thoroughly cynical view on relationships,
the neurosis, or the snappy string of clever one-liners.  Michael
Moore (Roger And Me, etc) does this sort of smart arse, acerbic
documentary much better.  20 Dates works up to a point, but then the
whole artifice becomes a little tedious.  
** 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
THE INSIDER (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Michael Mann
Stars: Al Pacino, Russell Crowe, Christopher Plummer, Diane Venora,
Rhillip Baker Hall, Lindsay Crouse, Debi Mazar, Hallie Kate Eisenberg,
Stephen Tobolowsky, Colm Feore, Bruce McGill, Micahel Gambon, Gins
Gershon, Rip Torn, Lynne Thigpen, Michael Paul Chan, Linda Hart,
Robert Harper, Nestor Serrano, Pete Hamill, Wings Hauser, Clifford
Curtis, Breckin Meyer
Running time: 150 minutes. 
Director Michael Mann's first film since the brilliant Heat is
a wonderfully gripping and intelligent true life drama about the
scientist who blew the whistle on the tobacco companies for tv's 60
Minutes.
When he is unfairly dismissed from tobacco company Brown and
Williamson, scientist Jeffrey Wigand (Russell Crowe) eventually told a
60 Minutes news team that the tobacco companies had been lying for
years about the dangers of smoking.  But then the tobacco industry
began a massive smear campaign, dragging Wigand's life through the mud
in an effort to discredit him and his testimony.  When even CBS
eventually bowed to enormous legal pressure and failed to air the
damaging interview, veteran investigative reporter and 60 Minutes
producer Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino) fought back to protect Wigand and
the right of the public to know the truth.  It was a protracted and
heated dispute that shook up the landmark television news show and
tested old loyalties.
This is probably the best drama featuring journalists as
heroic characters and newsmakers, pursuing a momentous story, since
All The President's Men.  The Insider is suspenseful, riveting stuff,
but it also has a strong emotional punch.  With this searing look at
corporate America out of control, Mann is dealing with some weighty
and important themes - big business ethics, greed, corruption, heavy
moral dilemmas, journalistic integrity, freedom of the press.
Mann directs with a commendable sense of restraint.  Mann uses
a pseudo-documentary style, to give the film a sense of urgency, which
is highly effective at times.  But the hand held camera work becomes a
bit tiresome and there are a few scenes that could have been tightened
up in the editing room.  There are also a number of characters who
come and go without making much of an impact.
However, The Insider is driven by two powerhouse, Oscar-worthy
central performances.  Pacino is intense and believable as the dogged
and disenchanted Bergman, and delivers one of his best performances
for quite some time.  Heavily made up, Crowe delivers a stand out
performance as Wigand, who acts out of conscience and then helplessly
watches as his life and reputation are systematically destroyed.  He
brings a wonderfully nervous edge, quiet honesty and dignity to his
performance.
Women often get short shrift in Mann's overtly masculine
films, but Diane Venora (from Heat, etc) is impressive as Wigand's
long suffering wife.  And Christopher Plummer (who often has a
reputation for publicly slagging off at his films) is terrific as
veteran journalist Mike Wallace, bringing a pompous air but also an
intelligence to his role.
Unfortunately, The Insider wasn't a huge success in the US,
which may affect its chances at the Oscars.  However, this is a rare
example of Hollywood producing a gripping and intelligent drama that
is also relevant, and it should be put at the head of the list of must
see films of this year.

Title
Review for Loss of Sexual Innocence, The (1999)
THE LOSS OF SEXUAL INNOCENCE (R).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Mike Figgis
Stars: Julian Sands, Saffron Burrows, Stefano Dionisi, Kelly MacDonald, 
Gina McKee, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers, Bernard Hill, Rossy De Palma
Running time: 105 minutes.
Despite an intriguing sounding title, this is boring
pretentious twaddle of the highest order!
British director Mike Figgis alternates between high profile
Hollywood productions such as Mr Jones and Internal Affairs, etc, and
more personal projects.  This low budget film is something of an
experiment for Figgis, and seems clearly destined for the art house
crowd.
This supposedly semi-autobiographical film follows the life
story of documentary film maker Nic (Julian Sands), from his early
childhood through to the present day.  However, it unfolds in a series
of allusive montages, with a heavy emphasis on those encounters that
shaped his sexual outlook and personality.  A parallel subplot also
follows twin sisters (played by Saffron Burrows, from Deep Blue Sea,
etc), who are separated at birth and nearly meet again in an African
airport.
However, the film is virtually plotless and wordless, and
unfolds in a frustratingly non-linear fashion, offering up a
multi-media montage of dream sequences, flash backs and memories.
Figgis constantly switches between time frames and narrative threads
without any discernible rhyme or reason, which will frustrate and
confound most audiences.  To further confuse the tangled threads, the
film also intersperses the central narrative with a rather fanciful
modern day retelling of the story of Adam and Eve and their fall from
grace in the garden of Eden.
Neither Sands nor Burrows seem to understand the complexities
of Figgis' intricately constructed film, and this is reflected in
their lacklustre and uncertain performances.
The Loss Of Sexual Innocence is something of a labour of love
for Figgis, who has been developing this film since 1982.
Unfortunately, most audiences will not share the same passion.  Its
challenging structure and deliberately slow pace will leave most
audiences cold and unimpressed.  Benhoit Delhomme's cinematography is
at times quite beautiful, and creates some striking images.  However,
that is one of the few positive aspects of what is basically a
bewildering, obtuse, overly self- indulgent and ultimately dull
cinematic experience.

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
In the recent Species II, a highly decorated astronaut
returned to earth carrying a vicious, predatory alien creature intent
on destroying life on earth.  The Astronaut's Wife takes the same
concept, but explores it on a far more subtle and visceral level,
injecting the intriguing premise with a healthy dose of paranoia and
90's style cynicism.  This eerie, stylish but low key paranoid
thriller also adds a healthy dose of low key horror, reminiscent of
the classic Rosemary's Baby, although ultimately it fails to deliver.
During an unexpected accident in space, shuttle astronaut
Spencer Armacost (Johnny Depp) loses contact with earth for a couple
of minutes.  During that time something mysterious happens that leaves
him and his partner Alex Streck (Nick Cassavetes) in a coma.  When he
recovers Spencer somehow seems different.  The changes in his
personality are slight, but they are enough to unnerve his emotionally
fragile wife Jillian (Charlize Theron, from The Devil's Advocate and
Mighty Joe Young, etc).
When a tragedy befalls the Strecks, Spencer decides to leave
the space program to take up an executive position with an
aeronautical company developing a new high tech weapons system.  He
also leaves sunny Florida for the claustrophobic confines of new York,
a city he supposedly hates with a passion.  Jillian reluctantly
follows him, but becomes more and more spooked by his behaviour.  Then
Reese (Joe Morton), a disgraced former NASA employee, approaches her
with frantic messages and dire warnings that her husband may not be
the man she married.  Did something happen to him in space during
those lost two minutes?  Is she pregnant with an alien life form?
 
First time director Rand Ravich (whose previous credits
include the script for Candyman II: Farewell To The Flesh) doesn't
give easy answers to many of the questions raised by the plot, forcing
audiences to do some of the work in piecing together the details of
this challenging, unusual film.  Ravich develops a nicely ambiguous
mood, and we are not quite sure whether the unstable Jillian is
imagining things or not.
Ravich opts for creating an unsettling atmosphere here, and he
certainly gives us that in spades.  Much of the credit for the film's
cold and deliberately unsettling ambience and visual style goes to
veteran cinematographer Allen Daviau.  His unnerving use of close-ups
imbue inanimate objects with a very real sense of menace, and his very
mobile camera adds movement to otherwise static scenes.  The
impressive production design and the cold interior of the Armacost's
sterile apartment also enhance the film's mood.
The performances are also interesting, and underscore the
ambiguous tone.  Depp continues to find interesting roles outside the
mainstream of American cinema, although he gives a fairly one-
dimensional and uninspired performance here.  Although his understated
performance hints at madness, somehow he never seems as menacing or as
chilling as he should be.  This is actually Theron's film, as she is
in every scene and virtually every frame.  The camera loves her and
spends an inordinate amount of time ravishing her in close up.  This
unfortunately distracts from her performance, which is a mixture of
appealing vulnerability and strength.  Morton is also good as the
deeply disturbed Reese.
The Astronaut's Wife is an off beat, low key and down beat
sci-fi thriller that lacks the broad appeal, spectacular pyrotechnics
and visual effects of most big budget Hollywood blockbusters.

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
BLAST FROM THE PAST (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Hugh Wilson
Stars: Brendan Fraser, Alicia Silverstone, Dave Foley, Christopher 
Walken, Sissy Spacek, Jenifer Lewis
Running time: 112 minutes.
A 35 year old man, raised in a bomb shelter, emerges into the
real world, and experiences life on the outside for the first time.
Rather than the uncomfortable black humour of Bad Boy Bubby though,
Blast From The Past is a genial enough comedy about the clash of
cultures.  Essentially a one-joke film, Blast From The Past gets a
little nostalgic as it contrasts the innocence of the '60's with the
more cynical, selfish, and mercenary life style of the '90's.
During the height of the Cold War, Adam Webber's father Calvin
(Christopher Walken), a brilliant but paranoid scientist, built a
state of the art bomb shelter under the family home.  When the Cuban
Missile Crisis erupted in 1962, he took his heavily pregnant wife
(Sissy Spacek) underground to live for 35 years, hoping to wait out
nuclear poisoning.  Their son Adam (Brendan Fraser) has grown up in
the shelter, educated by his parents and shaped by their somewhat old
fashioned values.
Oblivious to the changes on the surface, the family prepares
to emerge from their shelter as the 20th century draws to a close.
Calvin journeys to the surface, but finds Los Angeles at night a hell
hole, full of transvestite prostitutes, destitute beggars, mutants,
scary street scapes, and, worst of all, dangerous adult book stores.
He decides to keep the family in the safety of their bomb shelter for
another decade.
Adam is chosen to go to the surface and bring back the
necessary supplies, but he becomes hopelessly lost in the sprawl of
Los Angeles.  Enter Eve (Alicia Silverstone) and her gay house mate
Troy (Dave Foley), who temporarily help Adam adjust to life in the
'90's.  Slowly, Eve finds herself attracted to Adam's old world
manners and unaffected innocence.
Direction from Hugh Wilson (Police Academy, The First Wives'
Club, etc) is at times pedestrian and laboured, and the script rarely
reaches any dizzy heights of originality.  The symbolism of the
characters' names is obvious.  Many of the film's prime targets are
also quite familiar, as this sort of idea has been done before, albeit
with more style and humour.
Fraser has played this sort of fish out of water role before
(Encino Man, etc), and his performance carries the film.  His fresh
faced charm and goof ball naiveté adds to the movie's appeal.
Foley gets most of the good lines, and his bitchy observations add to
the film's camp humour.  Silverstone pouts a lot and adds some sex
appeal, but her role is otherwise fairly shallow.  Walken tempers his
usual edgy persona, while Spacek is given little to do as Adam's
alcoholic mother.
Blast From The Past would normally have disappeared straight
to video, but Fraser's recent string of solid movie roles (The Mummy,
Gods And Monsters, etc) has ensured a brief cinematic run.

Title
Review for Erskineville Kings (1999)
After a two year absence largely spent cutting cane in
Australia's remote north, Barky (Marty Denniss) reluctantly returns
home for his father's funeral, and walks into an emotionally charged
encounter with his estranged older brother Wace (Hugh Jackman).  A
couple of years earlier, Barky fled their drunken, abusive father,
just as their mother had done a decade ago, leaving Wace alone to put
up with his drunken rages.  Wace also nursed their father after he
grew ill, and is full of rage, frustration and guilt.  Barky's return
offers a chance for some sort of reconciliation, but the bitter Wace
is not going to make it easy for his younger brother.  Their conflict
is played out amidst the familiar backdrop of their local pubs and
billiard halls.
Erskineville Kings is a potent and powerful examination of
mate ship and the relationship between brothers, and there is
something of a Cain and Abel feel to the drama.  Yet this brutally
honest and frank drama also depicts a vastly different view of the
tough, laconic and unforgiving Australian male than is normally
represented on the screen.
In a change of pace from the nice guy image he has projected
through his recent work in theatre and musical comedies, Jackman
delivers a blistering and intense performance that sears across the
screen.  This performance marks a return to Jackman's early roots on
tv dramas like Corelli, and should garner him plenty of attention come
the AFI nominations this year.  In a less showy role, Denniss brings a
hint of vulnerability to his performance as the prodigal son returning
home and discovering that much has changed during his absence.
Erskineville Kings is pretty much an ensemble piece, and the
supporting performances are also quite solid.
Denniss, who also wrote the screenplay under the pseudonym of
Anik Chooney, has developed the film from the short script he
originally wrote several years ago exploring the tense, strained
relationship between two brothers.  The early scenes add to the
tension of the final, emotion charged encounter between the two
brothers and the shocking revelations that shape their relationship.
The film's structure has a theatrical feel to it.  However,
director Alan White and cinematographer John Swaffield have opened up
the potentially claustrophobic drama by filming linking scenes on the
desolate streets of this decaying inner city industrial suburb.  These
gritty locations beautifully underscore the desperate humanity of the
action.  Some of these external scenes don't quite work - the scene in
Nick's garage is one example - and deflect from the film's emotional
core.  The assured visual style, a legacy of White's background as a
director of commercials, belies the film's ultra low budget.
          Erskineville Kings is not the best local film of the year
(Gregor Jordan's black comedy thriller wins that prize hands down),
but its raw emotional honesty, strong performances and powerful
insights make a wonderful tonic from the quirky Australian comedies
and tired rustic dramas that have long since worn out their welcome.

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
All of a sudden, movies like Good Will Hunting and Cube have
made mathematics and mathematical theory both exciting and sexy.
First time feature writer/director Darren Aronofsky uses complex
mathematical theories as the basis for the plot of Pi, his ambitious,
but off beat and unsettling low budget thriller.
Highly strung number theorist and computer whiz Max Cohen
(Sean Gullette) sees patterns everywhere in nature.  He is obsessed
with discovering a code that will crack open the secrets of the stock
market.  His holy grail is the 216 digit number that will supposedly
unlock the secrets of the universe.  Max refuses to heed his ailing
mentor (Mark Margolis), who warns him of the folly of pursuing his
quest.  Somehow his search brings him into contact with a shadowy Wall
Street firm that want to use his expertise, and some renegade Hassidic
Jews who want to unlock the centuries old key to their religion.  They
believe that Max's research will enable them to see the face of God.
Gullette, who shares a screen writing credit for the film, gives an
unnerving and edgy performance that captures the desperate and
disturbed air of this unusual protagonist.
Pi is not an action thriller, despite a chase sequence filmed
with the stop motion style of photography championed by Chris Doyle
and Hong Kong cinema.  Rather, this is a challenging and cerebral,
paranoid sci-fi fable for our times.  The film raises a number or
questions about our soulless contemporary society and its obsession
with technology.  Pi also deftly mixes complex mathematical concepts
with religion, but the film risks becoming inaccessible.  Aronofsky
seems to become too clever in exploring the film's intelligent yet
complex themes, and he does not hand out easy answers.  His
deliberately allusive structure and elusive images will potentially
alienate many within the audience.
          Much of the film takes place inside Max's cramped, over
crowded apartment, where he hides from the real world behind his
locked door.  This gives the film a claustrophobic feel.  The banks of
computer equipment that line his apartment also lend something of an
otherworldly feel to this environment.  Aronofsky also imbues the film
with an uneasy air of paranoia.  Matthew Libatique's cool, sparse
black and white cinematography evokes the look and feel of the film
noir of the 50's and '60's.

Title
Review for Meet Joe Black (1998)
The Grim Reaper comes to earth in the delectable form of Brad
Pitt in Martin (Scent Of A Woman) Brest's $90 million remake of the
1934 romantic comedy Death Takes A Holiday.  Pitt plays death, who
adapts a human form to learn more about what makes us mere mortals
tick.  He has ostensibly come to claim William Parrish (Anthony
Hopkins), a self-made millionaire, but decides to spend a week in his
company learning more about the human condition.  Parrish is the only
one aware of Pitt's true identity, and he introduces the enigmatic
stranger to his family as Joe Black.
It is the week of Parrish's 65th birthday, and his oldest
daughter Allison (Marcia Gay Harden, from Flubber, etc) is planning a
lavish party.  Parrish also has to deal with a take-over bid from a
business rival who wants to strip his global communication company and
sell off its assets.  He also has to deal with treachery from within
his own board.  Parrish has plenty of time to come to terms with his
own mortality and the legacy that he will leave behind.
Meanwhile, Joe falls heavily in love with Parrish's beautiful
young daughter Susan (Claire Forlani, Sean Connery's daughter in The
Rock, etc).  As with his character in the recent Seven Years In Tibet,
Pitt's human incarnation of Death undergoes a spiritual
transformation, as he comes to learn about love, loss and the pain of
being human.  Inevitably, some hard choices will have to be made, both
by Joe and Parrish.
Meet Joe Black explores some wonderful themes and ideas, and
the climax delivers a superb emotional payoff.  Unfortunately, it
takes far too long to get there.  Brest's deliberately languid
direction perfectly suits the occasionally sombre tone of the
material, but, at nearly three hours long, the pace tends to drag and
many in the audience will tire of the film.  The 1934 version told
much the same story in half the time.  With judicious trimming of some
unnecessary padding, Meet Joe Black would be tighter and far more
enjoyable.
However, the film does have its compensations.  It looks
fabulous, thanks to the opulent production design of Dante Ferretti, a
favourite of Scorsese, and the warm cinematography of Emmanuel
Lubezki.  There is also the usual strong performance from the
dependable Hopkins.  And Pitt and Forlani make a handsome, attractive
couple - eye candy for the younger generation.  The camera loves Pitt,
and seems to caress his blue eyes, his seductive smile and his air of
boyish innocence.  If only death always looked this good then we might
be more willing to go quietly into that dark night.
Meeting Joe Black is not such a bad experience, it just could
have been so much more enjoyable and memorable!

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
THE MASK OF ZORRO (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Martin Campbell
Stars: Anthony Hopkins, Antonio Bandera, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Stuart 
Wilson, Matt Letscher, Maury 
Chaykin, Tony Amendola, Pedro Armendariz, L Q Jones, William Marquez, 
Jose Perez, Victor Rivers
Running time: 137 minutes
Lacking new ideas, producers have always found inspiration in
the past, plundering classic movies and tv series.  But, more often
than not, these contemporary remakes fail to capture the spirit of the
original and largely fall short of expectations.  Not so The Mask Of
Zorro, which revives the legendary character first created in 1919 by
crime writer Johnston McCulley.
This lavishly staged big budget adventure also remains
faithful to the spirit and flavour of those Zorro movies of yesteryear
which starred Douglas Fairbanks and Tyrone Power as the masked avenger
who fought against Spanish tyranny in nineteenth century California.
The first major Zorro movie produced in Hollywood for over forty
years, The Mask Of Zorro is an entertaining and crowd pleasing romp.
There are plenty of sword fights and chases throughout this pacy film.
Unlike most modern action films, the violence is low key and
restrained.  This updated Zorro also contains enough tongue in cheek
moments and sly humour to keep audiences chuckling throughout.
Spanish actor Antonio Banderas steps into the title role, and
he captures the flamboyant swashbuckling spirit of the film perfectly.
The film begins in 1821.  Don Diego (Anthony Hopkins), the
nobleman who fights injustice as Zorro, finds himself arrested by his
nemesis, Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson, from Lethal Weapon 3,
etc).  The despotic governor of California has been ordered to return
to Spain, and takes a cruel revenge on Zorro for past humiliations.
Don Diego's wife is killed and Don Rafael takes his baby daughter
Elena away to raise as his own.  Zorro himself is imprisoned, and the
potential for rebellion is crushed.
Twenty years later, Don Rafael returns with a nefarious scheme
to purchase California from Mexico.  Don Diego manages to escape from
prison, but he is too old and tired to continue the fight.  He trains
Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas), an incompetent and hot headed thief, to
become his protégé and don the guise of Zorro.  Once again the
legendary Zorro rides out to vanquish the enemy and offer the people
hope.
Brit Martin Campbell (who also directed Goldeneye, the best
Bond movie in two decades) is perfectly suited to the demands of the
action genre.  He maintains a rapid pace throughout, and the numerous
action scenes are superbly handled.  The sword duels are terrific
stuff, and staged with gusto.
Hopkins seems to be enjoying himself immensely in this rare
action outing, and he brings a touch of authority to his role as the
older Zorro.  He also manages to bring some emotional depth to his
performance that makes his tragic sorrow and personal vendetta
credible.
 His sword fight trainer, Bob 
Anderson, also worked with Erroll Flynn on The Master Of Ballantrae 
forty-five years ago.  
Banderas is perfectly cast as Zorro, and brings flair and a
swarthy sexuality and physical presence to the role.  In her first
major role, Zeta-Jones exudes a raw sexuality as the feisty Elena,
although her performance occasionally smacks of a contemporary
flavour.  Zeta-Jones and Banderas establish a wonderful chemistry, and
their scenes together positively smoulder and sparkle.
This modern remake of Zorro is cracking good fun, and
enormously entertaining.  One suspects that Fairbanks, Power, and even
tv's famous Zorro Guy Williams, would have approved wholeheartedly!

Title
Review for Cut (2000)
Scream meets The Blair Witch Project?  
The first film from Michael Gudinski's newly formed Mushroom
Pictures, Cut is a lightweight and terribly cheesy Australian attempt
to produce a slick horror/comedy in the same vein as Scream.  It works
beautifully - up to a point!
A group of film students attempt to complete work on Hot
Blooded, a notorious horror film that was never finished after the
original director was murdered twelve years earlier.  Previous
attempts to complete this seemingly cursed horror masterpiece have
been quickly abandoned when key players have been brutally murdered.
Undeterred by the film's reputation, an eager young aspiring director
(Jessica Napier, from Black Rock, etc) assembles her small crew and
sets out to complete the film.  She even lures the original star
(Molly Ringwald) to return to Australia to reprise her role and face
up to her fears.  But once again a mysterious masked psycho begins his
bloody work, butchering the attractive young cast and crew in
spectacular and sometimes comical fashion.
Although not as cinema literate nor as clever as Scream and
its ilk, Cut is an enjoyable enough parody of the teen slasher genre,
and features plenty of grisly deaths.  Admittedly, Cut is derivative
and formulaic stuff, but it does have a healthy sense of irreverence
that allows it to poke fun at its familiar clichés.  The influence
of everything from Halloween through to more recent slasher flicks is
obvious in the staging of the film.
First time director Kimble Rendall (from The Hoodoo Gurus)
maintains a reasonably fast pace throughout, and lays on the gore
pretty thickly.  However, the dialogue is quite trite, and some of the
performances leave a lot to be desired.  There are also some appalling
continuity gaffes - in one scene a woman is impaled, face down, on a
garden tap, but in the very next scene she is seen lying face up!
The casting of Ringwald, '80's cinema icon and veteran of John
Hughes' teen comedies, as a has-been starlet anxious to resurrect her
stalled career, should have provided first time script writer Dave
Warner (from '80's band The Suburbs) with plenty of clever in-jokes,
but he has let the opportunity pass.  Kylie Minogue plays a small
cameo in the film, but, like Drew Barrymore in the original Scream, is
despatched within the first ten minutes.
On the positive side, Cut has gone into profit already, even
before it has been released, purely on the strength of overseas
pre-sales.  While this may not mean much to the average film goer, it
at least ensures that Mushroom Pictures will continue to produce
entertaining and unashamedly commercial films for some time yet.  God
knows, the local industry needs more purely entertaining films like
this rather than the sort of pretentious, well made and earnest art
house fare that is critically acclaimed but shunned by paying
audiences.

Title
Review for Earth (1998)
The second film in Indian director Deepa Mehta's elements
trilogy, the powerful drama Earth follows her widely acclaimed Fire.
Based on Bapsi Sidhwa's semi-autobiographical novel Cracking India,
this powerful drama is set against the background of the partition of
India in 1947, when 250 years of British rule was cast aside amid
terrible bloodshed.  Long-standing friendships were also cast aside.
Brutal atrocities, inspired by fanatics on either side of the
religious divide, were committed.
The film largely unfolds from the perspective of eleven year
old Lenny (newcomer Maia Sethna), crippled with childhood polio and
raised in Lahore by her affluent, supposedly neutral parents.  Lenny
nonetheless watches as her family is gradually affected by the British
decision to pull out of India, and her friends are destroyed by the
spreading tide of senseless violence and religious hatred.  Lenny's
nanny is Shanta (Nandita Das), a beautiful young Hindu woman who moves
easily amongst her friends of different religious persuasions.
Earth initially unfolds at a leisurely pace, although the
tension surrounding the upcoming partition is palpable in the
conversations in the marketplace and in Lenny's home.  Earth is a
story of innocence lost, but it's also a story of sweeping political
and historical significance.  Its powerful themes of religious
intolerance and senseless violence are still quite relevant today,
especially given recent events in central Europe.
Earth is a powerful enough drama as it is, but the always
controversial Mehta also manages to work in a love affair between a
Hindu and a Muslim which further inflames the tension of this
tumultuous time, and leads to the film's devastating climax.  Given
the subject matter, Mehta directs with remarkable restraint, which
makes some of the atrocities even more horrible.
However, Mehta also beautifully captures the colour, the
passion, the music and rich culture of India that was partially
destroyed.  Giles Nuttgens' cinematography is rich and beautiful,
while A R Rahman's evocative and haunting music further enriches the
film.
Indian cinema normally comprises largely of vapid musicals and
banal comedies, and hard hitting and politically sensitive dramas such
as Earth are indeed rare.

Title
Review for Simply Irresistible (1999)
SIMPLY IRRESISTIBLE (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Mark Tarlov
Stars: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Sean Patrick Flanery, Patricia Clarkson, 
Dylan Baker, Christopher Durang, 
Betty Buckley, Christopher Durang, Larry Gilliard jr
Running time: 96 minutes.
I've seen three romantic comedies in the space of as many
days, and Simply Irresistible is easily the best of the lot.  It is
charming, magical, enjoyable and, yes, irresistible.
It's a bad week for Amanda (Sarah Michelle Gellar, from Buffy,
and the recent teen drama Cruel Intentions, etc).  The family
restaurant is being forced to close after seventy years, because it
cannot pay its bills.  But thanks to some timely intervention from a
mysterious stranger and a magical crab (don't ask!), Amanda's fortunes
take a turn for the better.  Suddenly, her emotions are somehow
captured in her cooking, and the restaurant becomes successful again.
Her culinary treats also begin to work their magic on everyone
else.  Amanda catches the eye of the handsome Tom Bartlett (Sean
Patrick Flanery, from the Young Indiana Jones series, etc), an
executive at a famous department store which is on the verge of
opening its own exclusive restaurant.  Tom is an inveterate womaniser
who always breaks up his relationships after the fourth date.  He
chooses Amanda's restaurant as the scene of his latest public split
from his current girl friend.  The gastronomic magic somehow brings
Tom and Amanda together, although he wastes far too much time trying
to analyse events rather than just going with the flow.
Meanwhile, Amanda's tasty treats also manufacture a passionate
romance between Tom's secretary (Patricia Clarkson, from High Art,
etc) and the store's humourless owner (Dylan Baker, from Happiness,
etc).
The central plot heavily borrows from the wonderful Mexican
film Like Water For Chocolate (1992), in which a woman imbued her
cooking with her emotions, but first time writer Judith Roberts adds
her own winning ingredients to the mix.  The result is a charming,
mischievous, sexy, witty and simply irresistible comedy that should
work its magic on audiences.  Mark Tarlov, a producer whose diverse
credits include Christine to Serial Mom, makes his directorial debut
here.  He keeps things moving along at a jaunty pace that suits the
material.
The likeable cast deliver delightful performances.  In
particular, Gellar and Flanery strike sparks, and their obvious
chemistry lifts this light weight soufflé.
Audiences who love this sort of thing should immerse
themselves in this thoroughly enjoyable concoction.  If you go along
with the film's delightfully off beat premise and don't question where
the magic is coming from, then Simply Irresistible works a treat.

Title
Review for Pecker (1998)
PECKER (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: John Waters
Stars: Edward Furlong, Christina Ricci, Martha Plimpton, Brendon
Sexton III, Mary Kay Place, Mark Joy, Lili Taylor, Patricia Hearst,
Bess Armstrong, Mink Stole, Jean Schertler, Lauren Hulsey
Running time: 87 minutes.
Over the past decade, John Waters seems to have adopted a more
mainstream ethos with his decidedly off beat comedies that satirise
certain elements of contemporary culture (Hairspray, Cry Baby and
Serial Mom).  However, Baltimore's most notorious cult film maker has
still not lost his flair for tasteless and tacky observations about
human nature.  Those more familiar with Waters' past work will
probably not be surprised that the director seems to have mellowed
with age and experience.  Nor will they be overly surprised at the
almost uncharacteristic restraint shown in Pecker.  Although Pecker is
nowhere near as outrageous as his earlier films (Pink Flamingos, etc),
there are still many moments in this clever and quite funny film that
will shock or upset some elements within the audience.
One of Waters' better and more accessible films, Pecker is a
dry, witty and deliciously off beat take on the nature of celebrity,
which often comes at a high price.  This is territory that has been
explored recently by Woody Allen (Celebrity) and Ron Howard (Edtv),
but Waters gives us his own idiosyncratic take on the issue. The film
also pricks the pretensions of the sycophantic art world and New York
(although sometimes the two are synonymous).  Waters also takes a
gentle swipe at the narrow minded attitudes and hypocrisy of the
working class in insular, small town America.
Pecker primarily traces the loss of innocence of its eponymous
hero, played with a wonderful combination of appeal and naiveté by
T2's Edward Furlong.  Eighteen year old Pecker is an amateur
photographer who snaps candid shots of the residents of his hometown
of Hampden.  When he arranges a small exhibition inside the sandwich
shop where he works, Pecker's life changes.  He is discovered by Rorey
(Lily Taylor, from I Shot Andy Warhol, etc), a voracious New York
dealer who quickly transforms him into the next big thing in the art
world.
But as fame and potential fortune are Pecker's for the taking,
he finds that the unwelcome spotlight of media attention also falls on
his culturally challenged family as well as his friends.  His
girlfriend Shelley (beautifully played by teen indy queen Christina
Ricci, in a role originally intended for Ricki Lake), who officiously
runs the town's laundromat, finds herself alienated from Pecker and
his sudden fame.  His kleptomaniac best friend Matt (played with
enthusiasm by Brendon Sexton III, from Hurricane Streets, etc) also
finds his lifestyle altered as he is unable to enter those stores
where he practised his "five fingered discounts."
Even the townsfolk of Hampden turn on the gay subculture and
the sleazier elements that they had reluctantly tolerated for years,
until they were thrust into the public spotlight through Pecker's
pictures.  Pecker is faced with the choice of pursuing his art at all
costs or returning to the unassuming small town amateur he once was.
Waters traces Pecker's getting of wisdom with a raunchy humour
and a real affection for the character.  He obviously identifies
strongly with Pecker, and Furlong's sympathetic portrayal also endears
him to the audience.  The ensemble cast all deliver solid performances
and bring to life Waters' wonderfully colourful gallery of eccentric
characters.

Title
Review for Knock Off (1998)
Like the recent Chinese Box, most of the action in Knock Off
takes place against the background of the hand-over of Hong Kong to
China after a century of British rule.  However, the lack of immediacy
here doesn't seem to matter too much with this tired, unconvincing and
rudimentary plot.  Rather than a poignant love story set against a
backdrop of the clash between cultures, Knock Offis a mindless and
unconvincing B-grade spy thriller that offers fading action star Jean
Claude Van Damme one final opportunity to salvage his career from the
scrap heap.
Van Damme's status as an action hero reached its pinnacle with
Time Copand the Die Hardclone Sudden Death.  Since then it's been
largely downhill, with a series of increasingly dull, mindless and
gratuitously violent action films.  The muscles from Brussels has
placed his career in the hands of a number of influential Hong Kong
action directors (John Woo, Ringo Lam, and Tsui Hark, but they have
been unable to reverse his declining box office fortunes.
In Knock Off, Van Damme plays Marcus Ray, an exporter and
wholesaler for an American jeans company, based in Hong Kong.  He and
his partner Tommy (Rob Schneider, from Judge Dredd, etc) accidentally
find themselves mixed up in a terrorist scheme to smuggle small but
very lethal bombs into the US.  Sinister forces are planting the
bombs, which burst into green flame, inside toys, clothes and other
consumer goods and shipping them to America.  Ray finds himself up
against the CIA, the Triads and the Hong Kong police as he tries to
unravel the complicated international plot.
This below par effort has been written by Steven E De Souza,
who has previously written some of Hollywood's best action thrillers
of the past decade - Die Hard, and Die Hard 2, etc.  There's plenty of
action scenes, but the film is undermined by Tsui Hark's cold,
clinical choreography and visual flourishes.  Hark, who previously
directed our hero in the ludicrous Double Team, brings his own
distinctive style to the film.  He uses close-ups, a constantly moving
camera, and lots of unusual angles to bring an illusion of kinetic
energy to the material.  Unfortunately, his unnecessarily flamboyant
visual style somehow removes any genuine sense of excitement and
suspense.
Van Damme's performance is more wooden and unconvincing than
ever, and he seems uncomfortable with the more comic elements of the
script.  Even Schneider's desperate attempts to breathe some humour
into proceedings with a series of throw away one liners fall flat.
Knock Offis a disappointing and muddled actioner that marks a
new low in Van Damme's declining career.  At this rate, Van Damme will
join the ranks of those other faded action stars whose films now
regularly disappear straight on to video (Dolph Lundgren, Rutger
Hauer, etc).

Title
Review for Terra Nova (1998)
TERRA NOVA (R).  
(Dendy)
Director: Paul Middleditch
Stars: Jeanette Cronin, Paul Kelman, Angela Punch McGregor, Trent 
Atkinson, Teo Gebert, Ritchie Singer, Vince Jones, Gillian Jones
Running time: 87 minutes.
An unrelentingly grim, bleak and depressing film, Terra Nova
is almost the cinematic equivalent of listening to an album of Leonard
Cohen's most mournful songs.  New Zealand born director Paul
Middleditch makes his feature debut with this confronting and down
beat story of a disturbed young mother attempting to overcome enormous
odds and strike out on her own.
Following a bout of post natal depression, Ruth (Jeanette
Cronin, who had small roles in Black Rock and Dark City, etc) has been
confined to a psychiatric institution by her domineering parents.  One
night she surreptitiously returns to her parents' house to take her
four year old daughter Tuesday away with her.  Arriving in Australia,
Ruth finds a temporary haven at Terra Nova, a dilapidated beach side
boarding house run by the sympathetic Margie (Angela Punch McGregor,
in the role for which she was nominated for an AFI award in 1998).
However, the creaky old house and its small contingent of
hopeless and destitute residents is no real place in which to raise a
young daughter.  Reluctantly, Ruth leaves Tuesday in the care of Dud
(Trent Atkinson), a sensitive teenage artist, who shares a room with
his older brother Simon (Paul Kelman, a veteran of several local tv
series).  Simon is also sleeping with Margie in lieu of paying rent.
On the first day, while Ruth is out looking for work, her flat is
burgled by Warren (Teo Gumbert, from The Boys, etc), the schizophrenic
neo-Nazi.  Simon leaps to her defence and batters Warren senseless.
When he also begins an affair with Ruth, the tensions in the boarding
house increase.
 Eventually some harsh truths 
about the residents and their pasts are revealed.  
This is a cold, unsettling and alienating film.  Middleditch's
insights into his characters are rather naive, and their complex
relationships don't always ring true.  He doesn't allow the audience
an opportunity to make any sort of identification or emotional
connection with the characters and their plight.  Cronin struggles to
make the enigmatic Ruth a sympathetic heroine, while Kelman brings a
volatile edge to his performance.  McGregor dominates the film with a
superb performance that perfectly captures Margie's air of weariness.
Terra Nova is not a film that audiences will embrace with any
sort of warmth or enthusiasm.  The film deals with themes of loss,
loneliness, failure, and is suffused with an air of despair and
desperation.  A motif of water continually runs throughout the film,
although the imagery is often allusive and bewildering.  Terra Nova is
also terribly dull and painfully slow moving.  The film is primarily
shot in cold grey colours, which adds to the oppressive and
claustrophobic atmosphere.  Nonetheless, cinematographer Simon Arnold
creates some powerful and evocative imagery along the way.
In some ways, Terra Nova invites comparisons to the recent
Praise, another local production also set in a decrepit boarding
house.  Whereas John Curran imbued that film with a streak of optimism
and albeit black humour, here Middleditch offers little relief along
the way.
When Ruth finally gathers the courage to leave this bleak
house it is far too late, as most of the audience will have despaired
of a happy ending long ago.

Title
Review for Playing by Heart (1998)
PLAYING BY HEART (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Willard Carroll
Stars: Gillian Anderson, Ellen Burstyn, Sean Connery, Anthony Edwards, 
Angelina Jolie, Jay Mohr, Ryan Phillippe, Dennis Quaid, Gena Rowlands,
Jon Stewart, Madeleine Stowe, Patricia Clarkson
Running time: 121 minutes.
"Talking about love is like dancing about architecture," says
one of the characters of this enjoyable romantic comedy.  This remark
captures the elusive nature of love, and is the driving force behind
this wonderful comedy/drama from writer/director Willard Carroll (the
little seen Tom's Midnight Garden, The Runestone).  In love there are
few rules, and it's probably better to trust the heart rather than the
head.
Playing By Heart follows several characters as they blunder
their way through life, looking for love and happiness in modern day
Los Angeles.  Some of the couples are re-exploring and testing the
boundaries of long term relationships, while others, who have been
hurt and scarred by previous unhappy experiences, are tentatively
entering new relationships.
Married couple Hannah (Gena Rowlands) and Paul (Sean Connery)
are having their differences over a past infidelity which painfully
resurfaces.  Somehow this brings them closer together and reaffirms
the love they have shared for the past forty years.  Mildred (Ellen
Burstyn) is reunited with her estranged son Mark (Jay Mohr), who is
dying of AIDS.  Theatre director Meredith (X Files' Gillian Anderson)
has been burned too often in previous relationships and is unsure of
how to handle the attention of handsome architect Trent (Jon Stewart).
Bored housewife Gracie (Madeleine Stowe) finds her affair with Roger
(ER's Anthony Edwards) is losing its attraction and decides to end it.
Compulsive liar Hugh (Dennis Quaid) does the rounds of singles bars
and night clubs, approaching numerous women with fascinating and heart
breaking stories.  Joan (Angelina Jolie, recently seen in Pushing Tin)
is attracted to the solitary and distant Keenan (Ryan Phillippe), whom
she meets in a disco while on the rebound from a previous
relationship.
The film's structure resembles that of maverick director
Robert Altman (Nashville, Short Cuts, etc), as the various characters
and disparate narrative threads are eventually brought together in
surprising but rewarding fashion.  Carroll's assured direction guides
the film as it weaves its way through the various strands, balancing
heartbreak and pain with joy and optimism.  Some of the story threads
work better than others, which ultimately gives the film a slightly
unbalanced feel.  The most satisfactory and involving story centres on
Joan and Keenan, and has an aching quality and an emotional honesty.
Despite some cliched treatment, the Meredith and Trent story line also
works well.
The writing is strong, intelligent and insightful, and Carroll
provides his players with some wonderfully witty lines.  In his most
ambitious film to date, Carroll has assembled a superb ensemble cast
to bring the characters to life.  Connery plays a role closer to his
own age for a change and gives a gruff but surprisingly touching and
comic performance.  Anderson brings touching vulnerability and pain to
her solid performance.  Jolie brings plenty of spark, spunk and sex
appeal to her flamboyant performance.
Most of the film takes place at night, but, as the characters
overcome their fears and reservations, Carroll moves the action into
the brightness of day, which somehow adds warmth.  Playing By Heart is
an affecting and touching evocation of the power of love, and seems
remarkably devoid of the usual cynicism.  It will make the heart thump
a bit faster, the spirits soar, and, yes, for the more romantic and
sentimental among us, the tear ducts well.

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
END OF DAYS (M).  
(Beacon/Village Roadshow)
Director: Peter Hyams
Stars: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollack, 
Rod Steiger, CCH Pounder, Derrick O'Connor, Miriam Margolyes,
Mark Margolis, Udo Kier
Running time: 120 minutes.
After a two year hiatus from the screen, a period that
included heart surgery, Arnold Schwarzenegger is back to prove that he
is still the main man when it comes to big budget action films.
Guiding him through his paces in his return to the screen is Peter
Hyams (Capricorn One, etc), who gave fallen action star Jean-Claude
Van Damme two of his best films in Time Cop and the Die Hard clone
Sudden Death.  Thankfully, End Of Days is Schwarzenegger's best action
flick since True Lies.
Best described as The Omen meets The Terminator, End Of Days
is the first major mainstream film to tap into the paranoia and fear
surrounding the end of the millennium and the uncertainty surrounding
what the brave new world will bring.  Written by Andrew Marlowe (Air
Force One, etc) the film deftly mixes Biblical prophecies about doom
and the end of the world with pyrotechnics and spectacular action
sequences.
Here Arnie tackles no less a villain than Satan himself.  In
the form of Gabriel Byrne, the devil has come to New York to wreak
havoc according to an ancient prophecy from the Book Of Revelations.
He has to consummate his relationship with the virginal Christine
(Robin Tunney, from The Craft, etc) in the hour before midnight to
consolidate his power in this world.  Christine has been specially
protected by guardians since her birth to ensure she is kept pure for
Satan's inevitable arrival.
Arnie plays Jericho Cane (a suitably Biblical name for a
flawed hero), a former cop now working as a body guard for a high tech
protection firm.  He becomes involved in trying to protect Christine,
not only from the devil himself, but from a hit squad of Vatican
sanctioned assassin priests, who want her removed for obvious reasons.
Arnie is back to doing what he does best, carrying high power
weaponry, destroying half a city and killing half the population of a
major city to perform his duty.  However, his seemingly invulnerable
character here has a little more depth than we normally expect from
the one dimensional Schwarzenegger, although his act of sacrificing
himself to save mankind reeks of the end of Terminator 2.
Kevin Pollack does his familiar schtick as the wise cracking
off sider, and brings some humour to proceedings.  Byrne (who hits for
the good guys in the forthcoming spooky religious thriller Stigmata)
does a wonderfully malevolent job as the devil in human form.  Rod
Steiger (who was originally slated for the Byrne role) contributes a
smaller role as a priest who urges our hero to have faith.
End Of Days may lack a little in the logic department, but it
certainly makes up for these failings with some spectacularly staged
action sequences and great special effects.  Hyams, who also doubles
as cinematographer, handles the action with his usual efficiency, and
he doesn't let either his star or his audience down.

Title
Review for My Name Is Joe (1998)
For over two decades Ken Loach has explored Britain's working
class with a brutal honesty, gritty realism, earthy humour and sense
of compassion that most other directors can only aspire to.  After
tackling more international concerns with his previous films (Land And
Freedom was set during the Spanish Civil War and Carla's Song was set
against the background of war torn Central America), Loach returns to
familiar territory with his brilliant new film.
Written by regular collaborator Paul Laverty, My Name Is Joe
is a touchingly honest portrait of life in the residential tenements
of Glascow's depressed industrial suburbs.  At its heart, My Name Is
Joe is an aching and touching love story, and this seems to
temporarily temper Loach's usually bleak and pessimistic outlook.  The
lighter, romantic touches and winning humour make this a far less
depressing effort than earlier Loach films, and it initially seems to
have more in common with Riff Raff than Ladybird, Ladybird.
In the role that won his a Best Actor Award at Cannes last
year, Peter Mullan gives a blistering but naturalistic performance in
the central role of Joe, a former alcoholic struggling to get his life
under control.  Rehabilitated through sessions at AA, Joe has been
sober for ten months.  He also supplements his regular dole payments
through odd jobs around the neighbourhood and by helping out the local
youth soccer club.  It is through his involvement with the soccer club
that he meets Liam (David McKay), a former drug addict with a young
family.  Joe inspires Liam to stay on the straight and narrow,
although it is sometimes a hard task.
Through Liam and his partner Sabine (Annemarie Kennedy), Joe
also meets Sarah (Louise Goodall), a social worker who is also trying
to help the pair.  Romance slowly blossoms between the two, despite
the baggage that Joe brings to the relationship.  But when Liam falls
back into his old habits, Joe becomes involved with the gangs that
rule the Glascow streets, with tragic consequences.  The latter part
of the film is slightly melodramatic in nature, but it also makes for
some powerful drama.  The climax is painfully brutal and harrowing.
Although set against a depressing background of poverty and despair,
My Name Is Joe also resonates with an inspiring sense of humanity and
compassion.  The Glaswegian accents are so thick that My Name Is Joe
carries subtitles, enabling audiences to easily get into the rhythm
and flow of the film.
My Name Is Joe is a powerful and memorable return to form for
Loach, and one of the year's most satisfying and unforgettable films.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
THE BONE COLLECTOR (M).  
(Universal/Columbia Tristar)
Director: Phillip Noyce
Stars: Denzel Washington, Angelina Jolie, Ed O'Neill, Queen Latifah, Mike 
McGlone, Michael Rooker, 
Luiz Guzman, Leland Orser, John Benjamin Hickey, Bobby Cannavale
Running time: 118 minutes.
There is something inherently fascinating about serial killers
and exploring the pathology behind these psychopaths that continues to
intrigue writers and film makers, and, ultimately, audiences.  Seven
and Silence Of The Lambs are probably the pinnacle of this genre.
Based on the novel by Jeffrey Deaver, a best selling author who
specialises in thrillers about psychotic killers and forensic
evidence, The Bone Collector is a solid and generally well made
thriller that follows in their footsteps.
Although not quite in the same league, The Bone Collector
still crams in enough creepy moments and shocks to satisfy fans of
this sort of stuff.  If nothing else, it may scare you away from
catching a taxi late at night!  However, the film is ultimately let
down by a rather disappointing conclusion.
The opening credit sequence immediately recalls Seven, while
it also effectively establishes the back-story in much the same
fashion employed by Aussie director Jon Hewitt in the recent Redball.
With a deliberate nod in the direction of Rear Window, the
film introduces us to an unusual hero in Lincoln Rhyme (Denzel
Washington), a once brilliant forensic investigator left a bed-ridden
quadriplegic.  Much of the novel dealt with Rhyme's depressed nature
and his suicidal tendencies, but the film version moves away from this
psychologically darker territory.  Although physically infirm, Rhyme
is asked by a former colleague (Ed O'Neill) to put his skills to use
in tracking down a vicious new serial killer.  This mysterious killer
prowls New York in a taxi cab, executes his victims in rather gruesome
fashion, and leaves the scene littered with clues that point towards
his next crime.
A crucial element of Rhyme's investigative team is Amelia
Donaghy (Angelina Jolie, recently seen in Pushing Tin, etc), a rookie
cop who demonstrates a flair for forensic science.  She becomes his
eyes, ears and legs, gathering evidence which he interprets with the
help of some state of the art equipment in his apartment.  This
unusual pair race against time to uncover the identity of the killer
as the body count and the tension slowly mounts.
Ex-patriate director Phillip Noyce makes great mainstream
Hollywood action films (Clear And Present Danger, Patriot Games, etc),
and he handles this formulaic thriller competently enough.  In true
Hitchcock fashion, he throws in a few clever, but contrived, red
herrings and some artful pieces of misdirection, particularly as the
film nears its climax.  Like David Fincher in Seven, Noyce
deliberately downplays some of the more graphic moments.  But he shows
us just enough of the sadistic killer's handiwork to let our
imaginations switch to overdrive, which adds to the gritty suspense.
Much of the film takes place in claustrophobic settings, dirty
subterranean tunnels and long abandoned, decrepit buildings, and Dean
Semler's suitably dark and gloomy perfectly matches the mood of this
chilling thriller.
The role of Rhyme is seemingly tailor made for former Superman
star Christopher Reeve, but that is a piece of (type?)casting that is
too obvious, even for Hollywood.  To his credit, Noyce has gone for
something less predictable.  Washington brings plenty of dignity and
charisma to a role that is physically challenging because of its very
nature.  Jolie (actor Jon Voight's daughter) has an intelligent, sexy,
engaging and appealing screen presence, and her performance here
confirms her status as a star of the future.  The gradually developing
relationship between the pair brings an understated air of sexual
tension to proceedings, and the rapport that develops between the pair
cries out for a sequel.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
In this mildly diverting thriller, a group of troublesome
teens are tamed through brainwashing techniques developed by Cradle
Bay High School psychiatrist Dr Caldicott (Bruce Greenwood, from The
Sweet Hereafter, etc).  He has created a group of well behaved,
diligent students, known as the Blue Ribbons, who pursue excellence
both at school and within the community.  However, there is a fatal
flaw in his technique.  Every time one of these seemingly perfect
adolescents develops sexual urges, they go ballistic, erupting into
erratic and violent behaviour.  The town's sheriff covers up most of
the damage, while Caldicott soothes anxious parents with lots of
psycho-babble.
Steve Clark (James Marsden, from the mini-series Bella Mafia,
etc), the new kid in town, becomes suspicious of their unnervingly
docile behaviour and sets out to expose Caldicott's sinister
experiment.  He receives help from some fellow misfits, including the
paranoid geek Gavin Strick (Nick Stahl), the pigmentally challenged UV
(Chad E Donella), and the tomboyish Rachel (Katie Holmes, from the
popular tv soap Dawson's Creek).
Disturbing Behaviour's simple plot reads like an adolescent
version of Ira Levin's 70's thriller The Stepford Wives, with
judicious borrowings from other, far superior films (A Clockwork
Orange, Village Of the Damned, etc) thrown in for good measure.
Actually, it also reads like something from a novel by John Saul, a
best selling American horror writer whose unsettling, but formulaic,
thrillers are set in small, picturesque towns like Cradle Bay, and
primarily deal with troubled teens threatened by strange and sinister
events.
Screen writer Scott Rosenberg (Beautiful Girls and Things To
Do In Denver When You're Dead, etc) makes little attempt to disguise
his influences, but he lacks the flair and reverential, knowing style
that gun writer Kevin Williamson would have brought to the material.
The film obliquely raises the question of which is the more disturbing
behaviour - that of the teens, rebelling against authority and
struggling to establish their own identity, or the sinister
machinations of Caldicott to produce mindless robots, lacking any
sense of individuality, who systematically conform to an imposed code
of discipline?
First time feature director David Nutter hails from a
background on spooky tv series (The X Files, Millennium, etc), but he
fails to bring much tension or sense of unease to this film.  Nutter
brings virtually every cliché of the genre into play here, and the
film displays precious little originality or imagination, even down to
the soundtrack.  Even the obligatory sting in the tale reeks of
desperation, and lacks credibility.  The contemporary teen horror film
genre, which largely began with Scream, seems to have run its course
if this inferior, feeble effort is any indication.
The film will hold a modicum of appeal for its targeted
teenage audience, most of whom will be drawn by the presence of
Holmes.  Disturbing Behaviour features a cast of hunky new comers, who
work well within the limitations of a horribly clichéd script.
However, performances are not of great importance here.  Worst of all
is William Sadler (Die Hard 2, etc), whose horribly cheesy performance
as the school's janitor, who is not quite as simple as he seems, is
reminiscent of Billy Bob Thornton.
Disturbing Behaviour is mercifully brief, and, at a brisk 83
minutes, doesn't outstay its welcome.  Nonetheless, audiences would be
better off waiting for the far superior and more sophisticated teen
drama Cruel Intentions.  Catch this one on video if you must!
   
**
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
THE THOMAS CROWN AFFAIR (M).  
(MGM/UIP)
Director: John McTiernan
Stars: Pierce Brosnan, Rene Russo, Denis Leary, Frankie Faison, Faye 
Dunaway, Ben Gazzara, Fritz Weaver, Charles Keating, Mark Margolis,
Michael Lombard
Running time: 114 minutes.
This stylish, sexy remake of The Thomas Crown Affair is
something of a pet project for star Pierce Brosnan, who also produced
the film.  The 1968 original was a largely unremarkable movie, made
more memorable by the suave and cool Steve McQueen at his charismatic
best, and director Norman Jewison's then revolutionary use of
split-screen techniques during a climactic heist scene.  This slick
caper thriller is a fairly conventional film from director John
McTiernan (the original Die Hard, Predator, etc), who has previously
displayed an affinity for cinematic pyrotechnics and spectacular
action sequences.  McTiernan retains enough familiar elements to
satisfy older audiences who remember the original, while cleverly
updating the story for the more cynical and technologically advanced
'90's.
There are some sly nods to the original, especially through
the token presence of Faye Dunaway, wasted in a largely irrelevant
role as Crown's psychiatrist, and a bland reprise of the Oscar winning
song Windmills Of My Mind.  However, McTiernan suffuses this new
version with enough new touches to make it seem fresh for audiences
unfamiliar with the original.
In between Bond assignments, Brosnan comfortably steps into
McQueen's shoes as Thomas Crown, the rich but bored millionaire who
steals for kicks.  In the 1968 original, Crown robbed banks, but here
he steals paintings.  When a priceless Monet is lifted from an art
gallery during an elaborately staged but bungled robbery, beautiful
and resourceful female insurance investigator Catherine Banning (Rene
Russo in the Faye Dunaway role) suspects Crown.  She doggedly pursues
Crown and gets up close and personal with him in the hopes of trapping
him.  The intriguing cat and mouse game between Crown and Banning adds
to the suspense of the film.
McTiernan and script writers Leslie Dixon (Outrageous Fortune,
etc) and Kurt Wimmer stick to the tried and true formula of similar
thrillers (To Catch A Thief, the recent Entrapment, etc), placing the
tempestuous relationship between the two protagonists at the centre of
the film.  This new version of The Thomas Crown Affair has a more
sentimental outlook than the original.
The film also has a deliberately raunchy edge, with generous
dollops of sex and nudity.  There is an obvious sexual chemistry
between the two stars, and McTiernan is clever enough to exploit this
to enhance a plot that otherwise looks rather tired and formulaic.
The two stars definitely prove that there is life after forty!
Reunited with his Nomads director, Brosnan brings charm, sex
appeal and a dangerous edge to his engaging performance as the suave
thief.  Russo (the Lethal Weapon series, etc) stamps her sexy and
seductive presence on her role, and she fairly sizzles across the
screen.
Denis Leary has a droll and sarcastic presence as the
beleaguered New York detective assigned to the case, and adds some
humour to proceedings.

Title
Review for At First Sight (1999)
        Audiences who love a good cry at the movies, and who haven't
overdosed yet on the saccharine excesses of Message In A Bottle and
its ilk, are in for a treat with At First Sight, a sort of light
weight cross between The Miracle Worker and A Patch Of Blue.
Virgil Adamson (Val Kilmer) works as a masseur at an upstate
New York health spa.  He has also been blind since he was three years
old.  He hasn't written a book like Helen Keller, he doesn't play the
piano like Ray Charles, nor does he sing like Stevie Wonder.  But he
has a wonderful, self-deprecating sense of humour and a healthy
appetite for life.  And he does have magic hands!  It's a case of love
at first touch for stressed out, divorced New York architect Amy Benic
(Oscar winner Mira Sorvino, from Mighty Aphrodite, etc), who comes to
the spa for some much needed relaxation and battery recharging.  It
takes just one incredible massage session with Virgil for her to fall
completely and helplessly in love with him.  It takes her a little
longer to accept his blindness.
Before long though, Amy has convinced Virgil to come to New
York and visit a doctor (Bruce Davison, from Six Degrees Of
Separation, etc) who may be able to restore his sight.  Virgil's
sister Jennie (Kelly McGillis, from Witness, etc) has made a lot of
personal sacrifices in her own life to look after him since their
father took off, and she initially resents Amy's intrusive presence.
The operation is a success.  That is when the real problems begin as
Virgil adjusts to seeing the world as it really is for the first time,
and begins to lose sight of what he really wanted.
At First Sight is an old fashioned romance, albeit given an
added dimension through Virgil's blindness.  The story is based on a
true case study written by neurologist Oliver Sacks (the doctor who
also wrote Awakenings), but has been reworked by first time feature
writer Steve Levett to neatly fit into the Hollywood approved template
for romantic dramas.  Director Irwin Winkler (The Net, etc)
unashamedly puts both his central characters, and the audience,
through the emotional wringer during the course of this two hanky job.
Aussie cinematographer John Seale does some neat visual tricks to
effectively convey Virgil's gradual recovery of sight.
Both Kilmer and Sorvino are an attractive and likeable couple,
and they deliver solid and engaging performances.  Kilmer's realistic
performance especially reveals emotional depths that he hasn't tapped
into very often.  The wonderful Nathan Lane injects some humour as the
irreverent Phil Webster, a visual therapist who helps Virgil cope with
understanding this brave new world of sight.
Ultimately, At First Sight is nothing that we haven't seen
before, in one form or another, but it is the obvious chemistry
between its two stars that gives the familiar material its spark and
affecting qualities.

Title
Review for Lolita (1997)
Adrian Lyne's previous films (9 And 1/2 Weeks, Fatal
Attraction, etc) have dealt with the nature of sexual attraction and
obsession, and his adaptation of Vladimir Nabokov's controversial 1958
novel Lolita further explores these themes.  However, free of the
strict moral and censorship code that shaped Stanley Kubrick's 1962
version, Lyne is able to explore the novel in far more detail.  Where
Kubrick largely alluded to the nature of the relationship between
Humbert and his precocious 12 year old step daughter, Lyne is able to
explore it in franker terms.
However, Lyne's intelligent and sensitive handling of the
provocative material and his sense of restraint is unexpected.  Lolita
is nowhere near as sexually explicit or torrid as its detractors would
have us believe, but is rather a more poignant and evocative tale of a
tragically doomed and illicit love affair.  Many writers, including
James Drearden, Harold Pinter, and even David Mamet, have attempted to
write a more contemporary flavoured adaptation of Lolita, but Lyne
found the perfect collaborator in former Vanity Fair film critic
Stephen Schiff, whose lyrical and melancholy script seems to capture
much of the book's flavour.
The two central performances are powerful and complex and
enhance the movie.  Jeremy Irons brings his usual pained and haunted
expression to the character of Humbert Humbert, the refined English
professor who comes to New England to take up a teaching assignment in
1947.  Humbert is still marked by the loss of an adolescent love that
has haunted him for the past quarter of a century.  He is initially
reluctant to take up lodging with the man hungry widow Charlotte Haze
(Melanie Griffith), until he spies her beautiful young daughter
Dolores (newcomer Dominique Swain).
Despite her childish demeanour, Dolores arouses long forgotten
feelings in Humbert.  He eventually marries Charlotte, just so he can
be close to Dolores, and successfully manages to avoid most of his
husbandly duties.  For a long time Charlotte misreads the attraction
between Humbert and her daughter.  Following the death of Charlotte,
Humbert and Dolores set out on a journey across an America slowly
recovering from the war and emerging with a recognition of its own
identity and culture.
Irons brings sophistication and urbane charm to the role, and
makes Humbert something of a sympathetic figure.  He convincingly
conveys Humbert's ever increasing sense of guilt and remorse.  His
voice over narration provides insight into his obsession, and also
adds some touches of droll humour.  Lyne uses some neat cinematic
tricks to illustrate Humbert's disquieting inner nightmares as he
begins to lose control of the relationship.  Irons gives a confident
and convincing performance in this tricky role, whereas James Mason
always seemed uncomfortable.
In a remarkably assured debut performance, Swain (who went on
to play Nicolas Cage's daughter in the action thriller Face/Off) is a
wonderfully seductive and manipulative nymphet.  Swain beautifully
mixes childlike innocence with an earthy quality and a smouldering
sexuality that sears across the screen.
Frank Langella (from Dave, etc) is truly creepy as the
enigmatic and predatory Quilty.  In the early stages, he is mainly
seen in shadows and gloomy lighting, which gives him a sinister,
mysterious and somehow menacing quality.
Lyne's adaptation of Lolita finally reaches our screens,
following a year of protracted debate over whether it is pornography
or art, and whether it should be banned.  Not since Martin Scorsese's
The Last Temptation Of Christ has a film had so much free
pre-publicity, which certainly won't harm it at the box office.  Far
from glorifying paedophilia, as most of the film's detractors have
claimed, Lolita ends badly and tragically for all concerned.  In fact,
the most disturbing scene is the Taxi Driver-like violence at the end
when Humbert confronts the monstrously amoral Quilty in his own
mansion.
The film is visually rich, and has a beautiful, glossy, almost
romantic surface that seduces the audience, despite its dubious
subject matter.  Howard Atherton's exquisite cinematography brings to
life the rich American landscapes through which Humbert and Lolita
travel on their odyssey.  Ennio Morricone's lush score further
enriches the movie.

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
THE HAUNTING (M).  
(Dreamworks/UIP)
Director: Jan De Bont
Stars: Liam Neeson, Catherine Zeta-Jones, Lili Taylor, Owen Wilson, Bruce 
Dern, Marian Seldes, Todd Field, Virginia Madsen
Running time: 115 minutes.
Robert Wise's The Haunting, his 1963 adaptation of Shirley
Jackson's novel The Haunting Of Hill House, is still highly regarded
as an effectively spooky film and a classic of the haunted house
genre.  In this unnecessary and boring remake, Jan De Bont, the former
cinematographer turned director (Speed, Twister, etc) throws $100
million worth of special effects and Gothic production design at the
screen, but the final result lacks any sort of shocks and thrills.
The Haunting is a rather dull, tired and clichéd horror
film.  It is also incredibly silly!  The script features some of the
most banal and clichéd dialogue uttered in a mainstream film for
several years, and will induce more groans than the supposed ghost
story.  Liam Neeson gives his most somnambulistic performance since
The Phantom Menace - it's interesting to note that the bigger the
budget, the more lacklustre his performance.
Neeson plays Dr Marrow, a psychologist who is conducting
studies into the dynamics of fear.  Under the guise of conducting an
experiment for insomnia, Marrow lures three young subjects to the
creepy 130 year old Hill House for a week.  Nell (indie regular Lili
Taylor, recently seen in Pecker) has spent the past eleven years
caring for her terminally ill mother, and is eager for a chance to
earn some money.  Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones) is a brash, bisexual
artist, while Luke (Owen Wilson) is a cynical, irresponsible joker.
Marrow feeds the group stories about the sprawling mansion's
history - a childless industrialist who built numerous rooms for the
children he would never had - to unnerve them, and settles back to
monitor their reactions.  Unfortunately, the house is genuinely
haunted by the ghosts of hundreds of dead children lured to the
mansion.  The house is also possessed by the malevolent spirit of the
increasingly deranged and bitter millionaire.  The ghostly apparitions
seem to respond to something in the sensitive Nell, who is slowly
seduced by the house's invisible spirits.  Meanwhile, the rest of the
group react towards the mysterious noises and other inexplicable
phenomena as the possessed house seems to come alive.
De Bont and his technical crew throw a barrage of computer
generated effects at the screen, but there is very little here that is
genuinely scary or unsettling.  The film certainly looks impressive,
due largely to Eugenio Zanetti's grand production design, Karl Walter
Lindenlaub's cinematography, and the jarring, loud score from Jerry
Goldsmith.
But De Bont and co have spent too much time on the visual
style of the film and not enough on creating characters that we care
about.  The tired performances from the solid cast seem to reflect the
overall lack of credibility.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
THE BEACH (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Danny Boyle
Stars: Leonardo DiCaprio, Tilda Swinton, Virginie Ledoyen, Guillaume 
Canet, Robert Carlyle, Lars Arentz Hansen, Paterson Joseph
Running time: 118 minutes.
Following the success of Titanic, Leonardo DiCaprio had his
pick of roles.  Instead of opting for something obviously commercial,
he has chosen a more risky and dramatically daring venture by starring
in the latest film from the Scottish trio behind the cult classic
Trainspotting.  Along with collaborators Andrew MacDonald and John
Hodge, Scottish director Danny Boyle stamped himself as a film maker
with a singular and unique vision.  However, their subsequent effort,
A Life Less Ordinary, was something of a disappointing mish mash that
met with a lukewarm response from audiences.  Their latest effort is
also something of an uneven and at times disappointing film that may
struggle to win over audiences.
DiCaprio plays Richard (no surname supplied), a young American
who heads off for the dangerous delights of Thailand, wishing to
experience sensations and sample sights a little off the beaten track.
He learns about a secret island and its fabulous beach from the
paranoid and clearly unhinged Daffy (Robert Carlyle) and decides to
check it out.  Accompanied by fellow tourists Francoise (Virginie
Ledoyen) and Etienne (Guillame Canet), Richard heads off to discover
this rumoured paradise situated away from the gaudy, flashy, tacky
regular tourist traps.
They discover an Eden populated by drop-outs who have
established their own community on this remote island, free of need,
greed and arcane rules and regulations.  They are largely self
sufficient, apart from occasional visits to the mainland for supplies.
Although they have no real structure to their utopian society, the
unofficial leader is Sal (Tilda Swinton, from Orlando, etc), one of
the founding members, who rules with a sense of benevolence.  This
eccentric close knit group share the island with some drug smugglers,
although the two vastly different communities exist together in an
uneasy and fragile truce.  But these outsiders and their malignant
presence unwittingly lay the seeds for the inevitable destruction of
this idyllic paradise.
Adapted from Alex Garland's acclaimed novel, The Beach is a
sort of contemporary parable about paradise lost, mixed with generous
overtones of Lord Of the Flies and Blue Lagoon.  It takes a different
tack regarding the dangers of innocent tourists travelling through
exotic regions of Asia that sets it apart from the more familiar
territory explored in films like the recent Brokedown Palace, etc.
Boyle certainly has a distinctive and exciting visual style,
but it sometimes clashes with the dramatic action of the film and
pushes it into a more surreal direction.  The film seems to lose
direction about half way through, especially when DiCaprio runs around
the island like a younger version of Rambo.
DiCaprio plays a thoroughly selfish and unlikeable character.
But he spends much of the film without a shirt, which will certainly
appeal to female audiences and fans of the actor.  But while his
performance sometimes lacks coherence, there is still plenty here to
suggest that he is capable of delivering impressive performances like
those of This Boy's Life, What's Eating Gilbert Grape? when given
interesting material to work with.
The Beach has been shot in Thailand, and Darius Khondji's
cinematography is certainly gorgeous.  The stunning locations are
complemented by Angelo Badalamenti's evocative music score.
Ultimately though, The Beach is something of a disappointment,
especially given the talent involved.

Title
Review for Limbo (1999)
LIMBO (M).  
(Screen Gems/Columbia Tristar)
Director: John Sayles
Stars: David Strathairn, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Vanessa Martinez, 
Kris Kristofferson, Casey Siemaszko, Leo Burmeister
Running time: 127 minutes.
Limbo is both a metaphorical and a physical state for the
central characters of this new drama from John Sayles, one of
America's most idiosyncratic yet prolific independent film makers.
His most expensive film to date (with a budget of $8 million), Limbo
is a subtle, yet intelligent and sedately paced character study that
explores themes of isolation, survival and redemption.
The film is set in Port Henry, an Alaskan fishing town that is
about to lose its main source of income, thus throwing it into a state
of economic limbo.  In the film's first hour, Sayles introduces us to
this picturesque town and its rich tapestry of life.  He tracks its
eccentric inhabitants through the busy social fabric of this remote
outpost, where people have been known to go mad and murder people just
to relieve the boredom of the long, frozen winter months.
But the central narrative thread of this subtle, gentle
character-driven drama is the developing romance between two
emotionally scarred people, who exist in their own sort of limbo
within the town itself.
Joe Gastineau (played by Sayles regular David Strathairn) has
been dealt some harsh blows in the past and approaches life with a
sense of reserve and caution.  At college he was a talented basketball
player with a bright future until a crippling knee injury forced him
to give up the game.  Years later a tragic fishing accident left two
people dead, and Joe has not been on a boat since.  He now works as a
handyman, performing odd jobs around the town.
Donna De Angelo (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, from Robin Hood:
Prince Of Thieves, etc) is a night club singer with an unlucky track
record of boy friends.  Her daughter Noelle (Vanessa Martinez) is
solitary, melancholy and withdrawn, and resentful of her mother's
lifestyle.  Slowly, Joe and Donna form a relationship that brings some
spark back into their lives.
Then Joe makes a fateful decision to go on a boat trip with
his younger, irresponsible half brother Bobby (Casey Siemaszko).
Events take a violent turn when some men with guns board the boat and
kill Bobby.  Joe, Donna and Noelle escape and manage to swim ashore to
an isolated and remote island.  Trapped with little hope of rescue,
the three form a strong bond shaped by a desire for survival.  Sayles
injects some psychological tension into the film as the three struggle
to cope with their inhospitable environment.
It is here that Sayles also pulls off his most annoying
director's trick yet - he finishes the film abruptly with a non-ending
that leaves the three facing an uncertain fate - abandoning them in a
state of limbo, as it were.  The screen suddenly fades to black and
the credits roll, leaving audiences to finish the film for themselves.
If the technology was available, Limbo would be the first film with an
interactive ending in which audiences could vote for the way they
would want it to end.  Instead, audiences emerge from the cinema
heatedly discussing this deliberately ambiguous conclusion.  It's an
effective gambit from Sayles, and marks Limbo as one of his more
interesting movies.
The title has many meanings within the context of this
intriguing film.  The writing is typically strong, and Sayles
beautifully captures the warm emotional journey of the well-developed,
three dimensional characters.  He also subtly depicts the inherent
dangers of this savage and remote wilderness location.
Sayles draws strong performances from his cast, and the
audience develops an empathy with them and their plight.  Strathairn
brings a wonderfully haunted and vulnerable air to his understated
performance here, while Mastrantonio initially has a brassy confident
persona that hides her own vulnerability and emotional pain.  The
nicely laid back Kris Kristofferson brings an ambivalent quality to
his small role as a pilot who "shares a past" with Joe.
Limbo is a richly rewarding experience, but it's also at times
a frustrating film that sticks in the mind long after the credits have
finished!

Title
Review for 42: Forty Two Up (1998)
In 1964 director Michael Apted began a remarkable documentary
series for television.  Fourteen seven year old children, drawn from
different backgrounds in London, were chosen as the subjects of an
ambitious series that would explore the truth behind the Jesuit
saying: "Give me the child at seven and I will show you the man."  The
series initially set out to demonstrate the belief that a person's
fate was sealed at birth, and shaped by his social background.
Since 1964, Apted and his film crew have returned to catch up
with these children every seven years, charting their growth and
progress and following them as they pursue their childhood dreams.
But in the three decades since the 7 Up series began, it has undergone
a subtle transformation, along with its characters.  What began as a
calculated experiment to show how class driven English society was in
the '60's has now turned slowly into a journey through our own lives.
The series often holds a mirror up to our own expectations, our hopes
and dreams, our failures and our achievements, which gives it a
powerful resonance.
In the interim, Apted himself has grown in stature as a film
maker, with credits including Gorillas In The Mist, Nell, etc, but he
still displays a remarkable affinity and empathy with his subjects.
42 Up is just like an occasional reunion amongst old friends,
and Apted comfortably takes up this detailed and intimate portrait of
these characters from where 35 Up left off.  There are detailed
flashbacks to previous episodes, which help place the characters and
their desires into context.  Most of the characters now seem to have
adapted to the regular intrusion into their lives of the "poison pill"
represented by Apted and his documentary team.
Two of the characters refused to take part in this latest
instalment for their own deeply personal reasons.  However, Simon, the
black kid raised in a foster institution, returns, having now found
happiness and contentment in a new relationship.  But the most
surprising story here is that of Neil, who had lived a nomadic life
that had taken him to the wilds of Scotland's highlands.  A troubled
picture of schizophrenia and depression, he has now become an active
council man and politician.  The film celebrates his achievements, and
shows that anything is possible.
Some of the material is quite fascinating, while several of
the characters have settled into a comfortable middle aged routine,
which is less inspiring.  Some of them talk candidly about the weight
of expectations, and the feeling of having to have done something
extraordinary during the past seven years just to make the next
instalment worth while and exciting.
42 Up is primarily a "talking heads" documentary, although
Apted makes sparing use of external footage.  The static nature of
Apted's handling is a little dull and unadventurous.  The running time
of 130 minutes is a little generous for the subject matter.
Consequently, the film may prove a little too long and slow for many
in the audience, especially those unacquainted with either the concept
or the characters.

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
The influence of Asian cinema on Hollywood has become
increasingly obvious, with directors like John Woo leaving their mark
on the action genre.  Bullets, bodies and blood fly thick and fast in
this brutally exciting action thriller that seamlessly combines the
kinetic energy and violence of the distinctive Hong Kong style of film
making with the slickness of Hollywood.  What is most surprising about
The Corruptor is that this riveting, blood soaked actioner comes from
James Foley, a director best known for his powerful character driven
dramas (At Close Range and After Dark, My Sweet, etc).
The action takes place in New York's colourful Chinatown
district, an area with its own unwritten codes and rules.  Chen
(played by legendary Hong Kong action star Chow Yun-Fat) is a veteran
detective who has policed the streets of Chinatown.  However, a long
time ago he fell under the spell of Uncle Benny (Kim Chan),
Chinatown's unofficial godfather, and has since walked an uneasy
tightrope between his two masters.  A vicious war erupts between the
old style Triads and the new Fukienese Dragons, and the body count
rises.  The heat is suddenly on Chen.  Complicating matters is the
discovery of a series of dead bodies of anonymous young Asian girls in
garbage piles throughout Chinatown.
Enter young Danny Wallace (Mark Wahlberg, from Boogie Nights
and The Big Hit, etc), an idealistic young cop assigned to Chen's task
force.  "You don't change Chinatown; Chinatown changes you," cautions
Chen, who develops an uneasy alliance and grudging respect for his new
partner.
Yun-Fat is at his coolest, laconic best here, and Foley gives
him plenty of opportunities to demonstrate the skills that have made
him so famous.  This is a much more exciting and violent film than The
Replacement Killers, his Hollywood debut, and should please fans of
the genre.  Wahlberg is also quite good here, and holds his own
alongside Yun-Fat.
The Corruptor is over plotted, but Foley doesn't allow the
mechanics of the story to slow the film down or get in the way of the
action.  He directs with bruising efficiency.  The film's undoubted
highlight is a brilliantly staged, breathtakingly exciting car chase
through the streets of New York that exacts a high toll amongst
innocent bystanders and sets new standards for the genre.
Juan Ruiz-Anchia's fluid camerawork and Howard Shore's crisp
editing bring a sense of energy to the film.  The Corruptor certainly
crams a lot into its incredibly taut and tight 110 minutes.

Title
Review for American History X (1998)
AMERICAN HISTORY X (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Tony Kaye
Stars: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Fairuza Balk, 
Avery Brooks, Elliott Gould, Stacy Keach
Running time: 119 minutes.
Written by David McKenna, American History X explores the
origins of hatred and bigotry, and shows how those attitudes can be
passed from one generation to the next.  The film shows how
frustrated, insecure and impressionable youth are seduced by poisonous
ideologies.  This is an environment in which violence begets violence,
and history repeats itself with tragic consequences.  Derek Vinyard
(Edward Norton) is a vicious white supremist who kills three black
youths as they attempt to break into his car.  After three years in
prison he emerges a changed man.  His experiences have taught him
tolerance, and he no longer believes in the vile and spurious messages
spouted by his mentor (Stacy Keach).
Derek tries to heal the rift within his own family caused by
his violent and intolerant actions.  He also tries to steer his
impressionable younger brother Danny (T2's Edward Furlong) away from
following a similar path to self-destruction.  Danny worships Derek,
and, in his absence, has fallen under the spell of the same creed of
hatred and intolerance.
British director Tony Kaye makes a solid debut with this
powerfully disturbing and controversial portrait of racial hatred and
the rising tide of fascism in contemporary America.  The odious
rhetoric, and some of the characters and scenes, may remind audiences
of the repellent Romper Stomper.  However, unlike that film, American
History X manages to temper its extreme images with a more optimistic
message.  Given recent events in both England and America, American
History X's ending has an immediacy that makes its cautionary message
even more relevant.
Kaye also doubled as cinematographer, and he captures some
powerful images.  The extended flashback sequences are filmed in black
and white, which somehow gives them added power.  One flashback to the
crucial murders contains one of the most brutal scenes I've seen in
any recent movie.  Norton apparently had disagreements with Kaye over
the direction of the film and reshot portions of it himself.
The pair of dynamic central performances will mesmerise
audiences as well as leave them shaken.  With his short cropped hair
and a swastika tattooed on his chest, Derek cuts a frightening figure.
Norton delivers a blistering, volatile, and intelligent performance
that explores his contradictions, and builds upon his superb credits
in Primal Fear and The People Vs Larry Flynt.  Furlong continues to
impress with a solid performance that captures Danny's vulnerability
and gives the character some unexpected depths.  Keach is a nasty
piece of work as the sinister, self-appointed head of a white
supremist organisation.
This powerful and often confronting film presents a
frightening and genuinely disturbing view of society.  Its gut
wrenching message and impact here are every bit as effective as films
like Boyz N The Hood.  This is an important film that demands to be
seen.

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
BRINGING OUT THE DEAD (R).  
(Touchstone/Paramount/Buena Vista International)
Director: Martin Scorsese
Stars: Nicolas Cage, Patricia Arquette, John Goodman, Ving Rhames, Tom 
Sizemore, Mary Beth Hurt, Marc Anthony, Cliff Curtis, with the voices
of Martin Scorsese and Queen Latifah as dispatchers
Running time: 121 minutes.
Martin Scorsese returns to the mean streets of New York for
this blistering, intense and frenetically paced journey through 56
hours in the life of a traumatised paramedic.  Paramedics are the
emergency response medical teams that nightly race through the
cesspool of a major city in decay, dealing with alcoholics, drug
overdoses, violence, suicide, death and misery, and cleaning up the
human detritus.
Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) is a burnt out case, fuelled by a
mixture of booze, pills, adrenaline, and haunted by the ghosts of
those he has been unable to save - in particular, Rosa, a teenage
Puerto Rican girl.  Then he begins a relationship with Mary Burke
(Cage's real life wife Patricia Arquette), the daughter of a heart
attack victim, and briefly glimpses a hope of salvation.  We gain more
insight into Frank's fragile state through the contrast of his three
partners, who all have their own way of dealing with the pressures.
Larry (John Goodman) is an essentially decent man who remains detached
from the carnage he witnesses on a nightly basis.  The fast talking
and deeply religious Marcus (Ving Rhames) uses a sense of humour as a
defence mechanism, while Tom (Tom Sizemore) is a volatile, blunt and
colourful sociopath who loves taking risks.
Taking a break from action hero mode, Cage returns to the type
of intense, flawed every man that he plays so convincingly.  His
drawn, haunted looking face, dishevelled and manic appearance are
perfectly suited to his role here as a man on the brink of a breakdown
and barely able to cope with the pressures of his job.
Bringing Out The Dead is based on the best selling novel
written by Joe Connelly, himself a former paramedic, who spent ten
years with the New York service, and worked on the film as a technical
adviser.  Script writer Paul Schrader (Taxi Driver, etc) brings a
gritty, blackly comic edge to the material, which Scorsese directs
with his typical relentless energy and cinematic flair.  He brings a
frantic quality and uncompromising realism to the film, which is
shaped by his brilliant mix of music, stunning visual verve and deft
use of symbolism.  Veteran cinematographer Robert Richardson creates a
surreal portrait of New York, and his dazzling, dizzy camera races
through the city at breakneck speed.
If you thought the emergency room of a certain television
series was weird, here Scorsese depicts it as anarchic, chaotic and
combustible, giving these scenes a nightmarish quality.  Bringing Out
The Dead is a powerful return to form for Scorsese, one of America's
finest directors.

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
CRUEL INTENTIONS (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Roger Kumble
Stars: Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe, Reese Witherspoon, Selma 
Blair, Louise Fletcher, Sean 
Patrick Thomas, Joshua Jackson, Eric Mabius, Christine Baranski, Swoosie 
Kurtz, Alaina Reed Hall, Hiep 
Thi Le, Deborah Offner, Drew Snyder, Herta Ware
Running time: 97 minutes. 
This contemporary, steamy and hip version of Dangerous
Liaisons is aimed at the cinema literate, adolescent audience of the
'90's.
In updating Choderlos De Laclos' 1782 novel of debauchery,
deception and sexual betrayal to the 20th century, first time director
Roger Kumble reaffirms the timelessness of the story and its themes.
He maintains the essential ideas of the original novel, but brings a
hip, street wise sensibility to the plot and breathes new life into
the self absorbed, ruthless characters.  Kumble still sets this modern
version amidst a world of wealth and immense privilege, in which the
beautiful people arrogantly believe that the normal rules of society
do not apply to them.
          Sebastian Valmont (the hunky Ryan Phillippe) and his beautiful
step sister Kathryn (Sarah Michelle Gellar, from I Know What You Did
Last Summer, and tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer, etc) desperately lust
after each other.  Left alone in their plush Manhattan apartment while
their parents holiday, they direct their energies into seducing many
of their contemporaries and then casually destroying their
reputations.
But the stakes are dramatically upped when Sebastian sets out
to seduce Annette (Reese Witherspoon, recently seen in Pleasantville,
etc), the daughter of his school's new headmaster.  In a recent
magazine interview Annette publicly avowed to maintain her virginity
until she marries the man she loves.  Meanwhile, Kathryn sets out to
tarnish the reputation of Cecile (newcomer Selma Blair), the new girl
friend of an ex-lover who dumped her in humiliating circumstances.  At
stake is Sebastian's prized 1956 vintage Jaguar.  But Sebastian has
underestimated the cunning of his manipulative sister, who is willing
to play people off against one another, especially when the stakes are
so high and personal.
Neither the contemporary setting, the hunky young cast, nor
the cutting edge soundtrack detract from the savage nature of the
amoral games that the pair play for their own sense of personal
gratification.  There is more than a whiff of sex here, although some
fans may be disappointed to learn they don't get to see Buffy in the
buff.
The charismatic and handsome Phillipe (the best thing in the
recent 54) continues to impress with another superb performance.  He
conveys Sebastian's transformation from cynical, shallow cad, and
gives the flashy character some unexpected depth.  Gellar relishes
this opportunity to play against type, and is superb as the bitchy and
manipulative Kathryn, who is prepared to use anyone to achieve her
aims.  Witherspoon is also good as the vulnerable and naive Annette,
the intended victim of these dangerous games who unexpectedly
triumphs.  Oscar winner Louise Fletcher, Swoosie Kurtz and Christine
Baranski round out the cast in smaller roles as some of the adult
characters caught up in the cruel machinations.
Cruel Intentions has a sophisticated style that will also
strongly appeal to an adult audience not normally drawn towards
shallow teen dramas.

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
ERIN BROCKOVICH (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Steven Soderbergh
Stars: Julia Roberts, Albert Finney, Aaron Eckhart, Peter Coyote, Marg
Helgenberger, Scotty Leavenworth, Gemmenner De La Penna, Cherry Jones,
Tracey Walter, Dawn Didawick
Running time: 131 minutes.
A twice divorced, unemployed mother of three young children,
Erin Brockovich (Julia Roberts) struggles to be taken seriously.  But
when she lands a job as a secretary in the small law firm run by Ed
Masry (Oscar winning veteran Albert Finney) she eventually gains
respect as the key player in a multi- million dollar law suit against
a giant energy corporation.
Masry has been in the business for years and thinks he has
earned a little bit of peace and quiet.  He has become a little set in
his ways after years of dealing with civil matters and trivial
litigation.  But even he finds himself actively involved when Erin
discovers that a power company has, for several decades, been
polluting the water supply of a small town and lying about it.  Erin
investigates why real estate records for the sale of houses within the
town also contain private medical records.  Eventually she rallies the
townsfolk together in a frustrating effort to sue the power company.
It is a David versus Goliath like struggle in which the
underdog eventually triumphs.  Victory also enables Erin to break away
from that stereotype in which most people have neatly pigeon holed her
for so long.  Erin Brockovich is based on a true story, and although
it takes a few liberties along the way, it is, for the most part, an
involving tale.
Steven Soderbergh's direction is a tad manipulative, as he
takes great pains to make us feel sympathy for the small town victims
of the faceless corporation's greed.  There are few subtleties to be
found in this film, as Soderbergh (the superb crime film Out Of Sight,
etc) tends to paint everything in broad strokes.  But the script, from
Susannah Grant (Ever After, etc) and Soderbergh, contains plenty of
winning humour and is not without its charms.
When the film explores Erin's troubled and unconventional
personal life it becomes bogged down and occasionally repetitive, and
many within the audience will become restless during these scenes.
However, while depicting Erin's tenacious paper chase through the
daunting amount of documents and legal technicalities and her patient
attempts at gathering evidence, the film works a treat.
Like a few other recent films based on true stories about an
unlikely triumph against the odds (The Insider, The Hurricane, etc),
Erin Brockovich becomes a compelling and inspiring drama that should
please audiences.  Like its appealing heroine, Erin Brockovich should
also effectively change a few misconceptions about Roberts' abilities.
Comfortable with roles in lightweight romantic comedies,
Roberts has sometimes struggled with the demands of portraying more
dramatic characters.  However, she finds a role that perfectly suits
her here, and delivers one of her best performances for quite some
time.  She delivers a warts and all characterisation of a woman
unafraid to speak her mind and exploit of her sexuality in getting
what she wants.  Her well rounded and complex performance captures
Erin's prickly nature, her hidden strengths, her driven nature, yet
also hints at the vulnerability and insecurity that lies just below
the surface.
Finney is also superb as her initially blustering boss, who
originally underestimates his unusual new employee, but gradually
grows to admire and respect Erin's ability.  Aaron Eckhart (In The
Company Of Men, etc) makes the most of the lesser developed role of
George, the bikie who befriends Erin and her kids, but is driven away
by his own inability to cope with her growing sense of confidence and
assurance.  The real Erin Brockovich contributes a brief cameo as a
waitress in a restaurant early in the movie.

Title
Review for Central do Brasil (1998)
At heart, Central Station (Central do Brasil) is a road movie
in which two characters with little in common develop a strong bond of
friendship that changes them.  Central Station also has a humanity and
sense of compassion that sets it apart from a number of similarly
themed films.  The central story of an unlikely friendship that
develops between a hard hearted elderly curmudgeon and the young boy
who becomes her reluctant companion on an odyssey fondly recalls the
recent Oscar winner Kolya.  This simple, yet heart warming tale will
appeal to a similar audience.
Central Station is set in Rio De Janeiro, a sprawling and
pitiless city in which overcrowding, abject poverty and illiteracy are
rife.  Dora (played magnificently by veteran Brazilian actress
Fernanda Montenegro) is a retired school teacher who ekes out a living
as a letter writer.  Based in the heart of Brazil's sprawling Central
Station, Dora patiently writes letters for the illiterate population
at a dollar a letter.  However, every night she returns to her flat
where she and her neighbour Irene (Marilia Pera) decide which of the
letters to post.
One day she encounters Ana (Soia Lira) and her nine year old
son Josue (Vincinius de Oliviera), who wants to send a letter to her
husband, a drunkard who abandoned her years ago.  She wants to arrange
a meeting between him and the son he has never met, but Dora doesn't
post the letter, believing that Ana is better off without him.  A
couple of days later Ana is killed in an accident outside the station,
and Josue is left all alone.
Initially indifferent to the boy's fate, Dora eventually takes
pity on him and brings him home.  She then sells him to an adoption
agency for some desperately needed cash.  But when she learns that the
agency may actually be a front for an international organisation that
kills orphaned kids for the organs, she rescues Josue and sets out to
return him to his father.  It is a journey that transforms the two,
bringing them closer together.
As the odd pair travel into an increasingly remote and harsh
destination, Salles takes the audience on a parallel journey through
contemporary Brazil.  He exposes the harsh reality of this depressing
country, but he somehow finds an optimistic and hopeful streak that
augurs well for the future.  Dora is symbolic of the old, traditional
Brazil, while Josue comes to represent the future and change.  A grim
scene in which a young shoplifter is brutally executed shows the fate
that would probably have awaited young Josue.
The film benefits enormously from the two wonderful central
performances that grab the audience's sympathy.  Montenegro is superb,
and her wonderfully expressive and beautifully nuanced performance
conveys the spectacular emotional growth of her character.  She moves
from the bitter, weary and cynical old woman we meet at the start to
one who develops maternal feelings and experiences compassion for
probably the first time in her life.  It is an extraordinary
performance that makes this transformation credible.  In his debut
film role, young de Oliviera has a winning, unassuming and natural
charm that will melt hearts.  He almost steals the film away from
Montenegro.
A former documentary film maker with an interest in themes of
identity and exile, Salles brings a sense of compassion and compelling
realism to the film's political subtext.  However, he eschews the
cynical manipulation that suffuses most American movies that travel
this terrain.  Heavily influenced by legendary directors of the
calibre of John Ford, Visconti and the late Akira Kurosawa, Salles'
film explores a similar emotional and physical terrain.  This haunting
and moving film also resonates with a similar sense of epic sweep and
visual beauty.  Walter Carvalho's often breath taking cinematography
captures the harsh beauty and landscapes of Brazil and is an integral
part of the charm of this deeply affecting and moving film.
It's a pity that Central Station was nominated for an Oscar in
the same year as Roberto Benigni's wonderful Life Is Beautiful,
because it is would also have been a worthy winner.

Title
Review for Like It Is (1998)
        London's club scene and gay sub-culture provide the background
for this gritty, contemporary, gay-themed love story from Britain's
Channel Four and director Paul Oremland.  Like It Is has been compared
to 1996's wonderful gay coming of age tale Beautiful Thing, but this
low budget production is unlikely to reach a broad audience as it has
been consigned to a limited release on the art house circuit.
The film opens in the gaudy, neon-lit resort town of
Blackpool.  Nervously waiting outside a gay night-club is the
strikingly handsome Craig (newcomer Steve Bell).  A fighter who earns
spare cash on the lucrative, but illegal, bare knuckle fight circuit,
Craig is also uncertain of his sexuality.  Loathe to enter the club,
he hangs around in the alley outside.  There he meets Matt (Ian Rose,
a star of numerous tv soaps), who is leaving the club.  A London-based
club entrepreneur, Matt is in town to help promote the latest single
from his protégé Paula (Dani Behr), a pop singer whose career is
on the way up.  Their sexual encounter is brief and unsatisfactory,
and leaves Craig feeling even more confused.
Recognising the lack of opportunities in this bleak town,
Craig heads off to London, and unexpectedly arrives on Matt's
doorstep.  However the self-centred Paula, who is also Matt's
roommate, grows jealous of Craig's presence, and does her best to
destroy the relationship before it becomes too serious.  Also throwing
a spanner or two into the works is Matt's boss Kelvin (former Who
frontman Roger Daltrey), a manipulative and nasty piece of work who
would be right at home in a lurid tv soap opera.  A big shot music
promoter with a penchant for young male bimbos, Kelvin is also adept
at making or breaking artists who cross him.
Craig eventually grows uncomfortable and disenchanted with
this hedonistic world of drugs, sexual jealousy, bitchiness and
hypocrisy, and decides to return home to Blackpool.  There at least
everything is a little more straight forward, and Craig knows where he
stands.  Matt has to confront his own feelings and eventually choose
between his dream of managing his own club with Kelvin or a chance of
happiness with Craig.
The performances of the largely unknown cast are quite good
and surprisingly natural.  Bell, a real-life boxing champion himself,
brings a touching vulnerability, naiveté, and air of uncertainty to
his role that perfectly suits the character.  Daltrey hasn't had a
role this juicy for years.  He seizes the opportunity with gleeful
abandon, and his smarmy, uninhibited performance dominates the film.
Behr is wonderfully bitchy as the selfish and jealous Paula, while
Rose is also good as the cocky and seemingly shallow Matt.
Writer Robert Gray seems to know this territory well, and he
examines London's gay scene with an honesty and insight that is rare.
First time feature director Oremland beautifully captures the ambience
of the night club scene as well as the bitchy politics of the music
industry.  His insights provide this enjoyable and intelligently
crafted film with a bit of muscle.  Like It Is has a gritty edge that
is tempered with some wonderful touches of disarmingly candid humour.

Title
Review for Election (1999)
ELECTION (M).  
(Paramount/MTV Films/UIP)
Director: Alexander Payne
Stars: Matthew Broderick, Reese Witherspoon, Chris Klein, Jessica 
Campbell, Colleen Camp, Matt Molloy, Holmes Osborne.
Yet another teenage comedy set in an American high school!
However this razor sharp and biting comedy about the politics of high
school has much more in common with the recent anarchic Rushmore
rather than more vacuous and light weight films like She's All That
and its ilk.  Election is also everything that the somewhat
disappointing Rushmore aspired to be but failed to achieve.
This smartly written and archly funny black comedy is set in
Omaha's Carver High School.  Tracey Flick (Reese Witherspoon, from
Pleasantville, etc) is the sort of ambitious overachiever who makes
Rushmore's Max Fischer seem positively half hearted.  She is involved
in every conceivable school activity and is possessed with a ruthless
win-at-all-costs streak.
Jim McAllister (Matthew Broderick, the original Ferris
Bueller) is a career teacher and student advisor, who has devoted all
his energies and time to guiding his students.  He has thrice been
voted teacher of the year, a record at Carver High.  But there is
something about the compulsive, not so naive Tracey that this popular
and dedicated teacher dislikes with a passion.  When she stands
unopposed for the presidency, McAllister decides to teach her a
lesson, with unpredictable results for all concerned.
He convinces popular but dim-witted jock Paul Metzler (Chris
Klein, in a role not too dissimilar to the one he recently played in
the raunchy adolescent comedy American Pie) to run against her.
Further complications arise when Paul's angry, alienated lesbian
sister Tammy (Jessica Campbell) also mounts her own campaign, although
she has no real interest in the politics of the school, or in Carver
itself.
As the increasingly vicious campaign and the dirty tricks hot
up, the lines between right and wrong become blurred.  McAllister's
lectures about morals and ethics resonate ironically throughout the
rest of the film as he tries to subvert the democratic process and
prevent Tracey from winning the election.  Meanwhile, McAllister's
personal life becomes increasingly confused, which leads to him making
even more costly errors of judgement.
Broderick slowly but surely trashes his good guy screen image
with his wonderful performance as the increasingly desperate and
sleazy McAllister.  Witherspoon is also superb in a complex role, as
her perfectly angelic looks hide a spiteful, wilful and vengeful
disposition.
 
Election is a smart, vicious and often subversive comedy that
looks at morality, ethics, ambition, greed, destiny and power
politics.  Writer/director Alexander Payne uses a clever, multi-first
person narrative structure to give the audience insights into the
different motivations and attitudes of the characters.
Is McAllister merely driven by a sense of frustration, knowing
that he is a teacher who will shape and inspire his students while the
more talented and ambitious of his charges will graduate and chase
their share of the American dream?  Is Tracey that sort of person who
always seeks power and personal glory, oblivious to those she tramples
over on the way to the top?  The nicely ironic epilogue goes some way
to answering these questions and providing a neat moral to this comic
fable.

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
In the '30's and '40's, Universal produced a series of horror
films (featuring Boris Karloff and Lon Chaney) about a resurrected
Mummy seeking vengeance on those who disturbed his tomb.  Eager for a
crowd pleasing hit, Universal has whisked the dust off the character
and unwrapped it for a new generation.  Rather than a straight horror
film, this $80 million version of The Mummy is a rollicking good
adventure yarn in a similar vein to the popular Indiana Jones series.
The Mummy is perfect Saturday afternoon matinee material, albeit with
a distinctly '90's sensibility and a sophisticated edge.
The action of The Mummy takes place in Egypt in 1925.  The
B-grade Indiana Jones-type character here is Rick O'Connell (Brendan
Fraser), a foreign legionnaire who knows the location to Humanaptra,
the mythical lost city of ancient Egypt.  He is hired by virginal
librarian and amateur archaeologist Evelyn Carnahan (Rachel Weisz,
from Swept From The Sea, etc) to lead an expedition to the buried city
and its reputed treasure trove.
Along the way they encounter a rival expedition, led by Kevin
J O'Connor, which has less scholarly pursuits in mind.  However, when
they find the city they unwittingly unleash the ferocious power of
Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo), an evil priest buried alive 3000 years
earlier for murdering the pharaoh, and are forced to join forces to
battle his supernatural powers.  Imhotep brings with him numerous
Biblical plagues as well as legions of undead, which he turns loose on
the modern world.  He also sets his sights on using Evelyn as a human
sacrifice in order to resurrect his dead lover.  Director Stephen
Sommers, best known for his live action version of The Jungle Book,
brings plenty of pace and excitement to the film.  He also maintains a
wonderful tongue in cheek approach throughout this entertaining yarn.
Cast largely against type as the swashbuckling hero Fraser is
superb, and he brings an enthusiasm, physicality, and sense of humour
to the role that ideally captures the film's tone.  Weisz brings a
combination of vulnerability and strength to her role as the bookish
Evelyn, who is suddenly out of her depth when fighting centuries old
curses.  John Hannah (from Sliding Doors, etc) adds much comic relief
as Evelyn's roguish brother Jonathan, although his occasionally
irritating character is something of a cliché.
Unlike another recent big budget sci-fi blockbuster currently
screening around town, the impressive array of digitally created
special effects on display here serve only to beef up the story.  The
effects, especially those that recreate fierce sandstorms and
re-animate skeletal armies, are superb and enhance the fanciful
material.  The Mummy is ideal entertainment, and heaps more fun than
the over hyped The Phantom Menace.  
**** 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
OFFICE SPACE (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Mike Judge
Stars: Ron Livingston, Jennifer Aniston, Gary Cole, David Herman, Ajay 
Naidu, Stephen Root, Diedrich 
Bader, Richard Riehle, John C McGinley, Alexandra Wentworth, Paul Willson
Running time: 90 minutes.
Mike Judge, the creator of animated favourites Beavis And
Butthead and King Of the Hill, turns his hand to live action comedy
with Office Space, a sort of slacker's guide on how to succeed in
business without really trying.  This enjoyable enough comedy about
the plight of office workers everywhere centres around a disenchanted
computer programmer who finds himself unexpectedly promoted, despite
his best efforts to get himself fired from his mundane job.
Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston, from Swingers, etc) is a
computer programmer at high tech computer firm Initech, but he has
grown more stressed out and disenchanted by his job and lack of
opportunity.  Following a hypnosis therapy session that ends with the
death of his analyst, Peter becomes far more relaxed and easy going,
turning up to work late and casually dressed.  A team of corporate
consultants somehow identify his attitude as perfect management
material and recommend him for promotion.  He and two colleagues also
put into motion a small scheme to help sabotage the company, which
backfires.
A less interesting subplot centres around the growing romance
between Peter and Joanna (Friends' star Jennifer Aniston), a waitress
in a tacky fast food restaurant.  Joanna is also growing tired of her
thankless job and her manager's insistence on the employees wearing
"lots of flair" and projecting a happy attitude.  Aniston is wasted in
an under developed role.
The film loses much of its comic energy and invention when it
moves outside the office and away from the office politics of Initech.
One of the more fascinating characters here is Milton (Stephen
Root), the mild, mumbling, much put upon employee who works in an
increasingly cluttered office.  Gary Cole (American Gothic, etc) is
wonderfully droll as Lumbergh, the firm's laconic and irritating boss.
The film's very obvious philosophy is that there is more to
life than working nine to five purely for the money to pay the bills.
Man wasn't meant to spend all day sitting inside a tiny cubicle
staring at a computer screen, or filling in meaningless forms in
triplicate.  Many within the audience will identify with the
frustrations of the put-upon white collar characters here and
sympathise with the movie's sentiments.  However, they may find little
consolation from some of the more extreme solutions that Judge
suggests.

Title
Review for Drive Me Crazy (1999)
Occasionally an adolescent romantic comedy will unexpectedly
break out of the mould and cleverly subvert the formula (Clueless,
Election, etc).  Drive Me Crazy, on the other hand, steers an
unadventurous course through a succession of clichés that will be
immediately obvious to audiences who sat through last year's
procession of bland, formulaic teen comedies.  Drive Me Crazy shares
numerous thematic and plot similarities with films such as She's All
That, 10 Things I Hate About You and even Never Been Kissed.
While tracing the tricky path of adolescent love, Drive Me
Crazy also explores the bitchy politics of high school.  Drive Me
Crazy offers up yet another exploration of the hierarchy of high
school, from the jocks to the geeks, the elite in-crowd to the
outcasts who desperately want to be accepted, from the cool to the
uncool.  There is also plenty of jealous plotting and subterfuge that
inevitably comes to a head during the climactic school dance.  This
clueless comedy has been written by Rob Thomas, one of the writers on
popular teen soap Dawson's Creek, but it is rather superficial stuff
that lacks any real insight or freshness.
Nicole (played with some charm but a lack of real charisma by
Melissa Joan Hart, better known as TV's teenage witch Sabrina) and
Chase (Adrian Grenier) have lived next door to each other all their
lives, but their childhood friendship has cooled.  When Nicole tries
to make Brad, the hunky but vapid school basketball champ, jealous,
she enlists Chase's help.  She pretends that she and Chase are an
item.  Chase is initially willing to go along with the scheme because
he has just been dumped by his shrewish girl friend, and hopes to make
her jealous as well.  Nicole gives Chase a make over and introduces
him into the school's elite, which gradually alienates him from his
friends.
But sparks fly, and the pair discover that there is a
chemistry between them, which leads to further complications.  Drive
Me Crazy essentially follows a paint by numbers scenario, and most
audiences will be able to predict the outcome of this tangled web of
adolescent lust and romance well before the climax.  John Schultz, who
gave us the moderately interesting Bandwagon last year, directs this
material in surprisingly lacklustre fashion.
This innocuous and decidedly lightweight comedy will certainly
appeal to its target audience, but adult audiences will probably find
that it drives them to distraction.

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Dream, A (1999)
A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S DREAM (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Michael Hoffman
Stars: Kevin Kline, Michelle Pfeiffer, Christian Bale, Calista Flockhart, 
Stanley Tucci, Rupert Everett, 
Dominic West, Anna Friel, Sophie Marceau, David Strathairn, Sam Rockwell, 
Roger Rees
Running time: 121 minutes.
To see, or not to see?  That is indeed the question regarding
Michael Hoffman's rather disappointing and pedestrian adaptation of
Shakespeare's whimsical comedy about romance, mismatched lovers and a
little night magic.  Unlike other directors, such as Baz Luhrmann and
his brilliant contemporary version of Romeo And Juliet, Hoffman
doesn't take any creative risks with the material, which results in a
workmanlike production.  The only real change Hoffman makes is in
updating the play and relocating it to Tuscany, at the end of the 19th
century.  It's a change that doesn't add much dramatically to the
film, but it does enable a number of the central characters to ride
around on "that new fangled invention", the bicycle.
Hermia (Anna Friel) is engaged to the handsome Demetrius
(Christian Bale), a match that pleases her straight laced father
(David Strathairn).  However, Hermia really loves Lysander (Dominic
West), who comes from a lesser background.  Meanwhile, Helena (Ally
McBeal star Calista Flockhart) actually loves Demetrius, but he barely
acknowledges her presence.  These four lovers wander into the nearby
forest, which is the home of the fairy king Oberon (Rupert Everett).
They eventually fall under a magical spell cast by the mischievous
Puck (Stanley Tucci), which helps the four mismatched lovers solve
their problems.  Also caught up in one of Puck's spells is Bottom
(Kevin Kline), an egotistical actor with an amateur theatrical company
which is rehearsing a play in the woods.
Hoffman's pacing is rather laboured, and the film offers
precious few laughs until the final twenty minutes or so.  It is only
with the staging of the play within a play sequence that things really
pick up, and some much needed life is injected into the film.
Visually, the film is quite beautiful, and Oliver Stapleton's
typically lush cinematography of the Tuscan countryside is a major
plus.
The performances of the solid ensemble cast are mostly
workmanlike throughout, with most of the performers reciting their
lines without much passion or conviction.  Kline is wonderful and
brings some energy to his role as the pompous and bombastic Bottom,
while the always solid Tucci shines as the mischievous Puck.
Shakespeare's comedy has been filmed before, most notably in
Warner Bros' impressive 1935 version featuring an all star cast headed
by James Cagney, making this pale and uninspired adaptation almost
unnecessary.

Title
Review for General, The (1998)
In recent years, director John Boorman's career has not
achieved the dizzy heights of either Point Blank or Deliverance.
However, his latest film is a well researched if slightly quirky
biopic of colourful Irish thief Martin Cahill, and heralds something
of a return to form for Boorman.  His assured and stylish direction
earned him the top prize at last year's Cannes Film Festival.
According to the production notes, the real Cahill once broke
into Boorman's home and stole, among other items, the gold record he
had been awarded for Duelling Banjo's, the theme from Deliverance.
Despite this, Boorman obviously has a lot of sympathy for Cahill.  He
paints him as something of a loveable larrikin, a kind of modern day
Irish Robin Hood, despite some of the more vicious acts he commits
along the way (crucifying one of his gang members on a billiard table,
for example).  The General is something of a labour of love for
Boorman, who has obviously spent plenty of time researching the life
and times of this colourful gangster.
This fascinating and unusually entertaining biopic traces
Cahill's life, from his early beginnings as a teenage thief in the
back streets of Hollyfield, a slum outside Dublin, through to his
assassination by the IRA in 1994.  Cahill earned the sobriquet of the
general for the way he commanded the loyalty of his small band of
thieves, and for the way in which he continually thumbed his nose at
the authorities.  Even though the police had him under blanket
surveillance, Cahill was often able to give them the slip and carry
out his cheeky crimes.  Cahill also had a cosy but unconventional
domestic arrangement in which he lived with his wife and her sister,
and even fathered children by both women.  Cahill had little time for
the divisive and violent politics of Ireland.  He was basically a
crook who robbed from the rich, but it was an art robbery that
ultimately proved his undoing.
Brendan Gleeson (from the recent I Went Down, etc) apparently
bears a resemblance to the real Cahill, and he gives a wonderfully
boisterous and enjoyable performance, and makes the most of his
biggest and best role yet.  He beautifully catches the inherent
contradictions in Cahill's character, lending an outrageous air of
irreverence to this off beat and at times acerbic portrait.  Jon
Voight also has many fine moments here as the weary police inspector
Kenny, increasingly frustrated at his impotence in bringing Cahill to
justice.
Seamus Deasy's cool black and white cinematography gives the
film something of a documentary feel, and also captures the look and
feel of those gritty British crime dramas of the '60's.

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
INSTINCT (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Jon Turteltaub
Stars: Anthony Hopkins, Cuba Gooding jr, Donald Sutherland, Maura 
Tierney, George Dzundza, John 
Ashton, John Aylward, Thomas Q Morris, Paul Bates.
In a role that can be considered a warm up rehearsal before
reprising his famous character of suave serial cannibal Hannibal
Lecter, Anthony Hopkins plays Ethan Powell, a renowned anthropologist
accused of murder.  For many years, Powell has lived amongst the
renowned silver back gorillas of Rwanda, observing them.  For some
reason this male equivalent of Dian Fossey snaps and brutally murders
two men.  Imprisoned in a hell hole in Rwanda, he has refused to speak
to anyone for two years.  This enigmatic scientist is then extradited
back to America, and imprisoned while awaiting an evaluation to
determine his competency to stand trial.
Eager young psychiatry student Theo Caulder (Cuba Gooding jr)
is assigned the task of breaking through the doctor's reticence and
silence and determining what happened in the jungles of Rwanda.
Powell challenges Caulder's perception of the world around him, and
somehow turns the tables on the fledgling psychiatrist.  He also
inspires Caulder to introduce a number of changes to the oppressive
prison system that negates the authority and abusive power of the
wardens and guards.  Instinct is a taut and occasionally riveting
psychological thriller that has its flaws.  Written by Gerald DiPego
(Phenomenon, etc), the film combines elements of Silence Of The Lambs,
Gorillas In The Mist and One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest with many of
the clichés of the prison movie.
 The plot is predictable, and the script is further let down by some
one dimensional characterisation and some clichéd dialogue.
However, Jon Turteltaub (Phenomenon, etc) directs the material with an
assurance that glosses over some of these flaws.  Some scenes bristle
with an almost palpable tension.  Hopkins and Gooding generate enough
sparks in their confrontations to bring some energy and a touch of
class to the film.  Hopkins is superb although he delivers a mannered
performance as the tormented scientist.  Scene stealer Gooding more
than holds his own here and delivers his usual polished performance.
Maura Tierney (Liar Liar, etc) has little to do as Powell's estranged
daughter, but she adds a touch of dignity and sympathy to her
performance.  Donald Sutherland plays Caulder mentor, a stereotyped
role that has almost become a staple of his repertoire.

Title
Review for One True Thing (1998)
Adapted from Anna Quindlen's acclaimed novel, One True Thing
is the latest film in the terminal disease cum moving women's
melodrama genre (Stepmom, Beaches, etc).  It's sure to have sensitive
audiences reaching for their tissues, while others will easily resist
its more cynically manipulative designs.
The film explores familiar territory, but first time screen
writer Karen Croner brings some rich emotional depths to the material.
The film is also an insightful exploration of the complex and
uncomfortable relationship between parents and their children.
Ellen Gulden (Renee Zellweger, from Jerry Maguire, etc) is
establishing her own career as a journalist in New York, when she
comes home for a family visit.  Ambitious, hard and unforgiving, Ellen
has always viewed these visits home as intolerable.  She has always
idolised her father George (William Hurt), a brilliant academic and
writer, while she looks down upon her mother Kate (Meryl Streep), who
has devoted her life to domestic duties and community work.
The family is stricken when Kate is diagnosed with terminal
cancer.  Ellen is reluctantly persuaded to put her career on hold and
remain home to care for her.  She eventually comes to view both her
family and the wider community from her mother's perspective, which
unexpectedly changes her own outlook.  She comes to appreciate her
mother's hidden strengths, while finally recognising her father's
flaws and failures.
One True Thing is a fairly downbeat experience, and there is
precious little relief from its litany of pain, suffering and misery.
It has all the elements of being a first class tearjerker, but this
potentially moving drama is let down by some lapses in judgement from
director Carl Franklin.  Better known for his superb crime thrillers
One False Move, Devil In A Blue Dress, Franklin seems a little
uncomfortable with the demands of this domestic drama.
Part of the problem lies in the clumsy structure, clearly a
hangover from the novel.  The film unfolds in a series of extended
flashbacks as Ellen relates the tragic story behind her mother's death
to the local district attorney.  This cumbersome device only serves to
slow down the film and interrupt the smooth flow of the devastating
emotional journey.
Franklin however seems more comfortable working with his
actors, and he draws marvellous performances from his three stars.
Streep is typically superb, and her beautifully understated
performance is both painfully realistic and moving.  Although Streep
was nominated for an Oscar, it is Zellweger who delivers the more
demanding performance.  Her character undergoes the greatest change
during the course of the movie, moving from vulnerability and awkward
lack of confidence to discover hidden reserves of strength.  Hurt is
effective in a more restrained, low key but intelligent performance.
Unfortunately, as Streep dies a slow and lingering death, the
film slowly dies along with her.  One True Thing ultimately seems far
too long to have the desired emotional impact, and many within the
audience will tire of the film well before its climactic revelation.

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
WILD WILD WEST (PG).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Stars: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, Ted Levine, 
M Emmett Walsh, Frederique van der Wal, Musetia Vander, Sofia Eng,
Bai Ling, Rodney A Grant
Running time: 106 minutes.
Hollywood again proves that it has lost the plot with yet
another misguided attempt at bringing a forgotten '60's tv series to
the screen.  Wild Wild West followed the exploits of a pair of secret
government agents who travelled across the wild frontier by train
thwarting threats against the country.  This big screen version
ultimately seems little more than a camp, second rate Bond-like
adventure set against the background of the old west.
From the outset, with its fresh, hip hop take on the familiar
theme music, it's clear that this new look Wild Wild West is far
removed from the original tv series, and clearly determined to follow
its own slightly modern path.  A horribly miscast Will Smith (Enemy Of
the People, etc) steps into the Robert Conrad role of James West,
President Grant's top secret agent.  Although the film is set in the
years immediately following the Civil War, the thought of a black man
venturing unobtrusively through the frontier and battling villainous
plots is a little too incredible to swallow.
The film is set in 1869, several years after the destructive
and divisive Civil War has left its scars on the fledgling nation's
psyche.  Long presumed dead, the embittered and crippled Dr Arliss
Loveless (Kenneth Branagh) re-emerges from hiding, driven by a
megalomaniacal lust for power.  He has conceived a preposterous plot
to dismantle the Union and return the various states to their previous
owners.  He has kidnapped several notable scientists, and forced them
to work on his ultimate weapon of mass destruction - actually a giant
mechanical spider which stomps across the frontier blasting towns into
oblivion - in the hope of blackmailing President Grant into agreeing
to his demands.
Enter West (Smith) and Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline), two of
Grant's top agents, who are forced into a reluctant partnership to
thwart Loveless's diabolical scheme.  West is an impulsive man of
action who shoots first, while Gordon is a more thoughtful but
somewhat eccentric agent, with a penchant for disguises and clever
inventions that are ahead of their time.  This odd couple pairing
follows a predictable formula, although their relationship brings an
almost contemporary sensibility to this unorthodox western.
The pair spark a number of laughs along the way, with plenty
of snappy one-liners and some risque humour.  The best gags though are
the visual ones, in particular a series of sly in-jokes depicting some
contemporary cultural icons.
The film starts off promisingly enough, but degenerates into
camp farce with the arrival of the legless Loveless and his amazon
army.  Branagh's performance is all corn-ball humour and dreary accent
and bad jokes, and he hardly establishes a menacing presence.
Smith brings an arrogant attitude to the role, but his
performance lends a contemporary flavour to the character.  Kline
actually plays a dual role here, appearing both as Gordon and as
President Grant, and he brings a nice comic edge to his performance.
Although Smith and Kline develop a good rapport and work well
together, they deserve better material.  The vivacious Salma Hayek is
wasted in thankless, exploitive role that doesn't really allow her to
do much.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld (Men In Black, etc) is a dab hand
with the spectacular effects and gimmickry on display, but somehow the
whole thing lacks credibility and a genuine sense of excitement.  With
this often silly mix of western action and high-tech gadgetry,
Sonnenfeld and his team of gun writers, which includes S S Wilson and
Brent Maddock (Short Circuit, etc) and Jeffrey Price and Peter S
Seaman (Who Framed Roger Rabbit?, etc), seem unsure of their target
audience.  Like the B-grade, megalomaniacal Bond villain of the piece,
this lame attempt to revive the '60's television series lacks any sort
of legs, and fails to last the distance.  Tame tame west is more like
it!

Title
Review for Love and Death on Long Island (1997)
From first time writer/director Richard Kwietniowski comes
this droll, delightfully entertaining and dry fish out of water tale.
Based on Gilbert Adair's cult novel, long thought to be unfilmable,
Love And Death On Long Island is also a contemporary, lightweight
reworking of Death In Venice, albeit with a far more comic bent.
Giles De 'Ath (John Hurt) is a reclusive, high brow British
novelist, who disdains much of the technology of the twentieth
century.  His home is devoid of many of the devices that most of us
take for granted, and he still punches out his stories on an old
manual type writer.  "I'm a writer.  I write.  I don't process words,"
he says tartly in a rare radio interview.  But he is reluctantly
dragged into the twentieth century when he sees a dreadful American
teen movie by mistake.
One day when he accidentally locks himself out of his flat,
Giles wanders into the local multiplex, hoping to see an E M Forster
adaptation.  He wanders into the wrong cinema and instead finds
himself watching Hotpants College II, a dreadful adolescent comedy
that makes Porky's look sophisticated.  He is about to walk out when
he sees Ronnie Bostock (Beverley Hills 90210's Jason Priestley) in a
bit part.  He becomes obsessed with the handsome young actor.  Before
long, Giles is tracking down his earlier films, with equally dire
titles like Skid Marks and Tex Mex, and learning everything he can
about Bostock from reading teen magazines.
Eventually he makes an uncharacteristic decision, and flies
off to Long Island to try and track down Bostock.  It is the beginning
of a strange and unusual, but ultimately doomed, friendship between
the articulate and witty De 'Ath and the handsome but gormless Ronnie.
Giles also tries to prevent Ronnie from marrying his long time girl
friend Audrey (Fiona Loewi).
Love And Death is a poignant and comic fable about a
magnificent obsession.  But the film also explores the clash of
cultures - between the older generation and the young, between Britain
and America, and between the literary world and the shallow
pretensions of the movie industry.  There are some wonderful scenes as
De 'Ath comes to terms with the bewildering technology of the
twentieth century.  There is another hilarious scene when the
supercilious author wanders into a video store to check out some of
Bostock's previous works, much to the bemusement and glee of the
clerk.
But the film seems to come to an abrupt, almost unsatisfactory
conclusion, and it seems as though Kwietniowski had no idea how to
resolve this painfully doomed mismatch.
Hurt has made a career of playing eccentrics, and he is
magnificent here.  His usually pained expression works a treat, and
gives his least mannered performance for quite some time.  He seems to
revel in the sly, acerbic dialogue.  And while the pompous Giles finds
himself in some embarrassing situations, Hurt never allows him to
become a ridiculous figure.  Priestley's film career has not exactly
been a success, but he seems quite comfortable with his role as the
male bimbo, and enjoys this opportunity to send up his own image.

Title
Review for Blue Streak (1999)
Martin Lawrence (Bad Boys, etc) has always been something of a
second rate Eddie Murphy wannabe, lacking charm, charisma and the same
assured style.  His latest film, the tailor-made action comedy Blue
Streak, is his second rate Beverly Hills Cop try hard.
Lawrence plays Miles Logan, a thief, who hides a valuable
diamond in a building site after a carefully planned robbery goes
wrong when one of his team gets greedy.  After two years in prison,
Logan returns to the construction site hoping to recover the diamond.
Unfortunately the building is now the home of a new LAPD precinct.  As
Logan discovers to his dismay, there are only two types of people who
enter beyond its high tech security - those wearing handcuffs or those
carrying them.
In a desperate attempt to get inside the building and recover
the diamond Logan poses as a detective.  But due to a misunderstanding
he is accepted as the new lead detective for the department, and
becomes a reluctant cop.  His maverick attitude and street smarts,
shaped by years of criminal experience, make him a good cop, and he
quickly impresses his superiors and his dim-witted, rookie partner
(Luke Wilson).
Blue Streak becomes merely another formulaic odd couple, buddy
cop pairing, which relies heavily upon Lawrence's irreverent talents
to carry its uninspired scenario along.  However, director Les
Mayfield (Encino Man, the recent Flubber, etc) has little control over
the antics of his narcissistic star, and seems to have little idea of
the demands of this overworked genre.  Lawrence's unfunny mugging and
raucous routines are overbearing, dull, and at times a little
excessive, particularly in the scene in which he does a two minute rap
dance.
The film moves between slapstick comedy and fast paced action,
with lots of chases and shoot-outs, little of which is entirely
believable or particularly original.  Blue Streak is something of an
uneven mess, a result of the unsatisfactory fusion of the three
distinct styles of its different writers.  The basic premise itself is
full of holes, and not even Lawrence's irritating presence can
distract from its ludicrous nature.
The ending itself makes little sense, dramatically or
logically.  Many in the audience may have a problem with the film's
message that crime does sometimes pay.  While this device may
sometimes work (especially when the criminal is played by a likeable
and charismatic actor), here it merely grates because of Lawrence's
overbearing and basically unlikeable persona and our lack of empathy
for him.
Nonetheless, there are plenty of fans out there who will
undoubtedly lap up this substandard effort!

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
EDTV (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Ron Howard
Stars: Matthew McConaughey, Jenna Elfman, Woody Harrelson, Ellen 
DeGeneres, Martin Landau, Sally 
Kellerman, Bob Reiner, Elizabeth Hurley, Clint Howard, Dennis Hopper, 
Viveka Davis, Adam Goldebrg, 
Robert Pastoriza, Harry Shearer, Jay Leno, RuPaul, Michael Moore, Gedde 
Watanabe
Running time: 123 minutes. 
A man has his life broadcast to an eager television audience,
twenty-four hours a day.  This premise sounds remarkably similar to
last year's brilliant The Truman Show.  (It is also a concept that the
ABC embraced with its warts-and-all reality-based documentary series
Sylvania Waters a decade ago.)  Although Edtv may recall The Truman
Show, it is actually based on a little known 1994 French/Canadian film
entitled Louis 19: Le Roi Des Ondes (Louis 19: King Of The Airwaves).
What also separates Edtv from The Truman Show is that, in this comedy,
the central character is fully aware of the intrusive presence of the
cameras from the start.
Cable station True TV is struggling in the ratings, even being
beaten by The Gardening Channel, and the programming executives decide
to beef up their image.  They decide to follow one ordinary person's
life on camera, twenty-four hours a day, live, unrehearsed, unscripted
and unedited.  Video store clerk Ed Pekurney (Matthew McConaughey,
from Lone Star, A Time To Kill, etc) is chosen from the audition
tapes, mainly because of his down to earth charm, his sex appeal and
his goof ball sense of humour.  Unexpectedly, Ed becomes a sensation,
and the audience for this reality based family soap opera grows.  But
under the unflinching scrutiny of the tv cameras, a number of
skeletons start rattling out of the Pekurney family closet.  Network
executives are also only too willing to manufacture events in Ed's
life to increase audience interest and thus further boost their
ratings.
Ed finds himself initially swept away by the euphoria of his
sudden popularity, until he discovers that being a celebrity carries
its own baggage.  This is a theme that Woody Allen explored with
limited success in his recent, occasionally self indulgent Celebrity.
Edtv brings irony and cutting wit to its cynical exploration of the
intrusive nature of the media, and the powerfully persuasive and
seductive nature of fame.  This clever film also explores how the
media exploits the American public's insatiable desire to know even
the most salacious details of the lives of celebrities.
Edtv reunites director Ron Howard with his two favourite
writers Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel, who previously wrote Splash
and Parenthood for him, but the creative team seem to have stumbled
occasionally with their latest collaboration.  Howard is usually a
director with a keen gift for storytelling combined with astute
commercial instincts.  Those gifts seem to have deserted him a little
here.  Howard makes his salient points well enough, but then proceeds
to bludgeon them with sledgehammer-like subtlety.  Many scenes seem
unnecessarily repetitive, and the film could have been tightened up
considerably in the editing room.  There are also a number of ideas
that fall flat and lead nowhere in particular, contributing to the
film's bloated look.
As usual, Howard has assembled a top notch cast, who deliver
solid performances under his assured direction.  McConaughey is very
likeable and appealing, and he makes Ed an attractive and sympathetic
character.  Woody Harrelson delivers a solid performance as Ed's
sleazy, narcissistic brother Ray, while Martin Landau and Sally
Kellerman (from MASH, etc) lend some much needed sympathy to their
roles as Ed's parents.  Ellen De Generes is marvellous as Cynthia, the
tv executive who develops a conscience, while tv star Jenna Elfman
(Dharma And Greg) brings some depth to her role as Shari, Ed's girl
friend who finds she cannot handle the pressure of living her life in
the media spotlight.
Edtv has a much lighter tone than Peter Weir's similarly
themed film, and it will likely appeal more to those audiences who
couldn't embrace the concept behind his intelligent and imaginative
vision.

Title
Review for Comedian Harmonists (1997)
COMEDIAN HARMONISTS (M).  
(Champion Films/Sharmill Films)
Director: Joseph Vilsmaier
Stars: Ben Becker, Heino Ferch, Ulrich Noethen, Heinrich Schafmeister,
Max Tidof, Kai Wiesenger, Meret Becker, Katja Riemann, Dan Vavrova,
Noemi Fischer, Susi Nicoletti, Rudolf Wessely, Rolf Hoppe, Otto
Sander, Jurgen Scornagel, Gunter Lamprecht
Running time: 125 minutes
(German, with English subtitles).
Like the famous musical von Trapp family, the Comedian
Harmonists were a popular vocal group who were eventually forced to
flee Germany in the 1930's to escape the tyranny of the Nazi regime.
In this epic story, writer/director Joseph Vilsmaier (the
visually lush but dull Brother Of Sleep, etc) traces the rise of this
vocal sextet, one of the most popular bands of the 1920's and 1930's.
This lavishly produced biopic follows the band's history, from its
humble beginnings amid the night-clubs, cafes and brothels of Berlin
to its resounding international success and its eventual break-up,
forced by Hitler's vicious anti-Semitic policies.
This beautifully constructed and provocative musical has vague
echoes of the classic Sound Of Music.  But it also has echoes of the
darker Cabaret, as it explores the more sinister aspects of the rise
of Nazism during the decadent 1920's and economically depressed
1930's.
Comedian Harmonists opens in 1927, with unemployed musician
and arranger Harry Frommermann (Ulrich Noethen) assembling the sextet,
with the help of ambitious singer Robert Biberti (Ben Becker).  The
band drew heavily on the vocal style of US bands like The Revellers,
but injected a touch of humour into their rendition of popular, bawdy
tunes.  A number of important subplots explore the changing political
climate of Germany and detail the growing internal pressures on the
band as racial and sexual tensions surface.  The Jewish Harry and
blond Aryan Robert vie for the attentions of Erna (Meret Becker), a
beautiful young student who works as an assistant in a record shop.
External pressure is also brought to bear on the group, as the
Nazi authorities want the band to either get rid of the three Jewish
members or perform tunes written by more acceptable writers.  The band
thought that their reputation and international fame would protect
them from the intolerant and ignorant racial policies of Hitler's
regime, but they were wrong.
The darker, more troubling events of the film are offset by
some beautifully arranged musical numbers, drawn from re-mastered
versions of the original recordings.  The production values and
staging are all fabulous.  Vilsmaier, who is also the cinematographer,
has an eye for detail, and visually the film is quite sumptuous and
rich.  His recreation of the decadent Berlin of the 1920's is
stunning.  The performances from the superb ensemble cast are all
perfectly pitched at the right level.  A superbly crafted and lavishly
produced film, Comedian Harmonists is an enjoyable, and ultimately
moving cinematic experience.

Title
Review for Affliction (1997)
AFFLICTION (M).  
(Village Roadshow)
Director: Paul Schrader
Stars: Nick Nolte, James Coburn, Sissy Spacek, Willem Dafoe, Mary Beth 
Hurt, Jim True, Homes Osborne, Brigid Tierney, Marian Seldes, Sean McCann,
Wayne Robson, Brawley Nolte
Running time: 114 minutes.
Adapted from the novel by Russell Banks (The Sweet Hereafter,
etc), Affliction is a powerful, dramatic tale that looks at the
disturbing pattern of male violence, and explores how this brutal
legacy is often passed on from father to son.
The pathology of male violence is a theme common to much of
writer/director Paul Schrader's work (Taxi Driver, Raging Bull, Blue
Collar, etc), but rarely has it been tackled in such uncompromising
and potent style before.  Schrader seems to understand these
characters and their motivations, and his sympathetic and insightful
handling results in a compelling and hauntingly poignant character
study, that is both chillingly realistic and deeply disturbing.
Wade Whitehouse (Nick Nolte) is the sheriff of Lawford, a
depressed and sleepy New Hampshire hamlet.  Reduced to being little
more than a glorified traffic cop, he is increasingly frustrated by
his demeaning role.  He holds the job purely at the whim of the town's
corrupt and oily businessman (Homes Osborne).  Wade's impending
divorce grows ugly and bitter, the relationship between him and his
daughter grows more strained and distant, and a massive toothache is
causing him pain.  Wade turns a hunting accident into a murder
investigation, in an attempt to distract his attention away from the
real causes of his anger and frustration.
Wade's problems lie in his relationship with his father ('60's
action star James Coburn, cast largely against type).  For a long
time, the young Wade (played by Nolte's own son Brawley) absorbed the
full force of the brutal punishment dished out by his drunken, abusive
father, to protect his mother and younger siblings.  Younger brother
Rolph (Willem Dafoe, who provides the voice over narration) escaped
this brutal environment, but reluctantly returns home briefly
following the death of their mother.  The reunion is overshadowed by
the intimidating presence of their father and his violent legacy.  The
emotionally crippled Wade sees himself becoming more and more like his
father, and finally takes drastic action to exorcise his personal
demons and find salvation.
Affliction unfolds like a low burning fuse as it works its way
towards the inevitable explosion.  Nolte is superb as the put-upon
Wade who is slow to understand the true nature of his affliction.  In
one of his best, most heartfelt and moving performances in a long
time, he brings a sense of sympathy and compassion to his complex
character.
In his Oscar winning role, Coburn perfectly nails the abusive,
domineering, contemptuous and unforgiving father, who bemoans the loss
of real, hard men in a society growing soft.  He is a monstrous
figure, but somehow Coburn gives the character a surprisingly human
dimension and depth.  Sissy Spacek makes the most of her smaller role
as Wade's waitress girlfriend, who finally decides to leave this
volatile relationship before tragedy strikes.
Affliction explores many themes common to Banks' work -
dysfunctional families, psychologically damaged men, the tense
relationship between fathers and their children, small towns with dark
secrets, difficult moral dilemmas - all set against the coldness of an
unforgiving, snow covered landscape.  The harsh, wintry landscape is
almost a character in the story, and somehow adds to the chilling
atmosphere that pervades the film.
Like the recent American History X, Affliction is an important
film dealing with a serious theme, and deserves to be seen.  However,
this bleak film has proved difficult for its local distributors, who
clearly had no idea how to market it and were going to release it
straight to video.
   
***1/2
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Divorcing Jack (1998)
DIVORCING JACK (M).  
(NewVision)
Director: David Caffrey
Stars: David Thewlis, Rachel Griffiths, Robert Lindsay, Richard Gant, 
Laine Megaw, Laura Fraser, Alan McKee, Jason Isaacs
Running time: 106 minutes.
This violent, zany and blackly comic thriller, adapted from
Colin Bateman's widely acclaimed novel, is set against the background
of contemporary Northern Ireland, besieged by chaos, violence and
unrest.  However, Divorcing Jack is closer in spirit to the brilliant
The Crying Game rather than the dry political polemics of Jim Sheridan
(In The Name Of The Father, etc).  The clever title doesn't really
tell audiences what to expect from this film, which deftly plays
around with the conventions of several genres.
The film is set in 1999, which assures us that, at least for
the moment, the events are fictitious.  Ireland is approaching an
election, and the front running candidate for the post of prime
Minister is Michael Brinn (Robert Lindsay), a suave, charismatic Tony
Blair-like politician running on a peace platform.  Enter Dan Starkey
(David Thewlis, from Mike Leigh's Naked, etc), a cynical,
wise-cracking, hard drinking, womanising newspaper columnist.  On the
way to a party one night Dan befriends pretty young art student
Margaret (Laura Fraser).  His wife Patricia (Laine Megaw) throws him
out of the house, and Dan temporarily moves into Margaret's loft
apartment.
The domestic comedy of the film's first half hour hardly
prepares the audience for the unexpected twists that the plot
unexpectedly takes.  One night Dan arrives at the apartment, only to
find Margaret brutally murdered.  Suddenly, Dan finds himself on the
run, wanted for murder and other unspecified crimes.  He is hunted by
the authorities and gun toting hitmen from both sides of the political
spectrum.  It seems that Dan has inadvertently come into possession of
some incriminating evidence that could blow the election wide open,
and set the peace process back years.  His only ally in this dangerous
world is Lee (Aussie actress Rachel Griffiths), a nurse who doubles as
a stripping nun by night.
First time feature director David Caffrey injects a wicked
stream of anarchic humour into the inventive and exhausting roller
coaster plot, eschewing the usual political commentary and social
criticism for bullets, bombs and car chases.  This slightly
unconventional film possesses a subversive spirit, a boisterous style
and energy to spare.  As the film rockets along, Caffrey deliberately
keeps the audience as off balance as Starkey.
Bateman's colourful, quirky characters are brought vividly to
life by a strong cast.  Cast largely against type, Thewlis makes the
most of his showiest role for ages as the wise cracking reluctant
hero.  His energetic performance, his abrasive humour, and droll
narration provides the film with much of its ironic tone.  When
Griffiths' character declares "I haven't had so much fun in years,"
you can almost believe she is speaking from the heart.
Divorcing Jack makes for a perversely entertaining film.
Although decidedly scrappy in parts, it marks a promising debut from
Caffrey, a young director who displays more energy and flair here than
a handful of other first time film makers combined.

Title
Review for Still Crazy (1998)

Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
X-Questions-to: movie-rev-mod@www.ee.washington.edu
X-Submissions-to: movie-reviews@www.ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #17838
Keywords: author=king
Author: Greg King 
Subject: Review: Still Crazy (1998)
STILL CRAZY (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Brian Gibson
Stars: Stephen Rea, Jimmy Nail, Billy Connolly, Timothy Spall, Bill
Nighy, Juliet Aubrey, Hans Matheson, Helena Bergstrom, Rachel
Stirling, Bruce Robinson, Zoe Ball
Running time: 96 minutes.
The '90's has seen a resurgence of interest in '70's music,
and bands long considered musical dinosaurs have gained a new lease of
life.  Even many bands that broke up amid acrimony and bitterness,
swearing never to reform until hell freezes over, have buried the
hatchet to cash in on the nostalgia kick.  One such group is (the
entirely fictitious) Strange Fruit, a seminal '70's British band, who
disbanded after a disastrous show at an outdoor concert in 1978.  The
members all went their own way, most of them settling into mundane
nine to five jobs.  Only lead singer Ray (Bill Nighy) has maintained a
largely unsuccessful solo career, under the watchful eye of his
domineering and fiery Scandinavian wife Astrid (Helena Bergstrom).
Tired of refilling condom vending machines on the Spanish
peninsula, former keyboard player Tony Costello (Stephen Rea) has the
idea to reform the band for a twenty year reunion tour.  He tracks
down the other members of the band and brings them together for the
first time in two decades.  Guitarist Les (Jimmy Nail, from tv series
Crocodile Shoes, etc) has established a successful roofing contract
business.  Drummer Beano Baggot (Timothy Spall, from Secrets And Lies,
etc, in a role initially intended for Billy Connolly) runs a nursery
business and tries to evade the Internal revenue service.
Fuelled by nostalgic memories of sex, drugs and rock 'n' roll,
the band heads off on a tour of small European venues.  They
desperately try to refine their old stage act and get it together
before they make a triumphant return to the very same venue at which
they played their last gig.  They learn that the industry has changed
drastically during their absence.  It's also a shock to hear potential
groupies comment on how much their fathers adored the band back in the
'70's.  Eventually, all the old resentments resurface, most of them
directed at the posturing, selfish Ray, and threaten to tear the band
apart all over again.
Initially, Still Crazy seems to suggest another hilarious piss
take on the rock and roll lifestyle a la Spinal Tap, but this funny
movie follows a different tack.  Still Crazy is not exactly exploring
virgin territory here, but it does bring some fresh comic twists,
bittersweet moments and hard truths to the old familiar rock 'n' roll
clichés.  Still Crazy will appeal strongly to the over thirty
crowd, who may well get a kick out of the film, and have fun
identifying some of the thinly veiled pop references along the way.
Still Crazy boasts a solid rock pedigree, with new songs
written by Mick Jones (of Foreigner fame) and Jeff Lynne (from ELO,
etc).  Gary Kemp, the ex-Spandau Ballet member and part time actor,
even taught the actors how to move on stage like the seasoned rockers
they are supposed to be.  Veteran British comedy writing team of Dick
Clement and Ian La Frenais also gave us the marvellous The
Commitments, while director Brian Gibson previously explored the
precarious rock world with the superb Tina Turner biopic What's Love
Got To Do With It?
The ensemble cast bring a potent mixture of weariness,
cynicism and new found enthusiasm to their roles.  Bruce Robinson,
director of the cult classic Withnail And I, contributes a brief
appearance as a former member of the band.  For this band of aged
rockers, preparing to take on the world again and relive their glory
days, the flame does indeed still burn.

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
BEING JOHN MALKOVICH (M).  
(Polygram/Universal/UIP)
Director: Spike Jonze
Stars: John Cusack, Cameron Diaz, Catherine Keener, John Malkovich,
Mary Kay Place, Orson Bean, Charlie Sheen, W Earl Brown, Carlos
Jacott, Willie Garson, Byrne Piven, Gregory Sporlender, Reggie Hayes
Running time: 113 minutes.
Rarely have the ideas of a writer and the creative vision of a
director been so in synch as with this delightfully off beat and
surreal black comedy about an out of work puppeteer who discovers a
mysterious portal into the head of actor John Malkovich.  What is even
more surprising is that Being John Malkovich is the first feature film
from both writer Charlie Kaufman and director Spike Jonze, better
known for his rock video clips for artists such as the Beastie Boys,
Fat Boy Slim and REM.
Unemployed puppeteer Craig Schwartz (John Cusack) is pushed
into finding a real job by his animal loving wife Lotte (an
unrecognisable Cameron Diaz).  He ends up working as a filing clerk
for a firm buried away in an office stranded on the legendary 71/2
floor, located halfway between the seventh and eighth floor of a city
office block.  One day he discovers a boarded up door behind a row of
filing cabinets.  Intrigued he enters the door, only to find himself
inside a tunnel that somehow transports him into the head of noted
American thespian John Malkovich (Dangerous Liaisons, etc).
When he tells his colleague Maxine (a perfectly bitchy
Catherine Keener, from 8MM, etc) about the secret portal, she decides
to turn it into a business and charge people for the rare opportunity
to enter someone else's mind.  An unusual sexual triangle also
develops between Schwartz, his wife Lotte and Maxine, with Malkovich
himself reluctantly caught in the middle.
Malkovich even proves that he is a good sport with his
enthusiastic participation in this film.  When he was offered the
script, Malkovich could easily have run the other way, but instead he
sends up his normally intense and serious persona with rare relish.
The scene in which Malkovich uses the portal to enter inside his own
head is the most outlandish moment in a film crammed full of unusual
ideas, outrageous plot elements and unexpected developments.
Unfortunately not everything in the film is completely successful, and
some moments fall a little flat.
Being John Malkovich is a film of dark comic genius that asks
audiences to consider what they would do if they could be someone
else, even if only for fifteen minutes at a time.  Kaufman's absurd
but sharp and cleverly written script draws a potent link between sex,
power and manipulation, but there is also something of a nasty streak
to its eccentric sense of humour.  Given its bizarre premise, this
decidedly quirky comedy could have been a first class disaster, but
first time director Jonze handles the material with an assurance and
inventiveness that somehow makes it all work.  Cusack brings a manic
energy to his role that seems to propel the film along nicely.  Jonze
has cleverly cast his actors against type, thus subverting audience's
expectations for much of the film.  There are also brief cameos from
the likes of Brad Pitt, Sean Penn and others, that add a certain stamp
of authenticity to the bizarre chain of events.
Being John Malkovich is a surprisingly inventive film that
stuffs in more original ideas than most other films this year.  It is
certainly one of 1999's most unusual and challenging, yet surprisingly
enjoyable films.

Title
Review for Baby Geniuses (1999)
Baby Co annually spends millions of dollars in
experimentation, research and development, aimed at trying to
understand the intelligence of early childhood and artificially create
super intelligent babies.  The corporation is headed by the ruthless
Elena Kinder (Kathleen Turner), who is prepared to do anything to
conclude her research.  The company owns a string of orphanages, which
provide her with an endless supply of research material.
As part of a controlled experiment, enabling her to compare
early growth under her laboratory methods as opposed to an ordinary
childhood, Elena has secretly separated identical twin boys Sly and
Whit.  In a seemingly magnanimous gesture she gives Whit to her niece
(Kim Cattrall) and husband Peter Bobbitt (Ally McBeal's Peter
MacNicol), a childless couple.  Peter is also a researcher with an
interest in early childhood development, but he lacks the technology
and scientific tools at her disposal.
But Elena's plans begin to unravel.  Sly manages to escape
from the laboratory and hides out in a local mall, where he and Whit
accidentally cross paths.  Kinder's goons kidnap the wrong child,
while Sly goes home with the Bobbitts.  The film climaxes as the
clever kids stage a desperate rescue within the gigantic Baby Co HQ.
Although the film has a rather silly premise, Baby Geniuses is
technically quite clever and moderately entertaining.  Unlike the
increasingly tiresome Look Who's Talking series, director Bob Clark
(Porky's, etc) takes advantage of the latest in computer generated
animation technology to make it seem as though the babies are actually
talking.  Much of their dialogue and many of their jokes will probably
go right over the head of younger audiences though!  Clark directs the
material with his usual lack of subtlety.
Turner and Christopher Lloyd enter into the spirit of
proceedings, and both overact hysterically, while MacNicol and
Cattrall bring more restraint to their performances.  The Fitzgerald
triplets play twins Sly and Whit, while child star Miko Hughes
(Mercury Rising, etc) provides their voices.
Most of the winning charm of this decidedly low brow film
derives from the antics of the two- year olds with attitude.  The
tykes effortlessly combine brawn and brain, and they also perform
complex martial arts and dance floor moves with remarkable ease.
Touches of Home Alone-like slapstick humour and low level violence and
some neat sight gags will entertain the youngsters, while the sly
movie parodies and one-liners will please older audiences.

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
SLEEPY HOLLOW (M).  
(Mandalay Entertainment/Paramount/Village Roadshow)
Director: Tim Burton
Stars: Johnny Depp, Christina Ricci, Miranda Richardson, Michael
Gambon, Casper Van Dien, Jeffrey Jones, Richard Griffiths, Ian
McDiarmid, Michael Gough, Lisa Marie, Marc Pickering, Steve
Waddington, Christopher Walken, Christopher Lee, Alun Armstrong,
Martin Landau (uncredited)
Running time: 118 minutes.
Enjoyable, atmospherically staged period horror drama about a
small upstate New York town terrorised by a headless horseman.
Writers Andrew Kevin Walker (Seven, 8MM, etc) and Kevin Yagher bring
something of a contemporary flavour, generous doses of black humour,
and plenty of gore to Irving Washington's classic story of 19th
century horror and spooky happenings.
In this superbly crafted homage to those classic old Hammer
horror films from the '60's, director Tim Burton beautifully captures
the same atmospheric look and feel, albeit it on a larger budget.
Visually, Burton's films have always been quite striking, and Sleepy
Hollow is no exception, with solid technical contributions.  Rick
Heinrichs' suitably gothic production design, Emmanuel Lubezki's
evocative cinematography and Danny Elfman's haunting music score
combine to effectively create the gloomy, fog shrouded and menacing
setting of Sleepy Hollow, a quaint, upstate New York town besieged by
supernatural killings and fear.
When a number of citizens of Sleepy Hollow are beheaded,
modern thinking New York constable Ichabod Crane (Johnny Depp) is sent
to investigate.  Crane prefers to use rigorous scientific methods to
solve crimes, and doesn't particularly believe in ghouls and goblins,
or even the legend of the headless horseman, which has filled the
locals with dread.  He suspects a human hand at work rather than
supernatural forces.  But even his beliefs are shaken by the strange
events that have possessed this once quiet hamlet, now seemingly in
the grip of witchcraft.
In his third collaboration with director Burton (Ed Wood and
Edward Scissorhands), Depp gives a fabulous performance, tinged with a
hint of ironic humour at his character's expense.  Depp marvellously
captures the contradictions inherent in Crane, a man who autopsies
dead bodies for clues, yet faints at the sight of beheaded corpses and
shrinks from the sight of spiders.  Christina Ricci vamps it up nicely
as the bewitching Katrina Van Tassel, while Miranda Richardson brings
a deliciously evil edge to her role as Katrina's step mother.
Christopher Walken contributes a brief appearance as the
legendary headless horseman, although most of his fight scenes are
doubled by former stunt man Ray Parks (recently seen as Darth Maul in
The Phantom Menace).  Burton has also filled his cast with an ensemble
of British character actors (including Michael Gambon, Michael Gough,
Star Wars' Ian McDiarmid, Richard Griffiths), who lend a touch of
credence to their roles as the elders of the town who all have secrets
to conceal.  Even Hammer stalwart Christopher Lee turns up in a brief
cameo as New York's intimidating magistrate.
          Sleepy Hollow is enjoyable enough for most of its length, but
it seems to run out of ideas by the end, and its finale is a little
messy.  There are also one or two decapitations too many.  It's a
great cinematic trick to begin with, but it starts to lose its novelty
value by the third or fourth time.

Title
Review for Dangerous Beauty (1998)
A DESTINY OF HER OWN (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Marshall Herskovitz
Stars: Catherine McCormack, Rufus Sewell, Oliver Platt, Moira Kelly, 
Naomi Watts, Jacqueline Bissett, 
Fred Ward, Jake Weber, Jeroen Krabbe, Joanna Cassidy, Daniel Lapaine, 
Simon Dutton, Peter Eyre, 
Justine Miceli
Running time: 112 minutes.
In overseas markets, A Destiny Of Her Own is also known as
Dangerous Beauty, a stronger and far more appropriate title.
This elaborate historical melodrama is set in the decadent
Venice of the late 16th century, when women were still treated as
second class citizens.  Only the courtesans, in essence highly paid
hookers, were well read and educated.  They were also permitted access
to areas, such as libraries, normally off limits to ordinary women.
In the bedroom, the courtesans had the ear of kings, bishops and many
of the wealthiest and most powerful men in society, and often
influenced policy decisions.  "A courtesan is a force of nature,
cloaked in civility," explains Jacqueline Bissett.
This glossy, visually sumptuous period piece looks at the life
and fortunes of Veronica Franco (Catherine McCormack, from Braveheart,
etc), one of the most famous of Venice's courtesans.  Although
Veronica is in love with the handsome Marco Vernier (Rufus Sewell),
she cannot marry him because she is below his noble station.  His
parents have arranged a more fitting marriage, for the good of the
family fortune and the stability of Venice, of course.  Veronica's
mother (Bissett), a former courtesan herself, trains her in the
bedroom skills that will enable her to enter this hypocritical
male-dominated world and have access to a life style that would
normally have been denied her.  There's plenty of wit, sex, nudity,
scandal and courtly intrigue in this bawdy, spirited, overdone yet
moderately entertaining costume drama.  Not content to explore the lot
of the beautiful heroine, writer Jeannine Dominy also throws the
plague, the inquisition, and a witchcraft trial into the busy drama.
Somehow, A Destiny Of Her Own tends to lose focus towards the end.
The film has a beautiful chocolate box quality, thanks to
Czech cinematographer Bojan Bazelli, who gives the film a glossy
surface.  The costumes, impressive set design and gorgeous locations
also add to the rich texture, and bring the period to life.  However,
the computer generated recreation of 16th century Venice becomes a
little obvious on the big screen.  Director Marshall Herskovitz hails
from a background in television drama (thirtysomething, Family), and
his direction here becomes a little pedestrian and betrays his
origins.
The cast throw themselves into this period romp with a sense
of abandon that adds energy to proceedings.  McCormack brings a
contemporary flavour to her role as the feisty, intelligent heroine.
In a rare screen appearance, Bissett brings a touch of class to her
role as her sympathetic mother.  Sewell is good as the brooding
aristocratic Marco, while the very busy Oliver Platt (The Impostors,
Bulworth, etc) provides some humour as the quick witted court poet
Maffio with whom Veronica has some entertaining clashes.  Veterans
Jeroen Krabbe, Fred Ward and Joanna Cassidy are wasted in undemanding,
throwaway roles.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
THE THIN RED LINE (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Terrence Malick
Stars: Sean Penn, Nick Nolte, Jim Caviezel, John Cusack, Elias Koteas, 
Woody Harrelson, Ben Chaplin, 
Jared Leton, Adrien Brody, George Clooney, John C Reilly, John Travolta, 
John Savage, Arie Verveen, 
Dash Mihok
Running time: 171 minutes.
Writer/director Terrence Malick can hardly be called prolific.
He made only two films (the critically acclaimed Badlands and Days Of
Heaven) in the mid-'70's, before taking a self imposed twenty year
hiatus from Hollywood.  His first film in two decades is one of the
most eagerly anticipated cinema events this side of the new Star Wars
film.  While it is certainly visually impressive, Malick's The Thin
Red Line is something of a disappointment, especially when compared
with Spielberg's achievement in the recent devastating and
unforgettable Saving Private Ryan.
Based on the novel by James Jones, The Thin Red Line deals
with US forces fighting the Japanese army at Guadalcanal, a bitter and
costly campaign that became one of the turning points of W.W.II.
However, Malick's epic war film is a different animal to Spielberg's.
Unlike Spielberg, Malick doesn't immediately hurtle us into the
inferno of battle.  Instead, he lulls us into the brutality of war
through an extended prologue.  Witt (Jim Caviezel), an AWOL soldier,
lives in short-lived tranquillity in a peaceful native village
somewhere in the Pacific.  He becomes part of the massive US landing
force at Guadalcanal.
The film's centrepiece is the extended and savage campaign to
destroy Japanese machine gun fortifications and take a crucial hill.
This often graphic and quite harrowing battle occupies over half of
the film's three hour running time.  However, the action lacks the
intensity and ferocity of Spielberg's recreation of the fury of
warfare.  It also seems to lack that gritty air of authenticity that
seemed to effectively suck audiences into the maelstrom.
The combat scenes give the audience the extremes of heroism.
But Malick is also concerned with showing the madness of battle
fatigue, and the film depicts the senseless loss of life and futile
carnage of the war.  The Thin Red Line is almost a profound and almost
poetic meditation on the nature of war and how it poisons man's soul.
There's nothing noble about this bloody conflict, and, ultimately,
there are no winners.  The film was shot on location, partly in
tropical far north Queensland as well as in the Solomon Islands.
Such is Malick's reputation that he had a veritable who's who
of Hollywood queuing up for small roles, including John Travolta, John
Cusack, Woody Harrelson, George Clooney, and Sean Penn.
Unfortunately, though, few of the characters leave a lasting impact on
the audience, and I found that I didn't really care about them or
their fate.  Nick Nolte is dynamic as the obsessed and driven colonel
who relishes his first opportunity to fight a war after fifteen years
in the army, and who doesn't care how many men have to lose their
lives in securing a vital strategic position.  Caviezel brings a human
face to the film as Witt, the reluctant soldier who ultimately becomes
a hero when tested in battle.
The Thin Red Line is certainly Malick's most epic and
ambitious film to date, and it is as meticulously crafted and
evocative as his previous work.  He gives this war film an almost
elegiac quality and a rare humanity.  His sweeping vision is
complemented by the spectacularly gorgeous cinematography of dual
Oscar winner John Toll and the haunting score from Hans Zimmer.

Title
Review for Without Limits (1998)
WITHOUT LIMITS (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Robert Towne
Stars: Billy Crudup, Donald Sutherland, Monica Potter, Jeremy Sisto, 
Matthew Lillard, Gabe Olds, Judith 
Ivey, Dean Norris, Billy Burke, Adam Setliff, Nicholas Oleson, William 
Mapowther
Running time: 118 minutes.
For a long time, Tom Cruise has been interested in making a
biopic about Steve Prefontaine, the champion American distance runner
who was killed in a car crash at the age of 24.  In the early pre-
production stages, Cruise was even attached to the role.  However, his
involvement here is limited to that merely of producer.
Like James Dean, Prefontaine was something of a cult hero, a
popular idol, who died tragically young while still at the start of
his promising career.  At the time of his death, Prefontaine remained
unbeaten in America, and many of the records he set 25 years ago
remain unbroken.  The film touches on his clashes with the sport's
governing body, his strong desire to win, and his crushing defeat in
the Munich Olympics.  His college romance with writer Mary Marckx
(Monica Potter, from Patch Adams, etc) is the least interesting
element of the film.
The most fascinating part of Without Limits centres on the
complex and volatile relationship between the cocky, arrogant and
strong willed Prefontaine and his brilliant coach and mentor Bill
Bowerman (Donald Sutherland).  Although the two men had different
philosophies about how to run a distance race, they slowly established
a mutual respect for each other's abilities.  Without Limits opens
during the 10,000 metres final at the 1972 Munich Olympics, and
unfolds in flashback, seen mainly from Bowerman's perspective.
Writer/director Robert Towne, who last ventured into this
territory with Personal Best, brings some genuine suspense to the
running sequences.  It is the numerous race sequences that bring some
excitement and energy to this otherwise routine biopic.
Billy Crudup (from Inventing The Abbotts, etc) brings a
brashness, vitality and raw sex appeal to his performance as the
charismatic Prefontaine.  So often cast as the villain or the dry
authority figure, Sutherland rarely gets a chance to show what a
superb performer he is when given a decent role.  As Pre's coach he
gets a rare opportunity to deliver a subtle and insightful
performance, and he brings a spark to the film.
Without Limits is actually the second film to depict the life
of the famous runner, following the lacklustre Pre, which disappeared
straight to video.  This stylish and superbly crafted biopic is very
American in tone, and is ultimately more concerned with worshipping
Prefontaine's achievements rather than offering personal insights into
the man.  It is also ultimately a story of particular appeal only to
American audiences, with its international appeal limited mainly to
those with an interest in athletics and sports biographies.

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
MYSTERY, ALASKA (M).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: Jay Roach
Stars: Russell Crowe, Hank Azaria, Colm Meaney, Mary McCormack, Burt
Reynolds, Lolita Davidovich, Ron Eldard, Michael McKean, Maury
Chaykin, Judith Ivey, Ryan Nortcutt, Mike Myers
Running time: 120 minutes. 
The good folk of Mystery, a small town in Alaska, live and
breathe little else but ice hockey.  The Saturday afternoon games on
the local pond are a social highlight, and the men guard their
positions in the team jealously.  But after an article on this hick
town team appears in the prestigious Sports Illustrated, they are
offered a one-off opportunity to play an exhibition match against the
New York Rangers.
The deal is the brainchild of celebrated sports journalist
Charles Danner (Hank Azaria), who grew up in Mystery before seeking
greener pastures.  Most of the town rally around the team, with the
exception of the crusty old judge (Burt Reynolds), who urges that
Mystery cling to both its dignity and its illusions.
But as the match draws closer, tensions within the town
simmer.  The match represents something of a personal mission for John
Biebe (Russell Crowe), the town's sheriff, who has just been dumped
off the team after thirteen years.  The town's mayor (Colm Meaney,
from Con Air, etc) discovers that his wife (Lolita Davidovich) is
having an affair with Shank (Ron Eldard), a member of the team, while
Biebe becomes jealous of the former relationship that existed between
his wife (Mary McCormack) and Danner.
Mystery's brief flirtation with fame also brings with it a
number of problems, not the least of which is a sudden influx of money
and interest from big corporations that threaten the harmony of this
small town.  Can the team pull off an unlikely fairy tale win against
the best and most professional team in the business, or will defeat
rip the heart out of this tight knit community?  Mystery, Alaska is a
classic tale about an underdog that eventually has its day, but this
leisurely paced comedy takes its own sweet time about getting to the
climactic hockey match.  Director Jay Roach (the two Austin Powers
comedies) and television writer David E Kelley paint a wonderful
portrait of this small town, bringing to life its charming, laid back
lifestyle and colourful gallery of eccentric inhabitants.  At times,
it seems a little like a nice off spin from the quirky Northern
Exposure series.
Roach has assembled a strong cast to bring the delightful
residents of Mystery to life, and he has also coaxed a brief
appearance from his Austin Powers star Mike Myers, who plays a
vitriolic tv sports commentator.
As a film dealing with the fast but often violent sport of ice
hockey, Mystery, Alaska is better than Disney's increasingly tiresome
Mighty Ducks series, but somehow not as much fun as the ribald,
raunchy comedy Slap Shot.  Instead, this is another of those endearing
comedies that explore the rich textures of life in small town America,
and its quirky charms should win over most audiences.

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
STIR OF ECHOES (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: David Koepp
Stars: Kevin Bacon, Kathryn Erbe, Illeana Douglas, Kevin Dunn, Zachary
David Cope, Jenny Morrison, Liza Weil, Chalon Williams
Running time: 99 minutes.
What have we here?  A cute young kid who can see dead people
and talk to ghosts?  But before you can scoff: "Shades of The Sixth
Sense", Stir Of Echoes pushes in another direction altogether.
Writer/director David Koepp, best known for his collaborations with
Brian De Palma (Mission Impossible and Snake Eyes, etc) and
screenplays for films like Jurassic Park, etc, turns this potentially
familiar and derivative material into an unnerving thriller about
murder and obsession.  Tom (Kevin Bacon) and his wife Maggie (Kathryn
Erbe, from Dream With The Fishes, etc) are a happy working class
couple who live in a nice neighbourhood in Chicago with their six year
old son Jake (newcomer Zachary David Cope), who seems to be sensitive
to the disturbing undercurrents of their house.  They are unaware that
Jake sees and talks to a ghostly girl who mysteriously appears in
their house.
Then, during a party, the sceptical Tom is hypnotised by his
sister-in-law Lisa (Illeana Douglas, playing yet another of those
marginal kooks that she does so well).  Unfortunately, Tom is left
with disturbing visions as a result of that experience, and becomes
obsessed with images of a young girl who apparently disappeared six
months earlier.  Lisa seems unable to reverse the effects of her
hypnotism.  Tom's behaviour becomes more erratic and driven, which
disturbs Maggie.
Rational explanations for Tom's post-hypnotic behaviour are a
little thin on the ground, which adds to the intense and chilling
development of suspense, but does little for the movie's credibility.
There is no real sense of mystery either, as more astute members of
the audience should probably be able to pick whodunit and what they
did well before the surprising revelations.
That Stir Of Echoes works so well and gradually draws the
audience into its web of suspense and unease is due largely to Koepp's
atmospheric direction.  Bacon's intense and volatile performance as
the single-minded and inexplicably driven Tom also suitably builds up
the air of uneasiness.  However, in an important role as the sensitive
kid, young Cope does not possess half the charisma or natural charm
and maturity that Haley Joel Osment brought to his similar role in The
Sixth Sense.  Inevitably, Stir Of Echoes will be, fairly or unfairly,
compared with the vastly superior The Sixth Sense, although this film
was made first.  Unlike that film though, this one doesn't have that
killer kick in the tail to make it memorable.

Title
Review for Tea with Mussolini (1999)
TEA WITH MUSSOLINI (PG).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Franco Zeffirelli
Stars: Joan Plowright, Maggie Smith, Cher, Judi Dench, Baird Wallace,
Lily Tomlin, Charlie Lucas, Massimo Ghini, Paolo Seganti, Paul
Checquer, Tessa Pritchard, Claudio Spadaro, Paula Jacobs, Michael
Williams. Mino Bellei
Running time: 120 minutes.
Tea With Mussolini is something of a romanticised memoir of
director Franco Zeffirelli's early life growing up in Florence during
the 1930's and the reign of Mussolini.
The scorpioni were a group of eccentric, expatriate English
ladies living in Florence, largely oblivious to the gathering clouds
of war.  Lady Hester Random (Maggie Smith), the widow of a former
ambassador, is the unofficial leader of this group, who keep alight
the flame of empire and carry the torch of tradition.  In 1935, Mary
Wallace (Joan Plowright), the secretary to a local clothing merchant,
introduces her employer's illegitimate son Luca into this circle.
Luca, fetchingly played by Charlie Lucas and Baird Wallace, is
a thinly disguised, fictional version of the young Zeffirelli.  These
remarkable women take time out to educate the young Luca in fine arts,
Shakespeare, and English, and help shape the boy into the man that he
would eventually become.  Caught between two cultures, Luca comes of
age during the war when he helps the ladies, who were eventually
interned in the nearby walled city of San Gimignano.
Tea With Mussolini is easily Zeffirelli's most personal movie
to date.  With plenty of humour and compassion, the film lovingly
explores those early forces that shaped his love of arts and
literature, which adds a remarkable personal resonance to the tale.
The film spans some ten years, and the narrative occasionally seems to
lack focus.
John Mortimer, creator of Rumpole, brings a touch of sardonic
humour and quaint touches of English eccentricity to the script.  The
dialogue crackles with some witty repartee and wonderfully acerbic
asides, which the superb cast deliver with relish.
Zeffirelli has assembled a superlative cast of fine English
actresses and Oscar winners, and their classy performances enrich the
film.  Smith is superb as the imperious and haughty Lady Hester, while
the always reliable Plowright brings compassion and understanding to
her role.  Judi Dench is fine as Arabella, the eccentric bohemian
artist Arabella, while Cher delivers her best performance for some
time as the flamboyant, vulgar but generous Elsa, an American
entertainer who unexpectedly proves to be the saviour of the group.
Newcomer Wallace, who apparently bears a striking similarity to the
young Zeffirelli, is wonderfully appealing as the teenage Luca, even
though his accent sometimes wavers.
This remarkable tale of courage is also something of a homage
to the beauty and rich history of Florence itself.  Oscar winning
cinematographer David Watkin (Out Of Africa, etc) captures the
beautiful Tuscan landscape, and he imbues the film with a gorgeous,
glossy visual surface.

Title
Review for Strange Planet (1999)
Whenever an exciting new talent bursts onto the screen, much
as young Aussie film maker Emma-Kate Croghan did in 1996 with her
impressive low budget debut Love And Other Catastrophes, they set high
standards for their sophomore feature.  Unfortunately, her follow up
film Strange Planet lacks much of the same energy, verve, flair and
wit.  Written by Croghan and regular collaborator Stavros Kazantzidis,
Strange Planet is somewhat flat, disjointed and predictable.
An exploration of love and relationships on the brink of a new
millennium, Strange Planet explores twelve months in the lives of its
twentysomething protagonists, who all find themselves single one New
Years' Eve.  They all decide that they will find true love and
happiness before the end of the new year.  Ewan (Sea Change's Tom
Long), Joel (Aaron Jeffery, from The Interview) and Neil (Felix
Williamson) are colleagues in a law firm.  Judy (Claudia Karvan, from
Paperback Hero, etc), Alice (Naomi Watts) and Sally (Alice Garner,
from Love And Other Catastrophes, etc) are school mates who share a
flat together in Sydney.  Over the course of the next twelve months,
these six characters cross paths and slowly establish relationships.
In spanning six characters and twelve months, the narrative
becomes episodic and lacks focus.  The recent, and superior, Playing
By Heart explored similar themes and issues, but managed to do so with
a lot more heart, warmth and intelligence.
The performances from the ensemble cast are fine, but we get
little opportunity to develop much empathy for the clichéd
characters.  Karvan is solid as the ambitious Judy, and has probably
the best developed role.  Williamson provides most of the humour as
the desperate and dateless Neil, whose attempts to find the perfect
partner eventually lead him to a computer dating agency.  Hugo Weaving
pops up briefly as a smarmy television producer with whom Judy has an
affair.
Croghan has re-located many of the same ideas and themes from
Love And Other Catastrophes to Sydney, but somehow this time round the
film seems tired and clichéd.  The writing lacks the same smart
style and hip humour that gave her first film its winning spark.
Croghan has re-assembled some of the key technical personnel from Love
And Other Catastrophes, including cinematographer Justin Bickle and
editor Ken Sallows, to give the film a cohesive look and fluid style.
However she is only moderately successful in recapturing the same
freshness and vitality.  Despite an undeniably slick visual quality,
the film lacks energy and plods along.

Title
Review for Just the Ticket (1999)
JUST THE TICKET (M).  
(United Artists/NewVision)
Director: Richard Wenk
Stars: Andy Garcia, Andie MacDowell, Richard Bradford, Andre Blank, Irene 
Worth, Elizabeth Ashley, Chris Lemmon, Ron Liebman, Abe Vigoda.
This curiously bland and unsatisfying romantic comedy is
something of a labour of love for co-stars Andy Garcia, who produced
it through his production company, and Andie MacDowell.  Garcia plays
Gary Starke, a ticket scalper who operates on the streets of New York.
His long suffering girl friend Linda (MacDowell) has grown impatient
with his lack of commitment to their relationship and his inability to
follow through in achieving his dreams.  When a chance to go to Paris
to pursue her career as a chef arises she is tempted to jump at the
opportunity.
But Gary has pinned his hope of salvation on one last
desperate roll of the dice.  The Pope is coming to New York to address
the faithful, and Gary is trying to get his hands on what will become
the hottest ticket in town.  Unfortunately, a new, better organised
and more ruthless operator is muscling in on his territory, and Gary's
chances of redemption are fading fast.
Just The Ticket is lumbered from the outset with an
implausible scenario and a pair of central characters that just aren't
likeable enough to warrant the time spent in their company.
Garcia rightfully dominates the film, and brings plenty of
energy to the screen.  Although a normally charismatic and charming
actor, he tries hard to evince some sympathy for his shallow
character.  However, his performance is too mannered, and he never
quite succeeds in winning the audience over.  MacDowell is also rather
bland in a role that gives her too few opportunities to shine.  Just
The Ticket never allows the two performers to develop a rapport, and
this lack of chemistry eventually damns the film.
Writer and first time director Richard Wenk takes a risk by
filming many crucial scenes on the crowded streets of New York.  This
technique brings a sense of energy and realism to the film, although
far too often the passers-by can be seen gazing questioningly into the
camera.
Only a very touching scene between Gary and his mentor Bennie
(Richard Bradford) brings some emotional punch to this rather
pedestrian and laboured effort.  And the only real comic touch comes
when Gary helps Linda cater a dinner for a spoiled rich matron (Irene
Worth).  It's all too little to salvage this patchy and dreary comedy.

Title
Review for Disturbing Behavior (1998)
In this mildly diverting thriller, a group of troublesome
teens are tamed through brainwashing techniques developed by Cradle
Bay High School psychiatrist Dr Caldicott (Bruce Greenwood, from The
Sweet Hereafter, etc).  He has created a group of well behaved,
diligent students, known as the Blue Ribbons, who pursue excellence
both at school and within the community.  However, there is a fatal
flaw in his technique.  Every time one of these seemingly perfect
adolescents develops sexual urges, they go ballistic, erupting into
erratic and violent behaviour.  The town's sheriff covers up most of
the damage, while Caldicott soothes anxious parents with lots of
psycho-babble.
Steve Clark (James Marsden, from the mini-series Bella Mafia,
etc), the new kid in town, becomes suspicious of their unnervingly
docile behaviour and sets out to expose Caldicott's sinister
experiment.  He receives help from some fellow misfits, including the
paranoid geek Gavin Strick (Nick Stahl), the pigmentally challenged UV
(Chad E Donella), and the tomboyish Rachel (Katie Holmes, from the
popular tv soap Dawson's Creek).
Disturbing Behaviour's simple plot reads like an adolescent
version of Ira Levin's 70's thriller The Stepford Wives, with
judicious borrowings from other, far superior films (A Clockwork
Orange, Village Of the Damned, etc) thrown in for good measure.
Actually, it also reads like something from a novel by John Saul, a
best selling American horror writer whose unsettling, but formulaic,
thrillers are set in small, picturesque towns like Cradle Bay, and
primarily deal with troubled teens threatened by strange and sinister
events.
Screen writer Scott Rosenberg (Beautiful Girls and Things To
Do In Denver When You're Dead, etc) makes little attempt to disguise
his influences, but he lacks the flair and reverential, knowing style
that gun writer Kevin Williamson would have brought to the material.
The film obliquely raises the question of which is the more disturbing
behaviour - that of the teens, rebelling against authority and
struggling to establish their own identity, or the sinister
machinations of Caldicott to produce mindless robots, lacking any
sense of individuality, who systematically conform to an imposed code
of discipline?
First time feature director David Nutter hails from a
background on spooky tv series (The X Files, Millennium, etc), but he
fails to bring much tension or sense of unease to this film.  Nutter
brings virtually every cliché of the genre into play here, and the
film displays precious little originality or imagination, even down to
the soundtrack.  Even the obligatory sting in the tale reeks of
desperation, and lacks credibility.  The contemporary teen horror film
genre, which largely began with Scream, seems to have run its course
if this inferior, feeble effort is any indication.
The film will hold a modicum of appeal for its targeted
teenage audience, most of whom will be drawn by the presence of
Holmes.  Disturbing Behaviour features a cast of hunky new comers, who
work well within the limitations of a horribly clichéd script.
However, performances are not of great importance here.  Worst of all
is William Sadler (Die Hard 2, etc), whose horribly cheesy performance
as the school's janitor, who is not quite as simple as he seems, is
reminiscent of Billy Bob Thornton.
Disturbing Behaviour is mercifully brief, and, at a brisk 83
minutes, doesn't outstay its welcome.  Nonetheless, audiences would be
better off waiting for the far superior and more sophisticated teen
drama Cruel Intentions.  Catch this one on video if you must!
   
**
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
DEAD MAN ON CAMPUS (M).  
(MTV/Paramount/UIP)
Director: Alan Cohn
Stars: Tom Everett Scott, Mark-Paul Gosselaar, Poppy Montgomery, Lochlyn 
Munro, Randy Pearlstein, 
Corey Page, Alyson Hannigan, Mari Morrow, Jason Segel, Dave Ruby
Running time: 94 minutes.
Thankfully, this unheralded but surprisingly enjoyable comedy
from the MTV channel eschews most of the clichés of the adolescent
school genre.  There's no psycho killer slashing his way through a
hunky cast.  There's no getting of wisdom through the pursuit of
academic excellence.  There's no discovering the pain of first love.
There's none of the jocks versus the nerds stuff.  There's not even
the down trodden loser who eventually becomes a hero by bringing glory
to his school through unlikely sporting prowess.  Hell, there's not a
whiff of football, basketball or even debating here.
Keen to pursue a medical career, honour student Josh (Tom
Everett Scott, from That Thing You Do and the appalling An American
Werewolf In Paris, etc) comes to Daleman College on a scholarship.
His room mates are anything but the studious types.  Kyle (Jason
Segel) is a repressed former Catholic boys' school graduate who
suddenly discovers the joys of sex and moves out.  Cooper (Mark-Paul
Gosselaar, from tv sitcom Saved By The Bell, etc) is a smooth scam
artist who plans to do anything but study during his college years.
Cooper quickly leads Josh into a routine of heavy partying, and his
grades quickly drop.
Faced with losing his scholarship, Josh needs to turn his
grades around.  Meanwhile, Cooper's father, a wealthy business man who
runs a toilet cleaning company, promises Cooper that if he doesn't
graduate he will learn the family business from the bottom up (so to
speak).  The pair find a hint of salvation through an arcane and
almost forgotten college by-law that guarantees passing grades to
students on compassionate grounds if their roommate suddenly dies.
The hunt is on for the pair to find the most neurotic,
potentially suicidal kid in school and move him into their room before
pushing him over the edge.  Intensive research uncovers three likely
prospects.  Cliff (Lochlyn Munro), a true party animal who lives
dangerously, but seems invulnerable; Buckley (Randy Pearlstein, from
The Cowboy Way, etc), a paranoid schizophrenic who believes everyone
is out to get him, especially computer billionaire Bill Gates; while
Matt (Aussie actor Corey Page, from Heartbreak High, etc), a depressed
heavy metal rocker, is not quite what he seems.
Dead Man On Campus takes its unusual premise from a famous
urban legend and milks it for laughs.  Given the subject matter,
there's plenty of potential for a wicked black comedy, but first time
feature director Alan Cohn keeps proceedings light and upbeat.  There
are plenty of funny moments throughout, and the film unfolds with lots
of slapstick humour and energy.  The pace picks up in the second half
during the frantic search for the perfect suicidal room mate.
 
Performances are more than adequate for this type of film,
although Gosselaar brings plenty of easy going charm to his role as
the scheming Cooper.  Scott also brings a manic energy to his role as
the increasingly frustrated and desperate Josh.
Produced under the auspices of MTV (other features include
Joe's Apartment and Beavis And Butthead Do America), Dead Man On
Campus boasts a solid soundtrack of cutting edge, contemporary
rockers.  Dead Man On Campus is not a cinematic masterpiece, nor does
it have pretensions towards having anything deep and meaningful to
say.  However, it offers plenty to satisfy and will certainly amuse
its targeted audience.

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
THE RAGE: CARRIE 2 (M).   
(MGM/UA/UIP)
Director: Katt Shea
Stars: Emily Bergl, Jason London, Dylan Bruno, Amy Irving, Zachery Ty
Bryan, J Smith-Cameron, John Doe, Gordon Clapp, Rachel Blanchard,
Charlotte Ayanna, Justin Urich, Mena Suvari, Elijah Craig, Eddie Kaye
Thomas, Clint Jordan, Steven Ford, Kate Skinner, Katt Shea
Running time: 104 minutes.
The scene: the offices of MGM/UA studios in Hollywood, sometime last
year.  We are privy to a rare conversation between two production
executives.
"We've got a pretty thin slate this year until the next Bond film
comes out.  What can we do to beef it up a little?"
"Sequels and remakes always do reasonable business."
"Yes, but we've already done The Mod Squad, and we've still got the
remake of The Thomas Crown Affair on the way."
"Why not do another, but let's call it a sequel, just to be different."  
"I know the perfect film, too!  Remember that fantastic horror film
from 1976.  That one about the tormented adolescent with telekinetic
powers who destroyed her school on prom night.  That one that made the
reputations of both Brian De Palma and Stephen King?  What was it
called... Carrie?  It's old enough now that most of today's audiences
probably won't have seen it, or won't remember it."
"We set it 20 years later, and we bring back Amy Irving's character.
She was the only one to survive that spectacular conflagration.  We
make her a guidance counsellor at her old high school.  She can
recognise the telekinetic powers in another outcast, and try and
prevent another disaster."
"And, as an added twist, we'll make the new kid the illegitimate
daughter of Carrie's father, a sort of half- sister.  Things will
escalate until she erupts and unleashes her full fury."
"We'll get some unknown actress to play our heroine."  
"And let's have the football jocks be her tormentors.  They're playing
a kinky and cruel game whereby they score points for seducing various
girls at school."
"And we'll have our spunky male hero also an innocent victim of a
prank organised by a vindictive student."
"Yeah!  Our film will really explore the bitchy politics, the cliques
and social undercurrents that are an integral part of contemporary
high school life."
"But, hasn't that angle already been explored ad nauseam already this
year?  What with Jawbreaker, 10 Things I Hate About You, She's All
That, Cruel Intentions, and even Never Been Kissed?"
"Yeah, but they were all comedies.  This will be a horror story for 
adolescents."
"And we've got to have a scary coda.  Like that final scene in Carrie
when the bloodied hand reaches out of the grave and grabs Amy Irving's
arm, and it turns out to be a dream.  I really jumped at that bit."
"Even if that sort of thing has now become a cliché and not terribly 
scary?"
"Yes, we've got to have that.  Audiences expect that sort of thing 
nowadays."
"Will we have some big names in the cast?  I mean the original had
people like Sissy Spacek, John Travolta and William Katt before they
really became famous."
"Well, we could have a tv star in it.  What about that kid from Home 
Improvement?"
"You mean Jonathan Taylor Thomas?  He'd be a big name and would draw
in the female demographic."
"No, I was thinking of that other one, the guy who plays Brad.
Zachery Ty Bryan."
"He'll be great, especially when cast against type as a villainous sort. 
 And we'll have lots of fresh young faces play the rest of the
students."
"Will we show the script to Stephen King first for approval?"
"No, he'd just hate it and what we've done to his story.  And he'd
probably want to direct.  We all know what happened with Maximum
Overdrive!"
"Probably a woman, who will bring an added dimension to the horror
genre.  Someone who has made a few teen flicks and has indy
credibility.  And most importantly, someone with a unique visual style
- lots of moving cameras, flashy and atmospheric switches between
colour and black and white.  Someone whose pretentious style will
distract from the lack of originality and credibility and the ham
fisted performances of the cast."
Cut to the present day.  Distressed film reviewer wakes up in a
darkened cinema with the credits rolling across the screen, hoping
that it was all just a bad dream.  No!  Unfortunately, it was a very
bad film!

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
200 CIGARETTES (M).  
(Paramount Pictures/MTV Films/Buena Vista International)
Director: Risa Bramon Garcia
Stars: Ben Affleck, Casey Affleck, Dave Chappelle, Guillermo Diaz,
Angela Featherstone, Janeane Garofalo, Gaby Hoffmann, Kate Hudson,
Courtney Love, Brian McCardie, Jay Mohr, Martha Plimpton, Christina
Ricci, Paul Rudd, Jennifer Albano, Elvis Costello, Catherine Kellner.
        It is New Year's Eve in New York, 1981.  Punk rock is in its
death throes.  This is a more innocent time, before the era of
political correctness, smoking bans, and the spectre of AIDS.  This
low budget comedy follows a disparate group of twentysomething New
Yorkers as they look for love and a hot time in the city in the hours
leading up to midnight.  The common link is that they have all been
invited to a party in a loft apartment.
        While Monica (Martha Plimpton), the hostess, grows
increasingly frustrated with the fact that no-one has yet shown up,
her potential guests are sorting out a number of personal
relationships and trying to organise their dates for the evening.  The
film cuts between the various characters, but we never really get any
feel for them as real people.  If the film has anything resembling
central characters it is Lucy (Courtney Love) and Kevin (Paul Rudd,
from Clueless, etc).  Both long time best friends they are without a
date for New Year's Eve, and gradually come to realise that may well
be perfect partners as the night wears on.
        First time screen writer Shana Larsen doesn't get overly
sentimental about the spirit of the celebrations here.  Rather, her
script offers up some witty and acerbic observations on relationships.
The film is also suffused with a nice touch of irony that is oddly
appealing.
        200 Cigarettes is the first feature from director Risa Bramon
Garcia, a former high powered casting agent, who has assembled an
ensemble group of hot young things and rising young stars to bring the
characters to life.  They deliver enthusiastic performances that
capture the spirit of the film.  Love in particular is superb, and her
flamboyant, brassy screen presence reminded me of a brash, younger
Bette Midler.  Janeane Garofalo lends her lacerating wit to a small
role as Kevin's past lover, a pretentious performance artist named
Ellie.
        Ben Affleck is wasted in a small and meaningless role as a
bartender, while younger brother Casey is solid as a young punk who
attracts the attention of Val (Christina Ricci), a tough and feisty
teeny bopper.  Jay Mohr (from Jerry Maguire, etc) plays the womanising
Jack, who is desperately trying to ditch the clinging Cindy (Kate
Hudson), with whom he spent the previous night.  Comic Dave Chappelle
is enjoyable as a spaced out cabbie who ferries many of the characters
around the city.  Singer Elvis Costello contributes a brief cameo for
the film's final, delightfully ironic joke.
        But the film's setting is also a good excuse to crank out yet
another great soundtrack of '80's songs, which, in hindsight, is one
of the major plusses of this rather slight, but nonetheless
entertaining, nostalgia trip.  The costumes also beautifully evoke the
era.  200 Cigarettes will largely appeal to audiences who still
remember this era with a great deal of fondness and who have not yet
grown sick of this whole '80's shtick.

Title
Review for Siam Sunset (1999)
SIAM SUNSET (M).  
(Southern Star Films/UIP)
Director: John Polson
Stars: Linus Roache, Danielle Cormack, Roy Billing, Ian Bliss, Alan 
Brough, Rebecca Hobbs, Robert 
Menzies, Terry Kenwrick, Deidre Rubenstein, Peter Hosking, Victoria 
Eagger, Eliza Lowell
Running time: 92 minutes.
Despite its poetic title, Siam Sunset is far from a formulaic
romantic comedy set in Thailand.  Rather, this quirky black comedy,
featuring a bus ride through Australia's inhospitable outback,
seemingly takes us straight into Welcome To Woop Woop territory.
While the surreal, off beat sense of humour is nowhere near as
tasteless, Siam Sunset is not a winning, crowd pleasing comedy in the
vein of Priscilla, either.  This is yet another hit and miss
Australian comedy that prefers to travel an off beat path rather than
trying to secure easy laughs with a broad, mainstream sensibility.
There are a number of chuckles along the way, but genuine laughs are
far and few between.
Siam Sunset takes the idea of a deeply troubled man looking
for salvation, and marries it with the scenario of the bus tour from
hell.  Its plot eventually comes across as something of a profusion of
ideas from many other films.  Writers Max Dann and Andrew Knight
(Spotswood, etc) set up a number of wonderfully comic moments, but
often fail to deliver the killer punch line.  Ultimately, the whole
thing is a minor disappointment.
Linus Roache (Priest, etc) is cast as Perry, an industrial
chemist for a paint factory, whose mid-life crisis comes early, when
his wife is crushed by a falling refrigerator.  Perry believes that he
is a magnet for bad luck.  He also becomes obsessed with searching for
an elusive colour - Siam Sunset - which reminds him of his wife's
hair.  Perry wins a trip to Australia at a local Bingo game, and he
reluctantly decides to go, hoping to turn his life around.  But
disaster follows the cut rate tour, led by the laconic Bill (Roy
Billing), who seems to possess as much warmth and charisma as a
Rottweiler.  The tour picks up an unexpected passenger in Grace (New
Zealand actress Danielle Cormack, from Topless Women..., etc), whose
car has broken down.  Grace is fleeing from her troubled past, and her
vicious drug dealing boyfriend Martin (Ian Bliss).  Threatened with
either testifying against him or going to jail herself Grace did the
only honourable thing - lifted his secret wad of cash and headed off
for distant parts.  Martin follows and joins the bus tour, just as a
further series of improbable disasters send it off its predetermined
route.
When these hapless travellers become stranded at Eric's
Roadhouse way-stop in the middle of nowhere, the dynamic of the group
quickly breaks down.  Perry and Grace remain above all the petty
squabbling as their relationship develops, and the healing process
begins for both.
Siam Sunset marks the feature film directorial debut of AFI
award winning actor John Polson (The Boys, etc).  Polson makes an
assured debut here, directing with surprising flair and confidence,
and drawing some uncomfortably black humour from this unlikely and
increasingly bizarre scenario.  Roache delivers a nicely understated
and affable performance as the troubled and vulnerable Perry.  Cormack
brings a vitality to her performance, and makes the most of her role.
However, there is no real chemistry or charisma between Roache and
Cormack, and their relationship lacks real warmth and credibility.
Bliss' intense performance as the brutal Martin brings a nasty,
malevolent edge to proceedings that sometimes sits a little
uncomfortably with the lighter moments.
Brian Beheny's cinematography is certainly quite spectacular,
and he uses the wide screen superbly to capture the harsh but
beautiful Australian outback at its best.  However, even this
technique has become something of a cliché in itself.
Siam Sunset shows potential, but its dry humour sometimes
falls flat, and the outrageous sequence of events are not always
convincing.  This is one sunset that will not please everybody.

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
BICENTENNIAL MAN (PG).  
(Touchstone/Columbia Tristar)
Director: Chris Columbus
Stars: Robin Williams, Sam Neill, Embeth Davidtz, Wendy Crewson, Oliver 
Platt, Hallie Kate Eisenberg, Bradley Whitford, Lynne Thigpen
Running time: 126 minutes. 
Based on an Isaac Asimov short story, Bicentennial Man is the
story of a robot's 200 year quest to become human.
Robin Williams is perfectly cast as Andrew, a domestic android
programmed to carry out household duties - a sort of futuristic,
robotic Mr Doubtfire, crossed with The Wizard Of Oz's Tin Man.  But
Andrew is unique, and has a wit and creativity and a personality that
surprise and enchant his human family over three generations.  Under
the guidance of his master (Sam Neill), Andrew's abilities are
fostered and developed, and the robot becomes more intrigued by
understanding what it is to become human.
But it is Andrew's feelings for little Miss (played at various
ages by an enchanting Hallie Kate Eisenberg and Embeth Davidtz) and
her grand daughter (Davidtz again) that inspires him to acquire a more
human personality as well.  With the help of a sympathetic scientist
(the ubiquitous Oliver Platt) he gets a make over that eventually
brings him closer and closer to his ultimate dream.
This futuristic comedy basically explores what it is that
essentially makes us human - our feelings and emotions, our mortality,
our flaws and imperfections, and our ability to make mistakes.  Writer
Nicholas Kazan (Reversal Of Fortune, etc) and director Chris Columbus
(Home Alone, etc) gloss over much of Asimov's vision of the future,
and they tone down the darker edge and overtones of prejudice and
intolerance that shaped much of his original tale.  However, there are
some nifty special effects briefly on display here, and the make-up
that ages the actors is also very convincing.  Columbus directs with
his usual slick and light weight style, although there is less
slapstick or physical humour here.  The role of the android with human
feelings is perfect material for Williams, who seems to prefer these
earnest roles of late.  Columbus manages to tease a far more
restrained and understated performance from his star, who is hidden
under some clever hi-tech make-up for much of the duration.  However,
there are several scenes in which one can almost sense Williams' more
manic personality threatening to burst out of his constraints.
Neill brings dignity and class to his role as the droid's
compassionate and understanding master, while Davidtz brings warmth to
her dual role.
The film has a number of touching, heart warming moments, and
Columbus is a rather manipulative director who turns the saccharine
factor up to almost cloying levels at times.  Bicentennial Man is also
somewhat slow paced, especially in the second half, and its overly
generous running time may test the patience and endurance of many.

Title
Review for Inspector Gadget (1999)
INSPECTOR GADGET (PG).  
(Walt Disney Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: David Kellogg
Stars: Matthew Broderick, Rupert Everett, Joely Fisher, Michelle 
Trachtenberg, Dabney Coleman, Rene Auberjonois, Michael G Hagerty,
voice of Don Adams.
This pedestrian and largely unfunny adaptation of the popular
children's cartoon series joins those other woefully miscast,
misguided live action adaptations of animated series (The Flintstones,
Mr Magoo) in the cinematic wasteland.
A strangely uncharismatic Matthew Broderick (remember his
glory days as Ferris Bueller?)  steps into the shoes of the robotic
sleuth with more gadgets than a hardware store, but he is clearly out
of his depth.  Broderick plays John Brown, a security guard who dreams
of becoming a police officer in Riverton.  His wish comes true in a
most unexpected way after he is severely injured while attempting to
stop a break in at the laboratory where he works.  Brown becomes the
guinea pig in a revolutionary experiment conducted by the beautiful
scientist Brenda Bradford (Joely Fisher) aimed at creating a robotic
cop.  He ends up looking like a cross between the Six Million Dollar
Man and Robocop, without the inventive genius of either!
Gadget's first case involves trying to solve the murder of
Brenda's father, which brings him up against the villainous
industrialist Claw (Rupert Everett, in a complete contrast to his
recent role in An Ideal Husband, etc), who creates an evil version of
Inspector Gadget and sets about creating havoc in the city.  The less
than cluey Inspector Gadget gets plenty of help from his inquisitive
and intelligent niece Penny (Michelle Trachtenberg, from Harriet The
Spy) and her dog Brains.
David Kellogg's direction is ham fisted and unsubtle, and the
film has plenty of flat moments, especially for older audiences or
those who fondly remember the '80's cartoon with some affection.  The
special effects are occasionally quite good, but more often than not
they are distinctly second rate and unconvincing.
The performances are suitably camp and unconvincing.  Everett
hams it up nicely as the arch villain of the piece, and almost steals
the movie.  Some of the film's best lines belong to the gadgetmobile,
the wise cracking, talking car with attitude, whose antics will
probably delight younger audiences.  Don Adams, who provided the voice
of Gadget in the original series, gets a brief cameo here providing
the voice of Brains, the dog, in some nonsense during the final
credits.
Admittedly, Inspector Gadget is comic book stuff, but still
some effort should have been made to accommodate those audiences older
than eight years old who will inevitably be dragged into the cinemas.
The biggest problem lies with the uneven script, which can't seem to
make up its mind whether it should be over the top comic book fantasy
or not.  There are a few clever in-jokes throughout the film (such as
the Godzilla send up) that provide a few chuckles.  Unfortunately, the
best and most inspired moments come too late, during the final
credits.
Sadly this disappointing film is a case of no go gadget!

Title
Review for Happy, Texas (1999)
HAPPY TEXAS (M).  
(Miramax/Palace)
Director: Mark Illsley
Stars: Jeremy Northam, Steve Zahn, William H Macy, Illeana Douglas, Ally 
Walker, Ron Perlman, M C Gainey, Tim Bagley, Michael Hitchcock, Paul Dooley
Running time: 95 minutes.
Despite becoming more commercial over the years, the Sundance
Film Festival still manages to showcase some of the best of American
independent cinema and unearth a few new talented directors.  Happy
Texas was one of the surprise hits of the 1999 festival, and inspired
a bidding war amongst some of the studios.
This delightfully off beat comedy is the first film from
writer Ed Stone and director Mark Illsley, who crafted his skills as
an assistant with Kevin Reynolds (Robin Hood: Prince Of Thieves, Rapa
Nui, etc).  Happy Texas tells the story of two escaped convicts who
hide out in a small town in Texas, and are mistaken for a pair of gay
pageant directors hired to prepare the local school girls for a
forthcoming beauty quest.
While the wonderfully named, barely literate car thief Wayne
Wayne Wayne jr (Steve Zahn, from Out Of Sight, Bandwagon, etc) is left
with eager teacher Ms Schaefer (Illeana Douglas) to help hone the
talents of his young charges, the more suave Harry Sawyer (Jeremy
Northam, largely cast against type) checks out the local bank, which
he judges is ripe for the picking.
But Harry slowly falls in love with the beautiful bank manager
(Profiler's Ally Walker), unaware that Chappy (William H Macy), the
town's lonely and closeted sheriff, has also secretly fallen for him -
hard.  Further complications develop when another escaped convict
shows up and forces Harry and Wayne to help him rob the bank.
Happy Texas follows on from those other recent comedies (In &
Out, The Birdcage, Three To Tango, etc) that embrace complex issues of
male sexuality and identity and milk the possibilities of the scenario
for laughs.  This charming and deftly written comedy also moves into
more familiar territory when it takes a non-judgmental look at the
mores and attitudes of small town America.  This is a town that
welcomes a pair of gay pageant directors with open arms because they
are strangers passing through, but somehow forces the sheriff to
conceal his sexuality because he has to live and work with these
people.  Happy Texas draws much of its genial humour from its look at
life in this small town and its quirky inhabitants, although there is
nothing malicious in it.
Unfortunately this zesty and fast paced film seems to run out
of puff before the final reel.  The film is let down slightly only by
the somewhat conventional nature of its very busy finale, which
includes a chase and a shoot-out.  Illsley manages to strike a nice
balance between the slapstick and the poignant here, and he directs
with surprising restraint, given his limited experience.
The solid cast throw themselves into their roles with
enthusiasm, but the film is lifted somewhat by two standout
performances.  The busy but always reliable Macy brings a nice touch
of pathos to his wonderful performance as Chappy, the lovelorn
sheriff.  Zahn is superb and brings a nice manic energy and physical
quality to his boisterous role.
During the hectic film going holiday season you should make a
detour via the multiplexes to check out Happy Texas.  It will put a
smile on your face.

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
MIGHTY JOE YOUNG (PG).  
(Walt Disney Pictures/RKO/Buena Vista International)
Director: Ron Underwood
Stars: Bill Paxton, Charlize Theron, Rade Serbedzija, Peter Firth, David 
Paymer, regina King, Naveen 
Andrews, Lawrence Pressman, Linda Purl.
The original Mighty Joe Young, produced in 1949, was politely
regarded as something of a distant cousin to King Kong.  This
entertaining and environmentally friendly $49 million Disney remake
softens the action to make the movie more palatable for family
audiences, while retaining something of a deliberately old fashioned
flavour.
For those interested in useless trivia, the original Mighty
Joe Young is the only movie to have been directed by a legally blind
person.  Director Ernest B Schoedsack lost his sight during W.W.II,
and could only see blurred movement.  An assistant director told him
what was happening on the set.  Taking advantage of more sophisticated
technology, director Ron Underwood (Tremors, etc) also improves upon
the original, even though it ultimately ends up being something of a
lukewarm cross between Gorillas In The Mist and King Kong.
Oscar winning effects designer Rick Baker (incidentally, the
man inside the gorilla suit in John Guillerman's 1976 remake of King
Kong) has created a life-like and realistic gorilla who interacts
beautifully with his human co-stars.  Joe, the 20 foot gorilla, is
portrayed here as quite loveable, and ensures that audience sympathy
is with him all the way.  The climax, in which Joe rescues a young boy
trapped on a blazing ferris wheel, is awash in mawkish sentimentality,
and threatens to unbalance the movie.
Jill Young (Charlize Theron, from The Devil's Advocate, etc)
has grown up as a wild child of the jungle.  She and the gorilla Joe
share a life shaped by tragedy.  Twelve years earlier they both lost
their mothers to the villainous poacher Strasser (Rade Serbedzija,
from The Saint, etc).  Ever since, Jill has protected Joe from the
dangers represented by man, hiding him away from the rapidly
encroaching modern world.
One day he is discovered by Gregg O'Hara (Bill Paxton, from
Titanic, etc), a scientist who traps animals for a nature conservatory
in Los Angeles.  O'Hara eventually convinces Jill that the safest
place for Joe is in the preserve, where he will be protected from
poachers.  Joe initially reacts badly to being displaced from his
jungle home, but soon settles down as Jill watches over him.
All goes well, and Joe becomes the conservatory's biggest
attraction.  Then Strasser returns to resolve unfinished business.
Joe escapes Strasser's clutches, and runs amok through the streets of
LA, climbing over familiar landmarks such as Mann's Chinese Theatre
and the Hollywood sign.  There is plenty of action as Joe is pursued
through the streets and sewers of LA by helicopters.  These sequences
are more genuinely exciting that the recent Godzilla, in which much of
the action was murkily shot.
The computer generated special effects are superb, although
they do not detract from the more human elements of the story.
Younger audiences may find themselves a little bored with the
developing romance between O'Hara and Jill, and the pace is a little
slow until Joe escapes into LA.  Characterisation is pretty one
dimensional, although the performances overcome many of the
limitations of the formulaic and predictable script.
An always likeable and solid actor, Paxton brings plenty of
charm and sincerity to his role here.  Special effects creator Ray
Harryhausen, who designed the Oscar winning stop motion effects for
the original, and actress Terry Moore, who starred in the 1949
version, both contribute brief cameos here.
This modern reworking of Mighty Joe Young is quite an exciting
and entertaining adventure, ideal family viewing for the holiday
season.

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
THE IRON GIANT (PG).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Brad Bird
Stars: voices of Jennifer Aniston, Harry Connick jr, Eli Marienthal,
Vin Diesel, Christopher McDonald, John Mahoney, James Gammon, M Emmett
Walsh, Cloris Leachman
Running time: 86 minutes.
The spirit of ET runs through this charming story of an
unlikely friendship between a young boy and a giant mechanical robot
from space.  The Iron Giant is based on a story originally written by
Britain's Poet laureate, the late Ted Hughes, after the death of his
wife Sylvia Plath.  The story was then turned into a rock opera by Who
guitarist Pete Townshend, which explains his involvement as one of the
producers of this marvellous and enormously enjoyable animated tale.
The film is set in 1957, and is suffused with the Cold War
paranoia, suspicions of Russian supremacy in space, and fear of both
nuclear war and invasion from another planet.  The action of the story
takes place in the picturesque sea side town of Rockwell, which
immediately brings to mind both the famous illustrations for the New
Yorker magazine as well as the town of Roswell, famous for its UFO
landing.
Ten year old Hogarth Hughes (voiced by Eli Marienthal) has
been raised with a healthy imagination, fuelled by a diet of horror
movies and fantasy comics, and has a penchant for adopting stray pets.
One night while home alone he ventures outdoors to investigate the
sudden interference with his tv reception.  Suspecting an alien
invasion, he cautiously follows a trail of debris into the forest.  He
finds the eponymous robot trapped by electrical cables, and rescues
him.  Thus begins an unusual friendship between an impressionable
young boy and a friendly, but misunderstood, alien creature who has no
memory of its origins.
When a suspicious and sinister government agent (voiced by
Christopher McDonald, currently seen in tv series Family Law, etc)
comes to investigate reports of strange nocturnal sightings in the
area, Hogarth conspires with local junkyard owner and aspiring artist
Dean McCoppin (Harry Connick jr) to hide the robot.  But when man's
basic instinct and its natural urge to destroy that which he does not
understand takes over, the scene is set for a climactic showdown
between the friendly robot and the army bent on saving the world, at
any cost.
Although the animation is not quite in the same league as
recent state of the art features like Toy Story and its ilk, The Iron
Giant is still very good, and a lot of care has been taken in creating
the look of the film.  Unlike some Disney animated features, which
espouse old fashioned family values, The Iron Giant is surprisingly
modern in some of its attitudes - e.g. Hogarth's mother (voiced by
Friends star Jennifer Aniston) is single and works as a waitress in a
road side diner.
 
Director Brad Bird, a veteran of animated series The Simpsons
and King Of the Hill, explores some important themes and issues here,
and the film is full of positive values.  Bird even manages to include
a strong anti-guns message, as well as lampooning some of the nuclear
warning messages prevalent during the height of the Cold War.
Even the characters have more depth than one normally
encounters in a cartoon, and the story is surprisingly moving and
touching.  This is largely due to the wonderful script from Tim
McCandlies, who gave us the underrated Dancer, Texas a couple of years
ago.  Bird has assembled a strong vocal cast, including John Mahoney,
Cloris Leachman, and Vin Diesel (from Saving Private Ryan), who
provides the voice of the iron giant.
As with films like A Bugs Life, Toy Story and Babe, animated
films are not just purely aimed at children anymore.  They are not
patronising to adult audiences.  Instead, the best children's films
have a strong story, wonderful characters and explore important ideas
and themes that have crossover appeal to broader audiences.  Along
with the wonderful Stuart Little, The Iron Giant provides superb
entertainment for audiences of all ages during the holiday season!

Title
Review for Boys Don't Cry (1999)
BOYS DON'T CRY (R).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Kimberly Peirce
Stars: Hilary Swank, Chloe Sevigny, Peter Sarsgaard, Brendan Sexton III, 
Alison Folland, Alicia Gornason, Matt McGrath, Rob Campbell, Jeanetta Arnette
Running time: 114 minutes.
Like the recent Ma Vie En Rose, Boys Don't Cry is a
confronting and disturbing, but compelling look at a confused teenager
who chooses to live life on their own terms, contrary to the accepted
norms of the larger society around them.
Boys Don't Cry tells the true story of Teena Brandon, a
disaffected, tomboyish teenage girl from Nebraska, suffering from a
serious crisis of sexual identity.  She switched genders to live life
as a boy, and was eventually murdered by a couple of bigoted,
homophobic thugs.  Wrapping her breasts in bandages, stuffing a sock
down the front of her jeans, and calling herself Brandon, she moved
away from her hometown of Lincoln, in the conservative heartland of
America's midwest. Arriving in nearby Falls City, Brandon begins her
new life as a boy, a sort of rebel without a penis.
A bar room brawl leads to a friendship with Candace (Alicia
Goranson) and Kate (Allison Folland, from All Over Me, etc), and
ex-cons John (Peter Sarsgaard, from Dead Man Walking, etc) and Tom
(Brendan Sexton III, from Hurricane Streets, etc).  Brandon fabricates
details about his past life, which are at first accepted by his new
friends.
But it is the lonely and insecure Lana (Chloe Sevigny, from
Kids, etc), who dreams of becoming a famous karaoke singer, with whom
Brandon develops a relationship.  Desperate for affection, Lana allows
the relationship to develop without question, even when John and Tom
grow suspicious about Brandon.  When Brandon's true identity and
secret is revealed, fear and ignorance give way to unthinking hatred
and violence.
In exploring the hypocrisy of modern America, the white trash
of America's midwest, and larger questions about troubled youth and
sexual identity, this bleak and confronting film also occupies the
same seedy cinematic territory as Welcome To The Dollhouse and the
repellent Gummo.  In some ways Boys Don't Cry is a depressing and grim
film, but it is also surprisingly rewarding and inspiring.  This is
evident through the compassionate treatment of the difficult subject
matter and the occasionally sympathetic view of the sometimes uglier
elements of human behaviour.
For first time feature director Kimberly Peirce this has been
something of a labour of love, and she spent five years researching
the story and getting inside the character.  Peirce draws uniformly
strong performances from her ensemble cast, comprising some of the
finest young actors working in the American independent film scene.
Hilary Swank, best known for her role in the forgettable The
Next Karate Kid, has attracted a swag of accolades and awards for her
sensational and virtuoso performance here.  She beautifully captures
Brandon's androgynous quality, vividly portraying both the brooding
masculinity, the boyish swagger and the chiselled good looks, as well
as the more vulnerable elements of this complex and contradictory
character.  Sevigny is sublime as the trusting Lana, and delivers a
moving and memorable performance.  Sexton, cast against type, and
Sarsgaard effectively capture the latent violence lurking just below
the surface of their characters.
Boys Don't Cry is not a film that will sit comfortably with
everyone.  Peirce deliberately sets out to elicit a response from the
audience, and she succeeds.  Boys Don't Cry is one film that occupies
your mind days after having seen it.

Title
Review for Erin Brockovich (2000)
        A twice divorced, unemployed mother of three young children,
Erin Brockovich (Julia Roberts) struggles to be taken seriously.  But
when she lands a job as a secretary in the small law firm run by Ed
Masry (Oscar winning veteran Albert Finney) she eventually gains
respect as the key player in a multi- million dollar law suit against
a giant energy corporation.
Masry has been in the business for years and thinks he has
earned a little bit of peace and quiet.  He has become a little set in
his ways after years of dealing with civil matters and trivial
litigation.  But even he finds himself actively involved when Erin
discovers that a power company has, for several decades, been
polluting the water supply of a small town and lying about it.  Erin
investigates why real estate records for the sale of houses within the
town also contain private medical records.  Eventually she rallies the
townsfolk together in a frustrating effort to sue the power company.
It is a David versus Goliath like struggle in which the
underdog eventually triumphs.  Victory also enables Erin to break away
from that stereotype in which most people have neatly pigeon holed her
for so long.  Erin Brockovich is based on a true story, and although
it takes a few liberties along the way, it is, for the most part, an
involving tale.
Steven Soderbergh's direction is a tad manipulative, as he
takes great pains to make us feel sympathy for the small town victims
of the faceless corporation's greed.
 There are few subtleties to be 
found in this film, as Soderbergh (the superb crime film Out Of Sight, 
etc) tends to paint everything in 
broad strokes.  But the script, from Susannah Grant (Ever After, etc) and 
Soderbergh, contains plenty of 
winning humour and is not without its charms.  
When the film explores Erin's troubled and unconventional
personal life it becomes bogged down and occasionally repetitive, and
many within the audience will become restless during these scenes.
However, while depicting Erin's tenacious paper chase through the
daunting amount of documents and legal technicalities and her patient
attempts at gathering evidence, the film works a treat.
Like a few other recent films based on true stories about an
unlikely triumph against the odds (The Insider, The Hurricane, etc),
Erin Brockovich becomes a compelling and inspiring drama that should
please audiences.  Like its appealing heroine, Erin Brockovich should
also effectively change a few misconceptions about Roberts' abilities.
Comfortable with roles in lightweight romantic comedies,
Roberts has sometimes struggled with the demands of portraying more
dramatic characters.  However, she finds a role that perfectly suits
her here, and delivers one of her best performances for quite some
time.  She delivers a warts and all characterisation of a woman
unafraid to speak her mind and exploit of her sexuality in getting
what she wants.  Her well rounded and complex performance captures
Erin's prickly nature, her hidden strengths, her driven nature, yet
also hints at the vulnerability and insecurity that lies just below
the surface.
Finney is also superb as her initially blustering boss, who
originally underestimates his unusual new employee, but gradually
grows to admire and respect Erin's ability.  Aaron Eckhart (In The
Company Of Men, etc) makes the most of the lesser developed role of
George, the bikie who befriends Erin and her kids, but is driven away
by his own inability to cope with her growing sense of confidence and
assurance.  The real Erin Brockovich contributes a brief cameo as a
waitress in a restaurant early in the movie.

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
Computer games don't translate well into feature films - just
check out Mortal Kombat, Streetfighter, Super Mario Brothers and Judge
Dredd for proof.  Now you can add to this inauspicious list Wing
Commander, a dull and cliché-ridden futuristic space adventure that
makes The Phantom Menace seem like Citizen Kane by comparison.
Set some 500 years in the future, Wing Commander is a science
fiction adventure aimed squarely at undemanding teenage audiences.
The plot deals with a Confederation attempt to stop an attack on Earth
launched by the hostile slug-like Kilrathi.  Apparently the Kilrathi
have gained access to a navigation device that will enable them to
launch a surprise attack on the earth.  Sent to counter this threat
are two rookie pilots straight out of military academy and the
Diligent, a decrepit old trade vessel piloted by the enigmatic Paladin
(Tcheky Karyo, from Bad Boys, etc).
The aptly named Maniac (Matthew Lillard, from Scream, etc) is
full of bravado but little actual combat experience.  Christopher
Blair (Freddie Prinze jr, from She's All That, etc) carries a vital
coded message about the planned invasion.  Although his father was a
legendary hero, Blair is not entirely trusted by Confederation
commanders because of his mixed heritage.  Their flight commander is
Deveraux (Saffron Burrows, from Circle Of Friends and the upcoming
shark thriller Deep Blue Sea, etc), a tough-as-nails woman who has
forgotten her humanity.
Chris Roberts, who conceived and developed the series of
computer games on which the film is based, makes his feature film
debut as a director, but his handling of the material is less than
emphatic.  The special effects are good, but the action sequences lack
genuine excitement.  One of the key sequences, in which our heroes
hide from an enemy fleet that is tracking them by radar, resembles
those old W.W.II submarine movies of yesteryear, a comparison that is
enhanced through the stolid presence of Jurgen Prochnow (Das Boot,
etc).
The seemingly hurriedly written script has enough holes to
sink a black hole.  The hunky youthful cast will certainly appeal to
the target audience, even if their enthusiastic, but shallow,
performances lack conviction.  The international supporting cast of
veterans (Prochnow, Karyo, David Warner and David Suchet) deliver
dour, wooden performances that suggest they are uncomfortable acting
with the computer generated special effects.  They also seem to be
having second thoughts about their involvement with this clichéd
and unexciting adventure.
Unfortunately, this is one wing commander that fails to take off! 

Title
Review for Plunkett & Macleane (1999)
When two 18th century highwaymen start plundering their way
through London's upper class the first victim is historical accuracy,
which seems to have been sacrificed in order to make this period yarn
more appealing to a youthful audience.  The script takes many
liberties with the facts, while debut director Jake Scott (son of
famed director Ridley) deliberately adds a number of contemporary
trappings, including prolific swearing, some raunchy sex, generous
dollops of violence, and a heavily techno- influenced music score from
composer Craig Armstrong.
Plunkett And Macleane reunites Robert Carlyle and Jonny Lee
Miller, two of the stars of Trainspotting, who play the highway
robbers with an energy and humour that lifts the material.  Carlyle
seems to be enjoying himself immensely here as Will Plunkett, a
notorious thief and crude outsider.  He reluctantly joins forces with
Captain James Macleane (Miller), a disgraced soldier, when they both
end up in prison.  Plunkett convinces the well-connected Macleane to
use his charms to gain entry into the homes of London's wealthy and
check for potential victims.  As their crime wave increases, pressure
mounts on the sadistic chief law enforcement official Chance (a
suitably menacing and grim Ken Stott) to bring the pair to justice.
Liv Tyler may as well have phoned in her lines for all the
impact she has on the film, trapped in a rather thankless role as the
beautiful young Lady Rebecca, who falls for the handsome Macleane.
Scott brings plenty of energy to his first feature film, and
Plunkett And Macleane maintains a reasonably cracking pace for much of
its length.  He gives the film a flashy visual style and a slick
surface, that betrays his background in advertising and rock video
clips.  The tyro film maker shows that he has learnt a lot of his
father's visual tricks and flair, but little of his meticulous eye for
accuracy or period detail.
The production design is quite impressive, with Prague
doubling for dingy 18th century London.  But the film has primarily
been shot in dark tones by John Mathieson, who prefers to use the sort
of natural lighting that seems to have become popular in many modern
movies.
 It may emphasise the shadowy mists and fogs of London, but it also
makes it hard to discern what is happening, and strains the eyes.
Plunkett And Macleane is ultimately let down by an overall superficial
quality that suffuses the production.
This should have been a jolly old romp through the decadence,
debauchery and corruption of Georgian England in the company of a pair
of likeable thieves.  Instead it turns into something of a misguided
and disappointing mess, and its contemporary touches jar.
 
**
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
THE PHANTOM MENACE (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: George Lucas
Stars: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Terence Stamp, Samuel L Jackson, Frank Oz, Ray Park, Kenny
Baker, Anthony Daniels, Pernilla August, Ralph Brown, Hugh Quarshie,
Ahmed Best
Running time: 130 minutes.
Expectations have been high for this eagerly awaited and long
overdue prequel to George Lucas' classic sci-fi adventure Star Wars.
Given the barrage of hype that has preceded the movie, Star Wars
Episode 1, subtitled The Phantom Menace, was always going to have a
hard job living up to those lofty expectations.  Inevitably, The
Phantom Menace is a little disappointing!  The original Star Wars was
a film ahead of its time; The Phantom Menace is merely a film for its
time!
Returning to the director's chair after a twenty year absence,
Lucas takes the audience back to the beginning of his envisaged nine
part saga, and introduces us to the young Anakin Skywalker.  As every
Star Wars fan knows, Anakin is the Jedi knight who, of course, later
grew up to father both Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia before
crossing over to the dark side of the force as the evil Darth Vader.
Caught in the middle of a trade war between the powerful
Federation and the peaceful planet of Naboo, Jedi knights Qui-Gon Jinn
(Liam Neeson) and his apprentice Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor) try to
negotiate a settlement.  While on the planet of Tatooin, Jinn
recognises the nascent power of the young slave Anakin (played with
charm by Jake Lloyd), and decides to take him under his wing.
In many ways, The Phantom Menace follows the broad plot
threads of the original Star Wars, although without the same sense of
wonder and inspiration.  What was once a simple fable about the battle
between good and evil has become far more mystical and mythic, and
occasionally bogged down in more complex ideas.  In establishing the
framework for what follows, Lucas raises nearly as many questions as
he answers.
One of the main problems is that the film is occasionally a
little slow, with some passages of plot development that will prove
tiresome and a little boring for younger audiences.  The film also
lacks any villain as imposing or as intimidating as Darth Vader.
Instead, the best Lucas can offer us here is the rather bland and
forgettable Darth Maul (played by martial arts champion Ray Park, in
his film debut).  There is a much more obvious emphasis on slap stick
humour throughout this film, especially with antics of the accident
prone Jar-Jar Binks, a computer generated character who speaks his own
strange language.
However, some of the action sequences are quite exciting, with
a couple of light sabre duels and a battle sequence between two
digitally created armies.  The undoubted highlight is the pod race, an
incredible sequence that resembles a futuristic version of the famous
chariot race from Ben Hur for the Nintendo generation.
The special effects and state of the art computer generated
imagery, which took some two years to complete, is indeed spectacular,
and represents the future direction of film making.  Unfortunately, it
is a pretty heartless and soulless future in which human performers
are dwarfed by increasingly spectacular effects and technology.
About 90% of The Phantom Menace has been digitally created,
and the human performers seem a little lost when called upon to
interact with their brilliantly realised cyberspace universe.  In many
ways this is symptomatic of Lucas, a pioneer of digital effects, who
shows little understanding of the emotional development of his
characters.  Lucas seems to regard his human cast as mere accessories
to his whiz bang technology and cynical mass marketing techniques,
and, in this aspect, he is light years ahead of Hitchcock in his
reputed disdain for actors.
Neeson, who normally has a powerful screen presence, seems a
little awkward here, while McGregor seems as bewildered and as
uncomfortable as Alec Guiness did in the same role twenty years ago.
Performers of the calibre of Terence Stamp and Samuel L Jackson are
wasted in small, undemanding roles.
Many of the new characters introduced here are fairly
unimpressive.  Whereas we once might have followed the charismatic Han
Solo, the impetuous Luke Skywalker and the feisty Princess Leia to the
ends of the galaxy, I'm not so sure that I'd follow this bland and
forgettable lot for a stroll in the park!

Title
Review for Fresh Air (1999)
First time writer/director Neil Mansfield contends that art
can be found in the everyday lives of ordinary people.  He tries to
prove his theory with this video diary following a week in the lives
of three friends who share a house in the inner Sydney suburb of
Marrickville.
Kit (Nadine Garner) shares the house with her boyfriend Jack
(Marin Mimica), a failed film maker, and her best friend E (new comer
Bridie Carter), a uni student who daily compiles her own personal
magazine which she distributes to her small circle of friends.  The
house is situated under the airport flight path.  It is this element
that provides a thematic focus that runs throughout the otherwise
fragmented and loosely structured film.  This is an area that
Mansfield knows well, and the film is enthused with a passion for the
back streets and the residents of this slice of suburbia.  Mansfield
is inspired by the early films of Godard and the French new wave, and
he tries to duplicate some of that energy here.  However, not a lot
that is particularly interesting occurs, and this is ultimately a dull
and meandering film.  Some people may find its easy going style
charming and endearing, others will merely find it dull.
Mansfield has coined a new term to describe his low budget
semi-autobiographical film - "zinema" - which suits its multi-media
format.  The film combines the cut and paste methodology of magazines
with the flexibility of various different film stocks, and still
photography, drawings and other objects that interest the characters.
Despite the obvious passion displayed by Mansfield and his crew, the
film itself is rather artlessly constructed.  A couple of scenes use a
disconcerting method of jump cut editing.  Every line of dialogue in
one scene is obviously cut together from several takes, and this scene
is symptomatic of the film's overall lack of rhythm and style.
Far from a breath of fresh air for contemporary Australian
cinema, this film comes across as little more than a below average,
low budget, experimental effort from a film student.  Fresh Air lacks
the charm and winning humour of Love And Other Catastrophes, another
local low budget film which used a similar improvised approach, and
seems rather stale by comparison.

Title
Review for My Life So Far (1999)
MY LIFE SO FAR (PG).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Hugh Hudson
Stars: Colin Firth, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Rosemary Harris,
Malcolm McDowell, Irene Jacob, Tcheky Karyo, Robbie Norman, Kelly
MacDonald, Freddie Jones, Brendan Gleeson
Running time: 96 minutes.
Set in Scotland in the period between world wars, this rather
forgettable and unspectacular tale from Hugh Hudson (Chariots Of Fire,
etc) seems inspired by the Merchant Ivory school of film making.  This
visually beautiful but dramatically dull family saga explores a life
of privilege and wealth that was soon to be changed forever by
sweeping events.  The film's sedate pace and gentle rhythm suggests
the calm before the storm.  Based on the memoirs of Sir Denis Forman,
one of the founding fathers of the British television industry, My
Life So Far really offers little of great insight or interest to
casual audiences.
The film is set in Kiloran, the sprawling ancestral estate in
the Scottish highlands that is home to the fictional Pettigrew family.
Much of the film unfolds from the perspective of its ten year old
narrator Fraser Pettigrew (a rather grating and unappealing
performance from newcomer Robbie Norman), who comes of age during this
period of great change.
His father is Edward Pettigrew (Colin Firth, from Shakespeare
In Love, etc), an eccentric inventor who also farms moss on the
property, and seems to lack any real sense of ambition.  His wife
Moira (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, wasted in a fairly thankless role)
raises the numerous children, and suffers her husband's foibles
quietly.  But the arrival of Edward's millionaire brother Morris
(Malcolm McDowell, in probably his most sympathetic and substantial
role for quite some time) and his much younger and beautiful French
fiancee Heloise (Irene Jacob) for a brief visit brings a new dynamic
and air of sexual tension to the house that eventually disrupts the
family harmony.  Fraser and Heloise develop a strong bond that upsets
Edward, who is secretly attracted to his future sister in law.
Another visitor to the property is Gabriel Chenoux (Tcheky Karyo), the
enigmatic French aviator, who also leaves his mark on the family.
Fraser's slow awakening to the broader world beyond the confines of
Kiloran provides the film with some of its humour and charm.
Beautifully shot around Argyle and the Scottish highlands, the
film certainly looks superb, and the period detail is spot on.
However, Hudson's direction is uninspired and unhurried, and lacks
flair.  The film moves at a sedate pace that may test the patience of
many.  This is little more than a routine television movie on a lavish
budget.
On the evidence of this glossy but rather uninspiring film,
it's been a rather unspectacular life so far.  It certainly doesn't
whet the appetite for further instalments in the rather ordinary life
and times of Fraser Pettigrew!

Title
Review for Ideal Husband, An (1999)
AN IDEAL HUSBAND (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Oliver Parker
Stars: Cate Blanchett, Minnie Driver, Rupert Everett, Julianne Moore, 
Jeremy Northam, John Wood, Peter Vaughan, Lindsay Duncan, Jeroen Krebbe,
Michael Culkin
Running time: 97 minutes.
Oscar Wilde's sophisticated wit, genial bon mots and acerbic
one liners shine in Oliver Parker's solid, if somewhat uninspired
screen adaptation of his play An Ideal Husband.  Parker seems more
comfortable with the demands of adapting Wilde's quaintly old
fashioned, Victorian-era drawing room comedy than he did with his
recent version of Shakespeare's Othello (featuring Kenneth Branagh and
Laurence Fishburne).
An Ideal Husband is faithful to Wilde's play and still retains
whiffs of its theatrical origins, but Parker beautifully enervates the
script and the drama.  He has also assembled a solid international
cast, who relish the witty dialogue and deftly bring the urbane
characters to life.
The central plot centres around a scheme to blackmail upright
and rising politician Sir Robert Chiltern (Jeremy Northam, from The
Winslow Boy, etc) into offering his support to a dubious enterprise
during a speech in Parliament.  The scheming Mrs Cheveley (Julianne
Moore) knows the secret behind Sir Robert's wealth and threatens to
expose him if he refuses to co-operate.  Sir Robert is more concerned
about the effect the revelation will have on his devoted but morally
principled wife Gertrude (Aussie actress Cate Blanchett, recently seen
in Pushing Tin.)  In desperation, Sir Robert turns to his friend Lord
Goring (Rupert Everett) for help.  Despite his wealth, Lord Goring is
an idle bachelor who enjoys shirking any sense of responsibility
whatsoever, much to the disgust of his father (John Wood).
All sorts of questions concerning morality, duty, and
responsibilities are raised.  There are plenty of comic mishaps and
misunderstandings along the way before everything is happily resolved.
Everett is beautifully cast as Wilde's witty and debonair alter ego
here, and his suave and sure way with the clever one liners ensures
that the film comes alive whenever he is on screen.  Northam seems
quite comfortable in effete period pieces, and delivers a solid
performance as the troubled Chiltern.  Blanchett delivers a nicely
restrained and understated performance as Chiltern's loyal wife, but
is easily outclassed by Moore's manipulative and scheming Mrs
Cheveley.  Again proving that she is the best American actress doing
British pictures these days, Minnie Driver is superb as Mabel,
Chiltern's flighty younger sister who has a crush on Lord Goring.
The settings and production design are quite exquisite and
lavish, and add to the overall warm atmosphere that pervades the film.
An Ideal Husband is not spectacular as a piece of cinema, but it is
witty and entertaining enough to satisfy audiences.

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Many local reviewers have already unfairly dismissed this film
before they have even seen it - purely because they dislike its star
Adam Sandler.  However, there are many people out there who seem to
like Sandler's deliberately low brow, dumb brand of humour, and
ultimately they will judge this film on its merits.
The romantic comedy The Wedding Singer showed a slightly
different side to Sandler's talents, and appealed to a broader
audience.  While Big Daddy is not quite as enjoyable, it is still one
of Sandler's more genial and pleasing efforts, and should also prove a
big hit.
Sandler often plays the petulant, eternal adolescent who is
eventually forced to grow up and face up to his responsibilities.  Big
Daddy takes this familiar premise, but adds a cute kid and some
emotional punch to the trusty formula.  Sandler plays Sonny Kouvacs, a
law school graduate who prefers the easy life, living off a
compensation deal from an old accident.  His girl friend Vanessa
(Kristy Swanson) despairs of him ever making a serious commitment to
their relationship.  When an accident of fate temporarily leaves Sonny
in charge of five year old Julian (newcomers Cole and Dylan Sprouse),
he finally sees fatherhood as a way of taking the next step in his
life.
However, Vanessa has dumped him for an older man, leaving
Sonny to raise the child alone.  Although initially reluctant to take
on any sort of responsibility, he gradually finds himself warming to
the boy, and a relationship develops between the pair.  Sonny finds
that Julian's presence helps in establishing a meaningful relationship
with beautiful lawyer Layla (Joey Lauren Adams, from Chasing Amy,
etc), who happens to be the sister-in-law of his former room mate.
Sonny is eventually forced to take the final step into long postponed
adulthood when he has to step into a courtroom to fight for his right
to adopt Julian.
Big Daddy has been written by Steve Franks, but Sandler and
regular collaborator Tim Herlihy have tailored the material to suit
the star's screen persona.  There are no great surprises here, as Big
Daddy is fairly formulaic stuff.  There are plenty of jokes about
urination, vomiting and other bodily functions, but it is all handled
with surprising restraint given the nature of the material.
Dennis Dugan, who previously directed Sandler in Happy
Gilmore, seems to know how to get the best out of his star.  He draws
a more restrained and thoughtful performance from Sandler.  The
Sprouse twins add to the cuteness factor with their irresistible,
hugely endearing turn as Sonny's foster son, and they will play a
major in the film's success.  Steve Buscemi is wonderfully droll in a
small role as a homeless derelict.
Big Daddy is often very funny.  But it also has enough heart
to appeal to audiences not usually drawn to Sandler's childish and
often puerile sense of humour.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
DOGMA (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: Kevin Smith
Stars: Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Linda Fiorention, Chris Rock, Alan 
Rickman, Salma Hayek, Jason Lee, Kevin Smith, Jason Mewes, George Carlin,
Janeane Garofalo, Bud Cort, Alanis Morisette, Dwight Ewell, Jeff Anderson,
Barrett Hackney, Jared Pfenningwerth, Kitao Sakurai
Running time: 129 minutes.
Who would have thought the final apocalyptic battle between
the forces of good and evil for the future of the world would take
place in New Jersey, of all places?  Possibly only Kevin Smith
(Clerks, Chasing Amy, etc), the idiosyncratic writer/director who sets
all his off beat, low budget comedies in his beloved New Jersey.
In the past, Smith's films have offended many with their
misogynistic humour, their cynical take on relationships, and their
decidedly anti-authoritarian stance.  While Smith is obviously working
with a bigger budget here, Dogma is little different in style or
content from his earlier films.  However, Dogma is a far more
ambitious film, and finds Smith exploring more sophisticated themes
and ideas.  Smith deconstructs 2000 years of biblical mythology and
Catholic dogma, as well as tackling issues of mortality, faith, and
belief versus organised religion.  Among the more contentious ideas
offered up in Dogma are a female God (played with a curiously
childlike grace by rock singer Alanis Morisette), a black Jesus, and a
thirteenth, black apostle left out of the Bible for reasons of
political correctness.
In Dogma, hot young stars Matt Damon and Ben Affleck continue
the familiar best buddy schtick they have perfected through films like
Good Will Hunting, etc.  The pair play Loki and Bartleby, two vengeful
angels thrown out of heaven but anxious to return to the good graces
after centuries in exile.  They have now found a liturgical loophole
that will enable them to re-enter heaven.  However, if that happens,
it will somehow prove the fallibility of God and thus destroy
existence as we know it.
Tapped to prevent this cataclysmic event is Bethany (Linda
Fiorentino, from The Last Seduction, etc), a lapsed Catholic who runs
an abortion clinic in Pittsburgh.  Also along to help out is hyper
active, fast talking comic Chris Rock (Lethal Weapon 4, etc), who gets
some of the film's best lines as the very annoyed and ignored 13th
apostle Rufus.  The hapless duo of Silent Bob (played by Smith
himself) and Jay (Jason Mewes) have played gradually expanding roles
in each of Smith's films, and here the pair are given a major role to
play as they are mistaken for a couple of prophets mysteriously sent
to assist Bethany in her mission.
Dogma is very funny stuff, with plenty of great one liners,
Smith's irreverent, iconoclastic sense of humour, and the usual pop
culture references.  But Smith's penchant for clever writing often
leads to great long patches of dialogue and unnecessary
philosophising, that slow the film down to a crawl.  His fondness for
puerile scatological humour also surfaces, and while this base humour
may appeal to some in the audience it will not sit as comfortably with
others.
Fans of Smith's warped comic sensibility will find plenty to
enjoy in Dogma, while those who have never really appreciated him or
his films will find little here to redeem him in their eyes.

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
ANALYZE THIS (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Harold Ramis
Stars: Robert De Niro, Billy Crystal, Lisa Kudrow, Chazz Palminteri, 
Joseph Viterelli, Kyle Sahiby, Leo 
Rossi, Richard Castellano, Bill Macy, Jimmie Ray Weeks, Ira Wheeler, Tony 
Bennett
Running time: 103 minutes.
Robert De Niro lightens up slightly as he takes the mickey out
of the sort of character he has specialised in playing during his
thirty year film career.  The mannerisms are the same, as is the
intensity, but in this comedy from Harold Ramis (Groundhog Day, etc)
they are given a comic spin.  De Niro plays Paul Vitti, a tough New
York mobster who is having anxiety attacks.  Desperate to find a cure
before a planned meeting between all the gangster families, Vitti
secretly seeks psychiatric help.
The unlucky doctor is Ben Sobel (Billy Crystal), a family
therapist anxious to break out of the shadow of his more famous
father, an up-market psychiatrist, best selling author and multi-media
personality.  Although Ben recognises the challenge in working with
Vitti, he is about to take a week off work and marry his fiancee
(Friends' star Lisa Kudrow), a tv journalist.
However, a powerful mobster like Vitti doesn't easily take
"no" for an answer, and Ben's simple life is turned upside down.  He
becomes heavily involved in Vitti's cut throat and violent world.
This unusual premise works a treat under Ramis' slick
direction. There are plenty of superb one-liners and throw away
visual gags, and even the homage to The Godfather works beautifully.
In one scene, Ben tries to explain complex Freudian concepts to the
hot headed mobster.  In another, Vitti turns the tables on Ben by
probing his fears, thus proving that even gangsters have rare insights
into human nature.
De Niro doesn't make many comedies (the disappointing We're No
Angels is a rare exception), but he seems to be enjoying himself in a
rare comic role that enables him to put a different spin on the type
of character that he has made his own.  In a welcome return to form,
Crystal holds his own against the volatile and intimidating De Niro.
Kudrow, who added spark to the wonderful The Opposite Of Sex, is given
little to do as Ben's fastidious fiancee.  Chazz Palminteri (The Usual
Suspects, etc) is also wasted in a small and increasingly familiar
role as a tough gangster who'd rather exchange bullets than words.  If
anyone comes close to stealing the acting honours it is Joe Viterelli
(Bullets Over Broadway, etc), who gives a wonderful performance as
Vitti's rotund body guard, the aptly named Jelly.
Analyze This is a far cry from the mean streets that De Niro
ordinarily inhabits, but it is an interesting and entertaining
diversion through less travelled territory for, arguably, America's
greatest living screen actor.

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
This slick and undeniably entertaining thriller about a
seductive female insurance investigator who tries to catch a suave
thief almost makes the forthcoming remake of the 1968 caper movie The
Thomas Crown Affair redundant.  Entrapment takes the basic plot
details and updates them with sophisticated technology of the late
'90's, and throws in a few extra twists and turns to make it more
interesting.  Cleverly written by Ron Bass (Rain Man, etc), Entrapment
also brings to mind Hitchcock's To Catch A Thief and its ilk.  The
film adheres closely to the charming formula of those wonderful caper
thrillers from the '60's, but adds a few cynical 90's touches.
When a $25 million Rembrandt is stolen from a New York
skyscraper, insurance investigator Virginia "Gin" Baker (Catherine
Zeta-Jones, who last heated up the screen in the entertaining The Mask
Of Zorro) sets out to prove that notorious but debonair cat burglar
and art thief Robert MacDougal (Sean Connery) is responsible.  She
plans to trap him by convincing him to help steal a priceless Chinese
heirloom from a museum.  But she also has another agenda in mind.
MacDougal soon finds himself involved in trying to steal billions from
Malaysia's high-tech securities bank on the eve of the new millennium.
As with the great caper comedies of the past, the film
explores in detail the elaborate plotting and daring execution of
their impossible robberies.  The uneasy relationship that slowly
develops between the pair is further characterised by a mutual lack of
trust.
British director Jon Amiel (The Singing Detective, etc) is
better known for his off beat comedies, but he brings plenty of
suspense and tension to the material.  The key set pieces are superbly
staged.  There are a number of implausibilities within the convoluted
plot, and a willing suspension of disbelief comes in handy.
However, the sheer chemistry between the two stars more than
carries the movie.  Connery may be the oldest action hero in the
business, but he shows few signs of slowing down or making concessions
for his age.  He still oozes charisma and carries off the role with
deceptive ease and conviction.  The gorgeous Zeta-Jones is seductive,
sultry and heats up the screen as the tough heroine.  Unlike many
other superannuated stars, Connery actually makes the older
man-younger woman dynamic work here.  Connery and Zeta-Jones develop a
real chemistry, and their scenes together positively shimmer with a
palpable sexual tension.  Ving Rhames (from Mission: Impossible, etc)
is along for the ride as the enigmatic Thibadeaux, whose involvement
in the scheme of things is never really explained until the
conclusion.
The ending is a little clumsily handled, but otherwise
Entrapment quickly snares audiences with its appealing and
sophisticated combination of suspense, romance and old fashioned
entertainment.

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
Patch Adams tells the story of a dedicated and unconventional
doctor who challenged the traditional wisdom of his teachers and
peers.  An idealistic medical student, Hunter "Patch" Adams (Robin
Williams) believed that doctors should treat the patient as well as
the disease.  His views brought him into disfavour with the
establishment, and he clashed many times with the staid and humourless
dean of the medical school (Bob Gunton, best remembered as the
sadistic warden from The Shawshank Redemption), who announces that all
the humanity will be trained out of them.  Adams was a naturally
gifted student, which also attracted the ire of his roommate Mitch
(Philip Seymour Hoffman), who came from a family of doctors and was
determined to succeed.  He resented Adams' frivolous attitude, which
undermined all that he believed in.  But it was Adams' ability to
strike a chord with the patients that led to him risking his
reputation, his career and his future to create an environment in
which the patients were happy and temporarily forgot their pain.  He
eventually set up a free clinic with the help of fellow students
Truman (Daniel London) and Carin (a very Julia-Roberts-like Monica
Potter), which became known as the Gesundheit Institute.  Although
Patch Adams is based on a true story, one wonders how many liberties
the film makers have taken with the facts to accommodate Williams'
normally manic persona.  The real Adams was actually a good twenty
years younger than Williams, who seems uncomfortably aware that here
he is the oldest person on campus.  He was only a teenager when he
checked himself into an asylum to overcome his suicidal tendencies and
discovered his talent for healing people's pain through humour,
understanding and compassion.
Patch Adams is meant to be an inspiring and uplifting film,
but it is also a horribly saccharine, clichéd and cynically
manipulative movie that wears its heart on its sleeve.  It is also a
tad predictable, and most audiences will probably be able to join the
dots of the plot by about midway through.  There is the brutal and
unexpected death that brings on a crisis, a moment of self doubt in
which he questions everything he believes in, and then there is the
final vindication.  The idealistic, wise-cracking maverick who rails
against authority and tradition and becomes an inspirational figure
for many along the way has become something of a cliché in
Williams' repertoire (think Good Morning Vietnam, Dead Poets' Society
and even Awakenings, etc).
Director Tom Shadyac has previously drawn restrained
performances from normally outrageous comics like Eddie Murphy (The
Nutty Professor) and Jim Carrey (Liar Liar), but he seems unable to
keep his star on a tight leash here.  There are plenty of scenes in
which Williams cuts loose with the sort of energy and seemingly
improvised humour that audiences love and expect.
 Dramatically, Williams is 
also permitted a number of moving and emotional scenes.  His outrageous 
performance dwarfs the 
otherwise solid work of his co-stars, who find themselves lumbered with 
one-dimensional, stereotyped 
characters.  
Patch Adams is a film designed to show case the talents of its
popular star, and fans will find plenty to admire.  Others, not so
enamoured of the outrageous Williams, may find the whole thing a
vaguely unsatisfactory experience.

Title
Review for Hilary and Jackie (1998)
HILARY AND JACKIE (M).  
(Intermedia Films/Film Four/Village Roadshow)
Director: Anand Tucker
Stars: Emily Watson, Rachel Griffiths, Celia Imrie, James Frain, Charles 
Dance, David Morrissey, Bill 
Paterson, Rupert Penry-Jones, Auriol Evans, Keeley Flanders, Nyree Dawn 
Porter
Running time: 120 minutes.
The tortured life of gifted but flawed musicians has provided
some rich material for film makers over the years.  Former documentary
director Anand Tucker's stylish and touching film depicting the life
of tragically doomed world renowned cellist Jacqueline Du Pre is
nearer to the moving realism of Scott Hicks' brilliant Shine than it
is to the excesses of Ken Russell's tasteless and exuberant biopics
(Mahler, The Music Lovers, etc).
Hilary And Jackie looks at the complex relationship between
Jacqueline, who eventually succumbed to multiple sclerosis, and her
older sister Hilary, an acclaimed flautist whose career never really
took off to the same extent.  This earnest film is a telling
exploration of sibling rivalry, the sense of competition between
artists, the weight of living up to expectations, and the toll that it
inevitably takes.
As youngsters, the two girls were driven to succeed by their
pushy mother (Celia Imrie).  Hilary was the early achiever in the
family, but when Jackie's prowess with the cello thrust her into the
limelight their respective fortunes and careers took very different
paths.  Hilary (Aussie actress Rachel Griffiths) eventually married
and settled down in a remote farmhouse to raise a family, while Jackie
(played by Emily Watson, from Breaking The Waves, etc) embarked on a
mammoth European tour that took a huge physical and emotional toll.
Drawing largely upon Hilary Du Pre's own memoir about her
sister, British writer Frank Cottrell Boyce (Butterfly Kiss, etc)
brings the characters to life in an intelligent and detailed script
that avoids the usual clichés of the biopic.  The narrative traces
the different fortunes of the two sisters, and some key emotional
events are seen from two perspectives.  Hilary And Jackie spans some
thirty years, moving from the post war austerity of 1950's England
through to the 1980's, although Tucker doesn't overload the film with
conscious period references or tiresome details.  Tucker (best known
for The Vampire's Life, his documentary about author Anne Rice) makes
his feature debut with Hilary And Jackie, and he brings a sense of
gritty realism to the material.  David Johnson's camera constantly
prowls around the stage, bringing life and a sense of energy to
otherwise static scenes.  Tucker draws a pair of superb performances
from his two actresses.  Griffiths delivers a more restrained
performance, but she captures the sense of frustration and failure
experience by Hilary, who feels slighted that she is often overlooked
and remains in the shadow of her sister's achievements.  Watson has
the meatier role as the sexually precocious, selfish and intense
Jackie.  She has to deal with depression and debilitating illness, and
she delivers a powerful and draining performance that elicits
begrudging sympathy for this doomed figure.  Both should have good
reason to feel a little miffed that they were beaten at the Oscars by
a couple of lightweight performances from Shakespeare In Love.
James Frain (recently seen in Elizabeth, etc) delivers a solid
performance as Daniel Barenboim, the Argentinian pianist who married
Jackie.

Title
Review for Last Days, The (1998)
Established by Steven Spielberg in 1994, the non-profit
Survivors of the Shoah Visual History Foundation aims to record and
document the stories of Holocaust survivors as part of a lasting
record for future generations.  Spielberg and director James Moll have
already produced a couple of award winning tv documentaries.  This
remarkable and haunting Oscar winning documentary is the first feature
film from the Foundation, and depicts the unique Hungarian experience.
In 1945, even when it became obvious that the war was lost,
Hitler began a massive campaign to eradicate the Hungarian Jews.  He
directed enormous resources away from the Russian Front and assigned
them the task of moving the Jewish population from the ghettos to the
death camps, where they were systematically executed.  Culled from
intensive research and an exhaustive series of interviews, this
moving, powerful and ultimately inspirational documentary tells the
story of those horrific last days of the war through the eyes of five
survivors.
The five survivors have gone on to lead fulfilling lives,
devoted to humanitarian causes, and their inspirational stories
deserve to be heard.  Tom Lantos is now a US congressman; Renee
Firestone is a teacher who educates school children on the Holocaust;
artist Alice Lok Cahana uses art as a way of capturing her
experiences; while businessman Bill Basch and Irene Zisblatt continue
to share their experiences.  Although they come from different
backgrounds, they share stories of horror, sacrifice and extraordinary
courage in intimate and painfully personal terms for the camera.
Moll eschews traditional narration here, intercutting between
the various stories to dramatically reveal the full impact of their
horrific experiences.  Moll deliberately pushes a number of emotional
buttons throughout the film, arousing audience sympathy for his
subjects.  He is aided by a highly emotive background score from Oscar
winning composer Hans Zimmer.
As with the Oscar winning 1995 documentary Anne Frank
Remembered, director Moll has taken some of the survivors back to the
ruins of the camps to put their reminiscences into perspective.  Some
of them visibly break down on camera.  It may be uncomfortable viewing
for some, but it certainly makes for great drama.  In one scene, a
survivor actually confronts the Nazi doctor who performed experiments
on her sister in the camps.  But the most haunting and indelible
images come from the previously unseen footage of the painfully thin
and desiccated survivors of Dachau, taken by the US soldiers who
liberated the notorious camp in 1945.
This intelligently constructed documentary tries to capture
the grim extent of the unimaginable horror of these camps, but it is
also a wonderfully uplifting testament to the resilience of the human
spirit.  The Last Days is one of the most powerful and memorable
documentaries to hit our screens for some time.

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
THE HURRICANE (M).  
(Warner Bros/Beacon/Village Roadshow)
Director: Norman Jewison
Stars: Denzel Washington, Deborah Kara Unger, Liev Schreiber, John 
Hannah, Vicellous Reon Shannaon, Dan Hedaya, David paymer, Harris Yulin,
Rod Steiger, Clancy Brown, Al Waxman, David Lansbury, Garland Whitt,
Badja Djola
Running time: 156 minutes.
        Here comes the story of Rubin "Hurricane" Carter, the boxer
who was framed for a murder he didn't commit and spent the next 22
years fighting to prove his innocence.  Carter's story was first made
famous through Bob Dylan's song, which resonates throughout the film,
but The Hurricane continues the story up to the present day.
Writers Dan Gordon and Armyan Bernstein take numerous
liberties with the truth, changing many of the facts for dramatic
purposes.  In the process, The Hurricane becomes a powerful howl of
outrage against the volatile climate of racial tension and intolerance
that led to a blatant miscarriage of justice.  Director Norman Jewison
has explored these themes before, most notably in the Oscar winning
classic In The Heat Of The Night and A Soldier's Story, and his
obvious passion shapes this epic film into an overtly manipulative yet
compelling and moving experience.
The fight to clear his name is taken up in earnest when the
barely literate 13 year old Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon, a
regular on tv series Dangerous Minds, etc) purchases a copy of
Carter's autobiography for 25 cents at a book sale.  Lesra has been
taken under the wing of three liberal Canadians (Liev Schreiber,
Deborah Kara Unger, from Crash, etc, and Sliding Doors' John Hannah),
who take him from the slums of Brooklyn to improve his education.
Inspired by Carter's book, Lesra begins a correspondence with the
imprisoned boxer that changes both their lives.  Embittered and
disillusioned by his experience, Carter (superbly played by Denzel
Washington in one of the best performances of his career) begins to
trust the young Lesra, and an unlikely but ultimately inspiring
friendship develops.  Convinced by Lesra's belief in Carter's
innocence, his three guardians begin to investigate the case
themselves, hoping to find the crucial evidence that will overturn the
wrongful conviction.
They are dealing with a case in which the tainted evidence is
firmly buried in the past.  Many key witnesses are long dead, and some
of the remaining players, like corrupt racist cop Della Pesca (Dan
Hedaya), want to ensure it remains closed.  Eventually the three
amateur sleuths triumph, as Federal Court Judge Sarokin (Rod Steiger)
overturns the conviction and sets Carter free.
Unlike other more conventional biopics about champion boxers
(Somebody Up There Likes Me, The Greatest, and Martin Scorsese's
blistering Raging Bull, etc) The Hurricane is as much as a powerful
prison drama, with overtones of The Shawshank Redemption, and a
stirring quest for justice as it is the story of a fighter who could
have been the champion of the world.  Jewison has taken a leaf out of
Scorsese's book, and had veteran cinematographer Roger Deakins film
the brutal boxing scenes in glorious black and white.
But The Hurricane is not merely the story of Carter's search
for justice and redemption - it is also Lesra's story.  Jewison draws
wonderful parallels between the pair - one imprisoned by racial hatred
and prejudice and searching for justice, the other largely imprisoned
by the impoverishment of his background and struggling for direction.
However, some of the peripheral characters, such as Hedaya's corrupt
cop and the three Canadians, are clumsily sketched and remain largely
stereotyped and ill-defined The stellar cast struggle against an often
impoverished script to bring their underdeveloped characters to life.
Fittingly enough, The Hurricane is Washington's film, and his
powerful presence dominates the screen.  He brings an innate sense of
dignity to every role he plays, but here he also brings a palpable
sense of anger and vehemence to his powerful performance.  Washington
is thoroughly convincing in a complex role that requires him to age
some 20 years and run a gamut of emotions.  Steiger's brief appearance
as the judge is certainly flamboyant, but, thankfully, less erratic
than his recent scene stealing turn in a similar role in the recent
Crazy In Alabama.
With The Hurricane, Jewison wears his heart openly on his
sleeve, which leads to some moments that are manipulative, clichéd
and saccharine.  However, it's a measure of Jewison's earnest and
impassioned approach that Carter can utter a line as potentially
clichéd as "Hate put me in this prison, but love is going to set me
free" and reduce an audience to tears rather than howls of derision.

Title
Review for Universal Soldier: The Return (1999)
UNIVERSAL SOLDIER: THE RETURN (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Mic Rodgers
Stars: Jean-Claude Van Damme, Michael Jai White, Bill Goldberg, Daniel 
Von Bargen, Kiana Tom, Justin Lazard.
Jean-Claude Van Damme reprises his character of Luc Devereaux,
the regenerated soldier, for this risible second sequel to 1992's
violent futuristic thriller Universal Soldier.  Van Damme was absent
from the dire 1998 sequel Universal Soldier II Brothers In Arms, in
which his character was played by another performer.  That film
disappeared straight to video in this country.  Van Damme's return
doesn't necessarily herald an improvement in quality, but it does
ensure that Universal Soldier: The Return gains a brief cinema release
before disappearing into the same video wilderness that has claimed
most of his recent lacklustre efforts.
With the end of the Cold War, the military is drastically
reducing its budget.  The first cutbacks affect the futuristic unisol
project, in which dead soldiers are regenerated and turned into
virtually indestructible cyborgs.  But SETH, the super-intelligent
computer responsible for much of the unisol project, rebels against
the government's plans, and seizes control of the soldiers.  SETH
manages to assume human form (martial arts star Michael Jai White) and
lead his invincible troops as they take over the top secret complex
that houses the unisol project.  As a stand-off develops between the
regular army and the cyborgs it falls to Devereaux to try and stop
SETH's plans.
Mic Rodgers, a former stunt co-ordinator who has worked on
films including Titanic and Lethal Weapon 4, makes his directorial
debut here.  He handles the action and pyrotechnics effectively
enough, but he lacks the flair and visual style of original creators
Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin.
Universal Soldier The Return lacks the energy and
spectacularly staged action sequences of the original.  This highly
unlikely scenario uses the original provocative theme purely as an
excuse for lots of testosterone-fuelled action, loud explosions,
gratuitous mayhem, formulaic and mindless carnage.  Whereas the
original managed to pit Van Damme against fellow action star Dolph
Lundgren, the best this dire sequel can do is pit our uncharismatic
muscle bound hero against Bill Goldberg, the popular wrestler, whose
woeful, one-dimensional performance takes the craft of screen acting
to a new low.
Universal Soldier The Return is a far cry from Van Damme's
superior action thrillers like Time Cop and Sudden Death, and further
demonstrates just how far his career has fallen.  The scene in which
his character complains that he doesn't want to be stereotyped
resonates with an unintentional irony.
This is one return that is both unnecessary and unwelcome.    

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
10 THINGS I HATE ABOUT YOU (PG).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Gil Junger
Stars: Julia Stiles, Heath Ledger, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Larisa Oleynik, 
Andrew Keegan, David Krumholtz, Larry Miller, Susan May Pratt, Gabrielle
Union, Daryl "Chill" Mitchell, Allison Janney, Kyle Cease, David Leisure.
        Shakespeare gets a contemporary workout in this enjoyable teen
comedy which has broad audience appeal.  Essentially a modern version
of The Taming Of The Shrew set in a Seattle high school, 10 Things I
Hate About You uses the broad threads of the play to explore more
relevant themes and issues.
The shy Cameron (Joseph Gordon-Levitt, from popular tv sitcom
Third Rock From The Sun, etc) wants to date the beautiful and popular
Bianca Stafford (Larisa Oleynik).  The stumbling block is her older,
shrewish sister Katrina (Julia Stiles), who loves death metal, the
morbid poetry of Sylvia Plath, and whose sharp tongue drives away any
boy who shows even the slightest interest in her.  The girls' single
father (Larry Miller) constantly worries about his two daughters, and
forbids Bianca to go on a date unless Katrina also has a date.
Cameron is faced with the impossible mission of trying to coerce
someone to go out on a date with Katrina.
The answer to his dilemma lies in Patrick (played by Aussie
actor Heath Ledger, best known for his role in the short-lived series
Roar), the new boy in school.  Patrick has a reputation as a wild man
and is dogged by rumours about a dark past, all of which makes him
perfect for the challenge.  Cameron somehow has to persuade Patrick to
date Bianca.  Enter narcissistic and smarmy rich boy Joey Donner
(Andrew Keegan, from Independence Day, etc) to further confuse the
mix, and the scene is set for the typical showdown during the school
prom.
With its exploration of the cut throat world of high school
politics et al, the film ventures into familiar territory (most
recently She's All That, Jawbreaker, etc).  However, the script from
first time writers Karen McCullah Lutz and Kristen Smith is smart and
witty, and puts a fresh spin on some familiar and tired clichés.
Although some of the key plot developments may be fairly predictable,
10 Things I Hate About You sustains the interest, and is surprisingly
entertaining for this over done genre.
Director Gil Junger hails from a background in television, and
he knows how to milk the material for its humour.  There are some
clever sight gags, and the smart, bitchy dialogue will appeal to
broader audiences as well.  The performances of the young, largely
unknown cast are enthusiastic and bring these selfish and shallow
characters to life in likeable enough fashion.

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
THE WHOLE NINE YARDS (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Jonathan Lynn
Stars: Bruce Willis, Matthew Perry, Natasha Henstridge, Rosanna Arquette, 
Amanda Peet, Kevin Pollak, Michael Clarke Duncan, Harland Williams
Running time: 98 minutes.
Murder, marital discord, hit men and mercenary killers combine
to produce some unexpected belly laughs in this curiously appealing
black comedy, filmed largely in Montreal.
Nicholas "Oz" Oseransky (Friends star Matthew Perry) is an
uptight dentist increasingly stressed out by the demands of his money
hungry wife Sophie (Rosanna Arquette, with a funny accent) and his
equally mercenary mother-in-law.  The answer to their various dilemmas
arrives in the form of Jimmy Tudeski (Bruce Willis), a former mob
hitman turned informer, who moves in next door.  Learning that Jimmy
is wanted by Chicago gang boss Janni Gogolak (Kevin Pollak), Sophie
persuades Oz to go to Chicago and collect the reward money for turning
him in to the mob.  Then she informs Jimmy of her husband's actions in
the hope that he will kill him.
Events get wildly out of control when Oz meets Jimmy's
estranged wife (Natasha Henstridge, from Species, etc), and quickly
falls for her.  Meanwhile, Oz's pretty young receptionist (Amanda
Peet) turns out to be an aspiring assassin herself with a fan-like
adoration for Jimmy's past work.  With $10,000,000 at stake for the
survivors of the final confrontation, loyalty amongst killers is thin
on the ground.  While audiences may occasionally become confused with
the details of who is double crossing whom along the way, everything
is resolved neatly by the end.
The cast seem to have had a good time while making this film,
and their enjoyment is reflected in their enthusiastic performances.
Perry seems more comfortable with his role here, and turns in his best
screen performance to date.  He seems to have an affinity for the
slapstick nature of his role, and suffers the brunt of the movie's
pratfalls, walking into doors and falling off chairs, whilst
maintaining some dignity.  Willis seems to enjoy sending up his
taciturn, laconic tough screen image with this broadly comic turn as a
sensitive hit man with a complex set of moral values.  Pollak provides
some fine humour as the crude gangster whose biggest crime is his
relentless mangling of the English language.  Michael Clarke Duncan
(recently seen in the superb The Green Mile) lends his formidable
presence to the role of Frankie Figs, the hitman whose loyalties are
uncertain.
Written by first time screen writer Mitchell Kapner, The Whole
Nine Yards is the latest screen outing for British director Jonathan
Lynn (best known for his work on the classic tv sitcom Yes Minister,
and films such as My Cousin Vinny, etc).  Lynn has a good eye for
clever visual gags and he maintains a reasonably cracking pace
throughout the convoluted turns and twists.  Unfortunately, Kapner's
sense of invention does not quite last the distance, and he seems to
run out of fresh ideas before the final showdown.
Nonetheless, The Whole Nine Yards is an entertaining mix of
black comedy and broad slapstick humour that works a treat, and is one
of the funniest films to hit our screens so far this year.

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
Notting Hill may well be the best romantic comedy of the year!  
The very successful and hugely enjoyable Four Weddings And A
Funeral was always going to be a hard act to follow.  However, writer
Richard Curtis does a superb job of recapturing its charm and winning
humour with this classy, funny and delightfully entertaining follow
up.  Curtis brings genuine charm and wit to what has become an
increasingly familiar and disappointingly unadventurous formula-
driven genre.
This romantic comedy is set in Notting Hill, the colourful and
idiosyncratic London suburb that also provided the backdrop for the
recent If Only.  In the type of role that perfectly suits his relaxed
screen persona, Hugh Grant plays William Thacker, who owns a small
travel book shop in Notting Hill's main shopping strip.  He is
nonplussed when his shop is visited by Anna Scott (Julia Roberts), the
most famous film star in the world, in town to promote her latest
movie.  She is struck by the way he seems unfazed by her fame.
Another chance encounter with Anna, in which William spills
coffee over her, leads to the pair developing a friendship.  She
attends a private birthday dinner with him, enjoying the rare
opportunity to escape the publicity treadmill and the media spotlight
and experience a quiet moment.  William's friends look on in
bemusement as he romances a high profile personality.  However,
numerous problems quickly develop, not the least of which is the
sudden arrival of her actor boyfriend (an uncredited Alec Baldwin).
When that relationship falls apart amid some torrid headlines, Anna
turns to William for comfort.
But can the relationship between the world's most celebrated
movie star and an unassuming book seller survive amid the pressures of
intense media scrutiny and the demands of her glamorous career?
Notting Hill explores these questions, and provides some surprisingly
satisfying answers.  One of Curtis' strengths as a writer is his
ability to create memorable characters - after all, he gave us Mr
Bean, Blackadder and The Vicar Of Dibley.  He injects life into the
eccentric peripheral characters, and the ensemble cast give them
personalities of their own.  One of the more interesting creations is
William's unwashed, dishevelled and offbeat flat mate Spike, (played
in wonderful fashion by Rhys Ifans, from Twin Town), who proves
unexpectedly sympathetic and romantic at heart.
Notting Hill benefits enormously from the inspired teaming of
Roberts and Grant, who develop a wonderful rapport together.  Grant's
easy going presence is a major part of the film's charm, while Roberts
essentially plays herself in a tailor made role.
Director Roger Michell (Persuasion, etc) handles the material
with a perfectly judged light touch, and the unhurried pace suits the
film's tone.  While Notting Hill may not quite reach the same heights
as Four Weddings And A Funeral, it will certainly please audiences.
For the creators here though, in this instance close enough is
definitely good enough.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
YOU'VE GOT MAIL (PG).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Nora Ephron
Stars: Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan, Parker Posey, Greg Kinnear, Jean Stapleton, 
Steve Zahn, Dave Chappelle, 
Heather Burns, Dabney Coleman, John Randolph
Running time: 119 minutes.
With the charming Sleepless In Seattle, writer/director Nora
Ephron successfully remade the '40's tear jerker An Affair To
Remember, as a vehicle for Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan.  Ephron attempts to
recapture much of that same magic with this pleasant enough remake of
Ernst Lubitsch's 1940 comedy The Shop Around The Corner.  Based on
Nikolaus Laszlo's play Parfumerie, the film has previously been
remade, as In The Good Old Summertime, with Judy Garland.
Ephron's contemporary take on this classic tale of two shop
assistants who turn out to be pen pals updates the plot for the
computer literate '90's.  In You've Got Mail, Ephron uses the
possibilities of the internet as its central plot device.  This
sleepless in cyberspace explores how two people who regularly
communicate over the net can actually live close by and pass each
other in the street without ever knowing it.  The catch here is that
the two people who enjoy a cosy e-mail romance by night are actually
business rivals by day.  Eventually romance blossoms between the pair
as they realise that they actually have quite a lot in common.
Hanks plays Joe Fox, an entrepreneurial book dealer who runs a
chain of bookstores.  His latest superstore opens in New York, a block
away from the small book shop, quaintly known as The Shop Around The
Corner, and threatens to close this 42 year old family business.  Joe
frequently clashes with the shop's owner Kathleen Kelly (Ryan).
While rivals in business, Joe and Kathleen are already
secretly correspondents, who share a sort of intimacy through their
nightly communications in an Internet chat room.  He is known as
NY152, while she calls herself Shopgirl.  They share many of their
personal secrets and details of their daily lives.  But it is only
when Joe helps her with her business problems that the anonymity
begins to break down, and their relationship becomes more personal.
Joe has to somehow break down Kathleen's resistance before he can tell
her the truth.
Within the context of the romantic comedy, Ephron also
addresses the changing face of our society, and the clash between the
old ways of doing business and the modern way of life.  Kathleen's
boyfriend Frank (played with ease and charm by Greg Kinnear) is a
journalist who rails against technology and the corporatisation of
America from his old fashioned typewriter.  The script, co-written by
Ephron and her sister Delia, contains some nice one liners, and the
sparkling dialogue is delivered with verve by an attractive cast.
 
There is plenty of chemistry between the two charismatic
stars, teamed together for the third time.  Their easy going rapport
and laid back charm should ensure that this lesser effort is,
nonetheless, a huge hit over the Christmas holiday season.  Ryan is
vivacious and perky, and delivers her usual delightful performance.
Hanks is solid, but somehow is not as convincing as the hard hearted
businessman who discovers his humanity.  The supporting cast consists
of indie regulars Parker Posey and Steve Zahn, and their ensemble
performances add to the material's broad appeal.  You've Got Mail is
innocuous enough and quite enjoyable for the most part.  The main
problem with this light weight film is that it is overlong, and
eventually outstays its welcome.  There is a sense of unnecessary
padding, and the second half of the film becomes a little tiresome as
it limps towards its predictable conclusion.  Nonetheless, You've Got
Mail is not without appeal, and this delightful, feel good, but
occasionally saccharine romantic comedy will undoubtedly please fans
of the genre.

Title
Review for Me Myself I (1999)
ME MYSELF I (M).  
(Gaumont/Buena Vista International)
Director: Pip Karmel
Stars: Rachel Griffiths, David Roberts, Sandy Winton, Yael Stone, Shaun 
Loseby, Trent Sullivan, Rebecca Frith, Felix Williamson, Ann Burbrook
Running time: 104 minutes. 
Something of an Australian variation on films such as Sliding
Doors and If Only, Me Myself I tackles themes of destiny and having a
second chance of living your life over to rectify, or come to terms
with, past mistakes.
Fiercely independent, single and a successful journalist on
the wrong side of thirty, Pamela Drury (Rachel Griffiths) is starting
to suffer from a mid-life crisis.  She is suddenly plagued with a
sense of regret, doubts and dissatisfaction at her life.  She begins
to wonder if her life would have been different if she had married
Robert, her childhood sweetheart, thirteen years ago.  Has she missed
out on something by remaining single while all her friends are getting
married?
Then a mysterious accident enables Pamela to interact with the
parallel version of herself, and they temporarily swap roles.  Without
warning, Pamela is plunged into the routine of domestic duties with
husband Robert (David Roberts), who has grown distant and is occupied
with his business dealings.  She also finds her hands full coping with
the demands of three young children - Stacy (Yael Stone), on the verge
of adolescence and in need of some understanding and sympathy from her
mother; the sullen, surly and rude Douglas (Shaun Loseby); and Rupert
(a cute and scene stealing tyke played by Trent Sullivan), who is in
the throes of toilet training.
At first, Pamela has difficulty coping with her new life, but
eventually she musters all the strength that has marked her life as a
single woman and journalist and begins to pull this dysfunctional
family back together.
Taking its cues from Joan Armatrading's 1970's anthem to
independence, Me Myself I is an exploration of life, love,
relationships and life style choices in the '90's with a decidedly
feminist bent.  It is surprisingly even handed in its treatment of the
contrasts between a single, solitary life and marriage, motherhood and
domestic "bliss."  Some of its observations are truthful and honest.
Many of its ideas about regret, lost opportunities, and making the
most of your life will resonate with anyone in the audience over
thirty.  However, the film is also full of warmth and humour.
Me Myself I is the first feature film from Pip Karmel, a short
film maker best known for her award winning work as editor on Shine.
The film is an extension of an idea explored in one of her short
films, and is entertaining enough, although it seems to lack spark.
Karmel handles the material confidently enough, although the script at
times becomes a little too earnest in its approach and lacks the
breezy quality of many romantic comedies.
Griffiths is, as usual, excellent, and her wonderful presence
holds the film together.  Griffiths admits that her performance here
was largely inspired by Tom Hanks, Meg Ryan and Julia Roberts,
although she lacks their light touch and laid back style.  She has the
range to capture Pamela's emotional journey, but she also possesses a
great sense of comic timing that enables her to play the more physical
aspects of the film without embarrassment.  Roberts is also solid as
her husband, who is trying to deal with his own problems, while
newcomer Sandy Winton has an appealing presence as Ben, for whom
Pamela develops a strong attraction.
But ultimately Me Myself I is visiting familiar territory, and 
has little that is new or fresh to offer.

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
DEUCE BIGALOW: MALE GIGOLO (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Mike Mitchell
Stars: Rob Schneider, William Forsythe, Arija Bareikis, Eddie Griffin, 
Oded Fehr, Gail O'Grady, Jacqueline Obradors, Richard Riehle
Running time: 88 minutes.
Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo is the sort of crass, crude, loud
and generally unfunny low brow comedy that we have come to expect from
the current crop of Saturday Night Live stars.  Fans of the
deliberately dumb style of humour perfected by Adam Sandler will
probably get a kick out of this rather juvenile, politically incorrect
comedy.  Sandler produced this comedy, which stars his friend Rob
Schneider, who played a small role as the pizza guy in Big Daddy.
Schneider plays the eponymous Deuce, a rather innocent,
snivelling loser who cleans fish tanks for a living.  By chance he
finds himself minding a lavish apartment for Antoine (Oded Fehr), a
male gigolo who has gone to Switzerland on business.  Antoine keeps a
large fish tank full of rare fish, and also collects antique weapons
that are worth even more if they have actually been used to kill
someone.  But when Deuce accidentally breaks the tank and wrecks some
of Antoine's precious furniture he is forced to come up with enough
cash in a hurry to repair the damage before Antoine returns home.
With the help of jive talking pimp TJ (Eddie Griffin), Deuce
reluctantly becomes a "man whore."  But things do not go smoothly for
the inexperienced Deuce.  Rather than have sex with his eccentric
clientele (who are either overweight, gigantic, or suffer from
Tourette's Syndrome), Deuce helps them become happy with their own
bodies and their unique problems.  Complications arise when he begins
to fall in love with Kate (Arija Bareikis), the one legged nurse who
works in a hair donor clinic.
Mike Mitchell directs this nonsense with a remarkably heavy
hand and a lack of subtlety.  The performances lack any sense of
nuance whatsoever.  Most surprising of all, however, is the
unashamedly over the top performance from screen tough guy William
Forsythe (The Waterdance, etc), who plays a vice squad cop obsessed
with his sexual failures.
There are some wonderful sight gags, and some rather obvious
spoofs of recent movies, but there is precious little imagination at
work in the script, co-written by Schneider himself.  There is also a
preponderance of tasteless innuendo, smut and puerile toilet humour,
which may appeal to younger adolescent male audiences.  There is an
emphasis on childish slapstick humour and pratfalls, but there are
also many moments that fall flat.

Title
Review for Varsity Blues (1999)
Dawson's Creek resident hunk James Van Der Beek goes from
playing a sensitive school kid tackling some of life's riddles on the
small screen to a sensitive kid tackling some of life's ironies on the
big screen in his first major feature film role.
On the surface Varsity Blues is another movie about football
and the pressures of competing. However, director Brian Robbins (Good
Burger, etc) and writer W Peter Iliff (Patriot Games, Point Break,
etc) give the film a more human aspect that will appeal to those not
normally attracted towards sports oriented movies.  Varsity Blues also
deals with teenage angst, the problems of parental expectations, and
the decisions they are often forced to make that will shape their
lives forever.
Everything in the small Texan town of West Canaan revolves
around the local high school team.  Disillusioned fathers live
vicariously through their son's achievements on the football field,
while the whole town basks in the glory of their triumphs.  Even the
town sheriff overlooks many of their high-spirited pranks.
However, for Jon Moxon (Van Der Beek), football has lost that
element of pure fun that he and his team mates enjoyed as children.
He doesn't buy into the football as a metaphor for life angle espoused
by ruthless coach Bud Kimble (Jon Voight).  Kimble is a legend in the
town for his on field success, although that has come at a high price.
Mox believes that there is life beyond football, and that winning is
not everything.  Of course, Mox's indifference towards football brings
him into conflict with the arrogant Kimble.  We don't learn much about
Kimble's personal life, as we only see him in his office, cluttered
with trophies, and on the field.  Then we realise, somewhat sadly,
that, for him, football and coaching is his life.
While reluctantly warming the bench awaiting his chance to
play, he reads Kurt Vonnegut.  Kimble's star players are forced to use
pain killing injections to prolong their time of the field.  After
Lance breaks a leg after a fierce tackle, Mox is promoted to
quarterback, and becomes the new star of the team.
At first, he has trouble coping with the instant fame and
adulation, and loses direction for a while.  His new found fame also
threatens his relationship with Julie (Amy Smart), who doesn't like
football jocks.  Eventually, Mox manages to put everything back into
perspective and attempts to remain true to his own values.
Varsity Blues has plenty of bone crunching football action,
but it is Mox's off field struggle with some of life's complex
questions that will sustain the interest.  The hunky Van Der Beek will
obviously be one of the main attractions for audiences.  However,
veteran Voight weighs in with another intense, oily performance as the
obsessed and driven coach, and brings some bite to the clichéd
part.  Relative newcomers Scott Caan and Paul Walker are also solid as
two of Mox's team mates.  Ron Lester (from Good Burger) brings a
poignant touch to his role as the overweight but genial giant Billy
Bob.
Varsity Blues is a strong and unusually sophisticated film for
adolescents that delivers some important messages.  It also proves
that teen movies are capable of more than just ribald comedies and
slasher flicks.

Title
Review for Lola rennt (1998)
This grungy, energetic, but off beat German film has been a
huge hit on the festival circuit, and should appeal to audiences
looking for something a little different from the usual bland
Hollywood blockbusters.  Exciting young German director Tom Tykwer
(Winter Sleepers, etc) takes the basic premise of the thriller movie -
the race against the clock scenario - and dazzlingly interweaves it
with a provocative look at how choices, destiny and fate can affect
our lives.
Unfolding at a breathless pace and set to a pulsating
electronic soundtrack, Run Lola Run tells three versions of the same
story.
Lola (wonderfully brought to life by the strikingly red headed
Franka Potente) and her boyfriend Manni (Moritz Bleibtreu) are a pair
of punks who have big plans for the future.  But then Manni becomes
involved in a simple courier run for a local drug dealer.  He
unfortunately loses 100,000 marks of drug money on a train, and has
just twenty minutes to find the money before he meets with the
mobster.  Unsure of exactly how she can help, Lola agrees to meet
Manni in twenty minutes, and thus begins a desperate race against
time.
The story unfolds in real time, as Lola races across town to a
rendezvous with an uncertain, pernicious fate.  But things do not go
smoothly for the pair.  The same story essentially unfolds three
times, but in each subsequent telling, chance, coincidental encounters
and accidents conspire to change the outcome.  The fate of the various
characters dramatically changes with each retelling.
The precociously talented Tykwer is clearly in love with the
process of film making and utilises a variety of medium to bring a
sense of kinetic energy to the film.  Tykwer uses a startling
combination of fast and slow motion camerawork, razor sharp editing,
split screen effects, animation, and flash forward montages to good
effect.  The clever structure is propelled along by the dynamic
presence of Potente, winner of the 1998 Bambi media Awards and one of
the most original screen heroines of recent years.
Run Lola Run is indicative of a new, emerging contemporary
German cinema.  This colourful, energetic, vicariously exciting,
brilliantly constructed, and breathtakingly executed film sweeps you
along with its pace and innovation and leaves you breathless and
exhausted at the end.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
If nothing else, 1999 will be remembered as the year in which
the internet became a vital marketing tool for films.  A case in point
is The Blair Witch Project, the ultra low budget independent film that
has become a runaway box office hit in the States, out grossing far
more polished, expensive studio productions.
        For months now we have been bombarded, via the internet, with
plenty of hype surrounding the film, preparing us for how scary it is,
and informing us that audiences have found the jerky hand held camera
work so unsettling that many have been rushing from the cinema to be
physically sick.  And the web has also been used to tell the back
story about the two hundred year old legend of the so-called Blair
Witch, who lives in the backwoods of upstate Maryland.  The site also
fills in the background information concerning the three student film
makers who disappeared, presumed murdered while making a film on the
popular legend.  Many people actually believe that this is a
documentary, compiled from the recently unearthed footage shot by the
three missing film makers.  Tyro film makers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo
Sanchez effectively create an unsettling atmosphere, and they
certainly play on the audiences' fears and expectations beautifully.
The film is shot using a combination of hand held video and 16mm film.
The hand held camera work is not as unsettling as the massive
publicity campaign would have it, and indeed much of the
cinematography here seems deliberately amateurish, which adds to the
overall effect.
The film follows three students - Heather Donahue, Joshua
Leonard and Michael Williams - as they set out to record a documentary
on the legend of the Blair Witch.  As the three become hopelessly lost
in the woods, hysteria sets in, and they quickly turn on one another,
blaming each other for their predicament.  These scenes are the most
effective and unsettling, as they establish a growing air of unease
that is fed by paranoia and distrust.  At night while they try to
sleep, the three are disturbed by the night time sounds of the forest,
which further unhinges them.  Are they imagining things?  Or has their
belief in the legend of the witch made them unusually jumpy?  Heather,
the project's director and narrator, and the dominant force behind the
three tyro film makers' journey, is also one of the most irritating
and annoying characters.  As her shrill voice unleashes another tirade
against her two male colleagues, many within the audience would gladly
feel like throttling her.
Most of the dialogue is also unscripted, giving the whole film
a natural and spontaneous atmosphere, that further adds to the
illusion of reality.  The Blair Witch Project is easily the most
cleverly marketed film of the decade (century?), but it is by no means
the scariest!  Only the more impressionable and susceptible younger
audiences may find any thing remotely scary and disturbing about the
whole thing.  Rather, this is a cynical triumph of style and hype over
substance.  You have been warned! 
**1/2
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Story of Us, The (1999)
THE STORY OF US (M).  
(Castle Rock/Universal/UIP)
Director: Rob Reiner
Stars: Bruce Willis, Michelle Pfeiffer, Rob Reiner, Rita Wilson, Julie
Hagerty, Paul Reiser (uncredited), Tim Matheson, Jake Sandvig, Colleen
Rennison, Jayne Meadows, Tom Poston, Betty White, Red Buttons
Running time: 92 minutes. 
Cynics would suggest that Bruce Willis stick to doing what he
does best - saving the world with all guns blazing - and leave acting
to more qualified thespians.  But Willis has, in the past, delivered
some quite surprisingly rich and subtle performances that have
demonstrated more to his range than a smirk and a quick way with the
one-liners - the troubled Vietnam vet in In Country, the abusive
husband of Mortal Thoughts, the faded boxer in the cult classic Pulp
Fiction.  The runaway box office success of both Armageddon and The
Sixth Sense has given Willis the clout to again try his hand at
serious acting, and damn what his fans or the studios want.
While Breakfast Of Champions has not fared well at the US box
office and is likely to disappear straight to video here, his other
uncharacteristic venture is far more enjoyable.
The Story Of Us explores a marriage headed for the rocks after
fifteen years.  Willis plays writer Ben Jordan, while Michelle
Pfeiffer plays his wife Katie, who briefly separate and reassess their
relationship while their two kids are away at summer camp for a month.
While their kids are around the two try hard to present an outwardly
happy facade, but when alone they either bicker or descend into
silence.  Rather than comfortable, these silences are oppressive,
shaped by tension and the weight of memories, both good and bad.
Their friends (Rob Reiner, Rita Wilson, Julie Hagerty, and an
uncredited Paul Reiser) offer well meaning advice.  Eventually, Ben
and Katie learn that no marriage is perfect, and that the key to
establishing a lasting relationship is compromise.
Written by Alan Zweibel (Dragnet, etc) and Jessie Nelson
(Corrina, Corrina, etc), The Story Of Us is a genial enough romantic
comedy that puts the ideal of marriage under a microscope.  This is
somewhat familiar territory, having been explored previously in films
as diverse as War Of The Roses, Divorce American Style, He Said, She
Said, and the twee The Last Married Couple In America, etc.  While it
would be easy to be cynical about the whole concept of marriage today,
the film is surprisingly optimistic, warm and laced with some winning
humour.
Director Reiner (When Harry Met Sally, etc) is a dab hand at
romantic comedies, and handles the material efficiently enough,
although there are a few scenes that are badly misjudged.  However,
the montage sequences that encapsulate fifteen years of highs and lows
in about fifteen seconds are quite effective.
Willis seems quite comfortable playing largely against type,
and his performance is solid, revealing several layers to his
character.  However, the scenes in which he is required to cry are not
convincing at all.  At the time he was filming The Story Of Us, Willis
was undergoing his highly publicised split from Demi Moore, and one
can only guess at the psychological insights and emotional baggage
that he brought to the role.  Pfeiffer is a veteran of playing
romantic leads (One Fine Day, etc), and one would have expected a
lighter, more assured and convincing performance from her.  The
biggest problem is that they never quite gel as a couple, and their
obvious mismatch more often than not works against the movie.
Nonetheless, The Story Of Us is an entertaining enough
romantic comedy, and, at a rather brisk 90 minutes, never quite
outstays its welcome.

Title
Review for Girls' Night (1998)
Who would have thought that a low budget British film about
two middle aged women would have been so damn heart wrenching, or,
indeed, so entertaining?
Jackie (Julie Walters) and Dawn (Brenda Blethyn) are life long
friends and sisters-in-law, who have grown up together in the working
class town of Rawtensell, in northern England.  They work together in
an electronics components factory and live in the same street.  Dawn
is self-sacrificing and reserved, and devoted to her family, while
Jackie is abusive, sharp, and combative, with a healthy disregard for
rules and authority.
The only escape from the drudgery of their work and domestic
environment is their weekly Friday night outing to the local Bingo
hall, where they can briefly dream of a better life.  Jackie and Dawn
have always shared their small winnings.  This night, Dawn wins the
jackpot, a piece of good luck that changes their lives in totally
unexpected ways.
Jackie finally finds the courage to leave her husband and quit
her boring job.  Then Dawn is struck down by a mysterious illness.
She is diagnosed with terminal cancer, but decides to keep it a secret
from her family while she undergoes treatment.  The worried Jackie
learns the truth, and, on a whim, whisks Dawn off to Las Vegas to
fulfil a life time dream in the short time she has left.  Along the
way, the two women learn much about themselves, their friendship and
their lives that enriches them.
Like Thelma And Louise, this warm and moving British film is a
wonderful testament to that special bond of friendship that develops
between two women.  However, Girls' Night is tinged with a haunting
air of poignancy given Dawn's terminal illness.  Kay Mellor
(Children's Ward, Band Of Gold, etc) was inspired to write the film
following the death of a close friend, which lends an emotional
potency to the story.  The script is rich in insight and perception,
and features a pair of warm, credible and beautifully developed
central characters about whom the audience comes to care deeply.
Blethyn has made the role of the feisty working class house
wife her own in recent years, but her performance as Dawn lends a
vibrancy to the film, giving the character an unexpected depth and
vulnerability.  She delivers a solid, touching performance that is
thankfully free of some of the clichéd nuances of more recent films
(In The Winter Dark, Music From Another Room, etc).
Walters, too, is well-suited to her role as the bold, brassy
and tarty Jackie, and delivers her best performance since her
breakthrough role in Educating Rita.  Kris Kristofferson's screen
comeback continues to go from strength to strength, and he gives a
sympathetic, likeable performance in the smaller role as Cody, the
ruggedly handsome cowboy the girls meet in Vegas.  The supporting cast
all deliver solid performances.
Nick Hurran, a veteran of tv dramas making his feature film
debut, handles the material with surprising empathy and compassion.
He wrings every laugh and tear from the material, without becoming
obviously manipulative.  The film beautifully evokes the drudgery of
life in a northern town with honesty.  Hurran depicts the glitz and
glamour of Las Vegas with the awe struck approach of an outsider
visiting the town for the first time.  He creates a wonderful contrast
between Las Vegas and the harsh environment of Rawtensell, in which
the characters are sustained only by their optimistic dreams.
Girls' Night is easily the best British tear jerker since Richard 
Attenborough's Shadowlands.         

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
MYSTERY MEN (PG).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Kinka Usher
Stars: Ben Stiller, William H Macy, Hank Azaria, Geoffrey Rush, Greg 
Kinnear, Janeane Garofalo, Claire Forlani, Kel Mitchell, Lena Olin,
Paul Reubens, Wes Studi, Tom Waits, Eddie Izzard, Ricky Jay, Louise
Lasser, Jenifer Lewis, Ernie Lee Banks
Running time: 121 minutes.
This high camp, low brow spoof of comic book super heroes is
ultimately something of a disappointment.  Based on the Dark Horse
comic, Mystery Men affectionately sends up the conventions of more
familiar super heroes, but it also taps the genre for some rich
satire.  The film follows the misadventures of a group of amateur
super heroes who finally get their chance to prove themselves.
Despite a stellar cast, high production values and some nifty one
liners, Mystery Men sadly fails to reach any great heights.
The fictitious Champion City has always been protected by its
resident super hero Captain Amazing (Greg Kinnear, from As Good As It
Gets, etc).  But he has done such a good job of putting away super
villains that he is doing himself out of a job and losing lucrative
sponsorship deals as well.  Captain Amazing hatches a plot whereby he
arranges for his arch nemesis Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush) to
be released on parole, in order to maintain his status.  But
Frankenstein has diabolical plans of his own.  He quickly turns the
tables on the super hero, taking him prisoner and setting up his
scheme to dominate Champion City.
The only ones capable of thwarting Frankenstein's evil scheme
are a tragic group of wannabe super heroes with dubious special
powers.  Blue collar workers disillusioned with their dead end day
jobs and lack of respect from their peers and family, the three men
prowl the city at night trying to fight crime.  These aspiring super
heroes are the Blue Raja (Hank Azaria), an effete master of cutlery
who hurls forks - never knives - at the villains; Mr Furious (Ben
Stiller) who works himself into a terrifying rage; and the Shoveler
(William H Macy) who wields garden implements with dexterity and
skill.  But their incompetence and lack of ability sees them regarded
as little more than a joke by both the police and the supercilious
Captain Amazing.
The hapless heroes are no match for Frankenstein's army, and
reluctantly realise that they need to recruit some more super heroes.
A hasty search turns up the Spleen (Paul Reubens, aka Pee Wee Herman),
whose explosive farts can vanquish villains from ten paces; the
Invisible Boy (Kel Mitchell, from Good Burger, etc), whose ability to
turn invisible works best when no-one is watching; and the Bowler
(Janeane Garofalo), who carries her murdered father's skull around in
a glass bowling ball.
The task of whipping this motley crew into shape falls to the
legendary super hero the Sphinx (Wes Studi, from Geronimo, etc).
However, his habit of uttering clichéd aphorisms like "If you doubt
your powers then you give power to your doubts" both confuse and
frustrate our heroes.  Armed with some high tech non-lethal weaponry
provided by an eccentric armourer (Tom Waits), these amateur super
heroes are ready to take the fight to Frankenstein, for one final
time.
From its distinctive visual style it's obvious that first time
director Kinka Usher hails from a background in commercials.  The
gothic production design and the striking look is reminiscent of the
gloomy look and dark tone that Tim Burton gave to his version of
Batman.  But ultimately the film is all style, with very little
substance.
Usher may be good with visuals and the overall look of the
film, but he's less assured with handling actors.  Most of the
performances here lack subtlety.  However, the always reliable Macy
gives his character a touch of vulnerability and grounds him in a
reality that is sadly missing from the rest of the characters.
Garofalo is at her tart and acerbic best, while Rush's camp and over
the top villain perfectly captures the comic sensibility of the film.
There are some great moments in this film, but there are also a number
of moments that fall horribly flat.
Despite some well meaning ideas about the nature of friendship
and the inevitability of good triumphing over evil, Mystery Men is a
bit of a mixed bag that may struggle to please audiences.  The biggest
mystery of all is how a film with so much potential fell so horribly
short of the mark.

Title
Review for Vie ręvée des anges, La (1998)
First time director Erick Zonca's The Dream Life Of Angels (La
Vie Revee Des Anges) is a grim, warts and all study of female
friendship.  But, unlike most formula driven Hollywood efforts, there
are no terminal diseases or unrealistic, melodramatic plot devices to
test the limits of friendship.  Rather, Zonca opts for an intense
level of gritty realism that will satisfy many in the audience who are
looking for something a little different.  The film explores realistic
and credible characters, emotions and conventional situations with an
honesty that is rare in today's cinema.
Twenty year old Isa (Elodie Bouchez, from Andre Techine's Wild
Reeds, etc) is a drifter, who lives a hand to mouth existence as she
travels across France.  When she arrives in Lille, an industrial town
in northern France, she lands a temporary job in a sewing factory.
She is ill-equipped to handle the job and after a couple of days is
fired.  But at the factory she strikes up a friendship with fellow
seamstress Marie (Natacha Regnier), a taciturn and introverted loner
with a rebellious streak.  Isa moves into Marie's flat.
It turns out that Marie is merely minding the flat for a woman
who was recently hospitalised following a car crash.  Isa and Marie go
out a lot, party hard and drink a lot.  The two eventually develop a
friendship with a couple of bikies, who also work as bouncers at a
local night club.  But when Marie begins a torrid affair with the
handsome but shallow night club owner Chriss (Gregoire Colin), the two
friends begin to drift apart.  Isa can see that Chriss is merely using
Marie, but her friend is reluctant to accept the fact.
Meanwhile Isa herself becomes obsessed with the comatose
daughter of the flat's owner.  She visits the girl in the hospital and
reads to her from her diary, hoping to make some sort of connection.
Their various obsessions begin to drive the two women apart.  What is
also interesting is how the increasingly strained relationship also
changes their character.  We watch how Isa grows in confidence,
strength and assurance while the fragile Marie falls apart.  The two
girls chain smoke their way through the film with such passion that
one can almost smell the cigarette smoke wafting through the cinema.
This sombre character driven piece is driven by the
sensational pair of emotionally draining and insightful performances
from Bouchez and Regnier.  The two actresses have jointly shared a
number of international best actress prizes for their performances
here, but it is Bouchez who beautifully carries off the more demanding
and showy part.  Zonca apparently had the two actresses share a flat
during the making of the film to give an air of realism to their
relationship, and it shows in the increasing air of tension and
acrimony that develops as the film unfolds.
The pace is slow, and Dream Life Of Angels seems to go for
much longer than its 113 minutes running time would suggest.  This is,
at times, a fairly bleak and down beat film that probes deeply into
the makeup of its two central characters.  The early portions are
tempered with some welcome doses of humour, but the tone slowly
changes as the film continues.  There is little let up from its
claustrophobic and depressing atmosphere in the second half.

Title
Review for Soft Fruit (1999)
Some of the more common themes among recent Australian films
have been dysfunctional family relationships and mortality (Crackers,
Radiance, etc).  Soft Fruit is an emotionally draining drama that
combines both these elements in a story that is honest, warm,
compassionate, unexpectedly funny and upbeat, yet somehow endearing.
Soft Fruit is the first feature film from Christina Andreef,
an acclaimed short film maker and former assistant to Jane Campion,
whose films include the festival favourite Shooting The Breeze.
When their mother Patsy (Jeanie Drynan, from Muriel's Wedding,
etc) is diagnosed with terminal cancer, her four children return home
to Port Kembla to help care for her.  Divorcee Nadia (Sacha Horler,
from Praise) returns home from Sydney, bringing her two kids with her,
while the bossy Josie (Genevieve Lemon, from Sweetie, etc) flies home
from America.  Although Vera (Alicia Talbot) has moved out of the
family home she still lives in the same town and works as a nurse in
the local hospital.  Also returning home is family black sheep Bo
(Russell Dykstra), who is briefly paroled from prison on compassionate
grounds.
It's a trying time for all, as old rivalries and tensions and
frustrations again bubble to the surface.  Dad (Linal Haft) resents
their noisy presence, and quickly banishes Bo to the woodshed.  Yet
this tragic gathering also provides an opportunity for painful healing
and reconciliation.  Resigned to her fate, Patsy is determined to
bring the family together again no matter what.
Andreef explores emotionally-laden terrain with sensitivity
and understanding and presents us with flawed but readily identifiable
characters.  Soft Fruit explores the family dynamics with an insight
rare in Australian film, and Andreef taps into some honest emotions
here.
 
She also beautifully focuses on that strong and strange bond
that seems to exist between mother and son.  While the three sisters
argue about medications and diets, and tiptoe around their terminally
ill mother, Bo brings with him a healthy and cynical irreverence that
is as much a tonic for Patsy as her regular doses of morphine.  He
reads to her from her beloved biography about the tragic Jackie O, and
helps her fulfill her wish to live her remaining time to the fullest.
He even sneaks her out of the house for a wonderful day at the beach,
and does an illicit drug deal while the pair are out shopping for
coffins.
Soft Fruit is occasionally episodic in nature, but the film is
held together by the luminous performances of the ensemble cast.  In
particular, the brilliant and vital performance of Drynan, who
suffuses her performance with warmth, humour and sensitivity,
dominates proceedings.  In his first major screen role theatre veteran
Dykstra is superb as the volatile and complex Bo, combining his
dangerous edge with a real sense of compassion and understanding.
Despite solid work from Horler, Lemon and Talbot, the three sisters
ultimately seem to become indistinguishable by the end of the film.
Soft Fruit is one of the best locally produced films of this
year, and its honesty and humanity should strike a strong responsive
chord with audiences.

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
The story of Anna Leonowens, the strong minded, widowed
British governess who travelled to Siam in the mid-1800's to educate
the king's many children, has been told in film many times before.
The most famous incarnation of this story is Rogers and Hammerstein's
musical The King And I, in which Yul Brynner virtually made the role
of the despotic but benevolent king his own, and its subsequent tv
spin off.  The story was previously filmed in 1946's non-musical Anna
And The King Of Siam, and more recently as a bland animated musical.
Director Andy Tennant, who magnificently reinvigorated the Cinderella
story in the recent Ever After, takes the familiar story and breathes
new life into the material in this lavish, epic version.
Jodie Foster essays the role of the outspoken Anna, who
arrives in Thailand from colonial India to educate the heir to the
throne in modern concepts.  She eventually charms and influences the
king, anxious to maintain a delicate balance between tradition and the
future, yet ensure his country's continued independence amidst
colonial expansion into Asia.
It is not clear whether Tennant, whose credits also include
the bland romantic comedy Fools Rush In, was trying to create a lush
epic in the David Lean tradition here, but his direction is a little
uneven.  The film's second half heads into boy's own adventure mode
with its subplot involving an attempted coup and treachery threatening
the palace.  The intrigue is resolved in a spectacular, if contrived,
climactic Bridge On The River Kwai-like confrontation.
While Anna And The King explores broader themes of
colonialism, tradition, and the clash of cultures, its treatment is
nonetheless rather superficial.  The film lacks enough dramatic
confrontations and clashes between the headstrong Anna and the king to
sustain tension and thus hold the audience's interest for its generous
running time.
The two leads combine well to inject passion and warmth into
their roles, and Tennant beautifully develops an air of sexual tension
between the pair.  Foster delivers her usual solid performance, and
maintains an impeccable British accent throughout.  But it is Hong
Kong action hero Chow Yun-Fat who delivers the most surprising
performance here, bringing a beautifully regal bearing and
intelligence to his role as King Mongkut.  Rather than merely
replicating Brynner's famous mannerisms, Yun-Fat stamps his own
presence on the role, creating a far more complex and interesting
character.
The film has been beautifully shot in Malaysia by veteran
cinematographer Caleb Deschanel, and certainly looks gorgeous.  The
production design, which recreates the king's sprawling palace, is
also quite sumptuous.  
***
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Redball (1999)
REDBALL (M).  
(Palace)
Director: Jon Hewitt
Stars: Belind McClory, John Brumpton, Frank Magree, Peter Docker, Anthea 
Davis, Neil Pigot, Daniel Richardson, James Young, Robert Morgan, Daniel
Wyllie, Chris Hatzis, Ray Mooney
Running time: 91 minutes.
A deliberately discordant and jarring opening credit sequence
suggests that we are back in Seven territory.  And even though there
is a vicious serial killer running around in the background of this
nasty, ultra low budget crime thriller shot in Melbourne,
writer/director Jon Hewitt has a completely different agenda in mind.
Redball is a head on, confronting and brutally realistic look at the
pressures facing the police who deal with death and street crime every
day, and the toll it inevitably takes.
Hewitt used to work in a pub near the Russell Street police
complex, and over the years he picked up many stories about real life
investigations and the off duty antics of the cops.  Some of those
tales have been woven into the plot of this hard hitting and often
unsavoury examination of life on the streets and corruption, whether
it be free sex from hookers or taking a kilo off drug dealers for
private use.  Hewitt is no stranger to controversy, as his first
feature Bloodlust is still banned in Britain, and he doesn't pull his
punches here.  Hewitt is a fan of maverick American director Abel
Ferrara, and tries to emulate his uncompromising style with Redball.
The central plot device centres around the hunt for Mr Creep,
a psychopath who preys on young children.  It is a case that obsesses
detective J J Wilson (Belinda McClory, recently seen in the big budget
sci-fi thriller The Matrix) and her cynical and world weary partner
(John Brumpton, from Life, etc).  But far from becoming another police
procedural, Redball is a morally ambiguous film that lurches through
its unflinching examination of this particularly masculine world, and
the camaraderie that exists between street cops, even when off duty.
The cops here seem to have little social life beyond the force, as
they always hang around in tight knit little groups, drinking and
discussing their activities.
Hewitt has the street wise vernacular down pat.  He takes a
scatter-gun approach to his material, and the film unfolds in a series
of energetic short, sharp takes that propel the narrative forward.
Hewitt forces the audience to do much of the detective work in piecing
together the various strands.  A blackly comic running joke about a
dead body floating down the Yarra River lightens the unrelentingly
bleak tone.
However, the overall lack of technical skill and polish behind
this self funded and quickly shot film becomes evident through the
often crude, jump cut editing, which occasionally jars.  Hewitt also
lacked the luxury of being able to do numerous retakes of scenes,
which is occasionally reflected in the performances.  Despite the
limitations of working within a shoe string budget, Hewitt has made
good use of locations within Melbourne.  The hand held camera work
lends an urgency to proceedings, and contributes to the grungy look
that perfectly suits the tone of the film.
 The soundtrack, featuring a number of cutting edge local independent
bands, is often used inappropriately within the context of the film.
Ultimately, Redball lacks the polish and slick qualities of
such films as Serpico, Prince Of The City, Internal Affairs, and even
Joseph Wambaugh's black comedy The Choirboys, which explored the
sometimes shocking off duty antics of LA cops.  It even lacks the
gritty intensity and realism of local tv productions such as Blue
Murder and Wildside.

Title
Review for What Becomes of the Broken Hearted? (1999)
WHAT BECOMES OF THE BROKEN HEARTED? (M).  
(Polygram/Universal)
Director: Ian Mune
Stars: Temuera Morrison, Clint Ereura, Nancy Brunning, Pete Smith,
Rena Owen, Edna Stirling, Tammy Davis, Julian Arahanga, Lawrence
Makoare, Anaru Grant, Warwick Morehu
Running time: 100 minutes.
One of New Zealand's most successful films, Once Were Warriors
was a powerful, harrowing and unforgettable movie experience.  It
explored themes of cultural disintegration, and the destructive,
pervasive machismo culture of a once proud warrior race now
depressingly shaped by alcoholism, domestic violence, bar brawls and
gang warfare.  This eagerly anticipated sequel also taps into the
double edged reality of contemporary New Zealand, but is somehow less
impressive.  Nonetheless, What Becomes Of The Broken Hearted? is still
quite powerful and compelling.
Whereas the original focused on the abused Beth and her
courageous struggle, this new film concentrates on the character of
Jake (Temeura Morrison) and his path towards redemption.  Morrison has
a frightening and intense screen persona which dominates the screen.
His volatile and unpredictable performance seems to explode off the
screen, but he also manages to bring a touch of compassion to the
role.  Rena Owen brings dignity and intelligence to her smaller role
as the long suffering Beth, and proves once again that she was the
emotional core of the original.
When the film opens, Jake is alienated from his family.  A bar
brawl in the opening minutes reveals that he hasn't changed his
violent ways.  He is involved with Rita (Edna Stirling), the new woman
in his life, but when she witnesses his unpredictable and violent
rages, she shies away.  When his son Nig (Julian Arahanga, briefly
reprising his role) is killed in a gang clash, much of the family's
anguish and anger is directed at Jake.  His son Sonny (Clint Eruera)
wants revenge on the gangs, but Jake refuses to become involved.
Sonny joins forces with Nig's girl friend Tania (Nancy
Brunning) and infiltrates a rival gang hoping to seek revenge.  But
things don't work out as planned, and Jake is forced to step into the
breach and use his street brawling skills to save his son and finally
begin the process of healing old family rifts.
Again written by Alan Duff, this sequel retreads some familiar
themes, but it also pushes the material in new directions.  The film
has some very powerful and evocative scenes, but the final climax is
marred by some excessive, Mad Max-like violence and carnage.  Director
Ian Mune, a veteran of New Zealand's film and theatre industry, has
set the film in some of the sleaziest looking areas of Auckland, which
gives the film a sense of gritty reality.
What Becomes Of The Broken Hearted? exposes a seedier view of
contemporary urban New Zealand and its gang culture, but somehow its
nihilistic vision occasionally lacks credibility.  Many of the
characters here also seem one dimensional and the drama ultimately
lacks the depths and emotional pull of the original.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
GO (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Doug Liman
Stars: Sarah Polley, Katie Holmes, Timothy Olyphant, Desmond Askew, Taye 
Diggs, Breckin Meyer, James Duval, Scott Wolf, Jay Mohr, William Fichtner,
J E Freeman, Nathan Bexton, Jay Paulson, Jimmy Shubert, Jane Krakowski
Running time: 102 minutes.
Doug Liman's follow up to Swingers is a much more entertaining
and accomplished film, and one of the cinematic surprises of this year
so far.  The film also features a hot and hip ensemble young cast,
drawn primarily from the world of television soaps (Katie Holmes from
Dawson's Creek and Scott Wolf from Party Of Five), and a number of
rising actors on the cusp of stardom.
Go deals with a drug bust gone wrong, and the narrative thread
follows the various characters through an incredibly hectic 24 hour
period.
Ronna (Sarah Polley, from The Sweet Hereafter, etc), a check
out clerkk in a Los Angeles supermarket, is about to be evicted from
her apartment because she is behind in her rent.  She agrees to take a
double shift, thus allowing her colleague Simon (beautifully played by
British actor Desmond Askew) to go to Vegas with three friends.  Ronna
is approached by Adam (Scott Wolf) and Zack (Jay Mohr, from Jerry
Maguire, etc), the stars of a popular tv soap opera, who are looking
for some drugs to liven up a party later that evening.  Ronna
reluctantly agrees, hoping to score some extra money on the side.
She buys the drugs from Simon's contact Todd (Timothy
Olyphant, from Scream 2, etc), "the nice drug dealer".  But when she
approaches the two actors, she finds out the whole thing is a set-up.
Go explores the aftermath of this drug deal.  The film then
switches to follows Simon's misadventures in Vegas.  While two of his
friends come down with food poisoning, Simon and Marcus (Taye Diggs,
from How Stella Got Her Groove Back) visit a strip joint and run afoul
of the management.  They are pursued back to LA by the club's owner (J
E Freeman), with murder on his mind.
Meanwhile, we learn more about the relationship between Zack
and Adam, and how they came to be blackmailed into co-operating with a
sleazy cop (William Fichtner, from Armageddon, etc) for the drug
operation.
First time writer John August has obviously been inspired by
Tarantino and, in particular, Pulp Fiction, and Go wears its
influences openly and proudly.  In his sophomore film Liman handles
the various narrative strands with assurance, and brings the whole
thing full circle to a satisfying finish.
Liman directs the complex structure with energy and style, and
shows that he is quite adept at staging some inventive action
sequences.  The use of hand held cameras, especially during the
exciting car chase through the streets of Las Vegas, adds to the
movie's breakneck pace.  The film is also suffused with generous
dollops of wry black humour, and a marvellous soundtrack that seems to
propel the action along.

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
SIMON BIRCH (PG).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: Mark Steven Johnson
Stars: Joseph Mazzello, Ian Mitchell Smith, Oliver Platt, David 
Starthairn, Jan Hooks, Ashley Judd, Jim 
Carrey, Dana Ivey
Running time: 110 minutes.
Last year we had two films about killer meteors heading
towards earth, and two animated films looking at the secret world
inside an ant colony.  This year we have two similar films exploring
the unique friendship that develops between two twelve year old
outcasts, one suffering from genetic birth defects, the other obsessed
with his father.
Adapted from the novel A Prayer For Owen Meany, written by
John Irving (The World According To Garp, etc), Simon Birch is a
touching tale of a childhood friendship that leaves a lasting
impression.  This moving but overly saccharine story also shares many
ideas and themes with the upcoming The Mighty.  It's unfortunate that
the decidedly inferior Simon Birch is being released locally before
that far more powerful, inspiring and genuinely moving film.
Writer/director Mark Steven Johnson (best known for writing
the two Grumpy Old Men films) has made numerous changes to Irving's
sprawling novel, but has retained its spirit and flavour.  Set in
1964, the film focuses on one crucial year in the life of the
eponymous Simon and his best friend Joe Wenteworth (Joseph Mazzello,
from Jurassic Park, The River Wild, etc).
Pint sized Simon (newcomer Ian Mitchell Smith) was the
smallest birth ever recorded at Gravestown's hospital.  A small,
precocious and slightly deformed kid, he is largely neglected by his
apathetic parents and ridiculed by many of the unsympathetic
townsfolk.  Simon believes that he is God's instrument on this earth,
but is impatient about waiting to find out his true purpose.  His
strong faith leads him to constantly clash with the humourless
reverend Russell (David Strathairn), who lacks the traditional
Christian values of tolerance, compassion and forgiveness.
The illegitimate Joe doesn't know the identity of his father,
and his mother (Ashley Judd) goes to her grave with the secret.  Simon
becomes involved in helping Joe search to uncover the identity of his
father, a quest that will change their lives and have devastating
consequences.
As with The Mighty, the two young stars hold their own against
the more accomplished adult performers.  Both Mazzello and Smith
develop a wonderful rapport that enriches the movie, and their
engaging performances provide the film with its solid emotional punch.
Smith delivers a wonderful performance in a demanding role.  He is
likely to have a short film career (pardon the pun), because he
suffers from a rare degenerative disease, and there probably aren't a
lot of roles around for someone with his distinctive stature and
physical size.  (Smith apparently also auditioned for a very similar
role in The Mighty, but eventually lost out to Macaulay Culkin's
younger brother Keiran.)
As usual, the very talented Mazzello is excellent, bringing
intelligence and a sense of compassion to his role.  Jim Carrey
appears briefly as the adult Joe, who narrates this quirky but
engaging tale.  The very busy Oliver Platt delivers a nicely
understated but sympathetic performance as Ben, the drama teacher who
becomes a surrogate father to the orphaned Joe.
Best known as a screen writer, Johnson makes his directorial
debut here, but his direction is occasionally a little flaccid.  The
film seems overlong, and episodic in nature, and could have been
tightened up in a number of areas.  Johnson also seems unsure of his
target audience.  The film includes a number of potentially crowd
pleasing elements - there's tragedy, big emotional moments, and lots
of comedy, especially during the staging of the town's "first, full
contact Christmas Pageant."  As the film is set in the early '60's,
Johnson also uses the almost obligatory soundtrack to help bring the
era to life.
Simon Birch may well be a moving and heart breaking tale of a
beautiful friendship between two pre-pubescent boys, but somehow it
seems phoney and unnecessarily manipulative when compared to the
superior The Mighty.  Unfortunately, local audiences will have to wait
a couple of months before they can compare the two and make up their
own minds about their respective qualities.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
U571 (M).  
(Universal/Studio Canal/Village Roadshow)
Director: Jonathan Mostow
Stars: Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi, 
David Keith, Jake Weber, Jack Noseworthy, Erik Palladino, Matthew Settle,
T C Carson, Thomas Guiry, Dave Power, Thomas Kretschmann, Derk Cheetwood
Running time: 112 minutes.
Das Boot without the subtitles?  All of the usual clichés
of the wartime submarine drama are trotted out one more time in this
big budget World War Two adventure from Jonathan Mostow (whose last
film was the Kurt Russell actioner Breakdown).  The surfeit of
clichés however doesn't diminish the excitement nor the
claustrophobic suspense that holds the audience's attention for the
duration.
          By 1942 Hitler's submarines were winning the war in the
Atlantic, due mainly to their unbreakable Enigma code.  The Allies
were desperate to get their hands on the top secret code and thus turn
the tide of war.  When a German submarine lies crippled in the
Atlantic, the US Navy seizes its chance.  Under the command of Bill
Paxton and a gung-ho marine (David Keith), a hastily assembled mission
is sent to board her, retrieve the German code machine and books, and
scuttle the boat.
When the American's own submarine is destroyed by a German
U-boat, the surviving members of the crew commandeer the crippled
U-boat.  They find themselves desperately trying to repair the broken
down U571 and steer her across a hostile ocean to safety in England.
Brash young commander Tyler (Matthew McConaughey) finds himself in
charge, trying to whip his small, inexperienced young crew into shape
under adverse conditions during the heat of battle.  Unfortunately,
there are a number of glitches in the film's plotting, but Mostow's
pacy and ruthlessly efficient direction manages to gloss over most of
them until the curtain closes.  Many may also object to the excessive
jingoism, in which Mostow suggests that the heroic efforts of American
soldiers and sailors were largely responsible for the capture of vital
German code books.
As with many war movies, the characters here are little more
than ciphers that serve the plot, and the audience finds it hard to
identify with them.  Mostow has assembled a strong cast, although many
of the big names are killed off within the first 45 minutes.
Performers of the calibre of McConaughey and Harvey Keitel do what
they can with their essentially one dimensional characters.
However, the film is certainly impressive in its staging of
the underwater battle scenes, and Mostow brings plenty of tension to
the film.  U571 deliberately resembles Wolfgang Petersen's classic
tale of war and heroism in both look and feel, although the potent
antiwar message is missing here.  Production designer Gotz Weidner
even worked on Das Boot.  The special effects and production design
are superb, and enhance the claustrophobic atmosphere.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Great special effects, shame about the story!  
The Matrix boasts some of the most impressive and complex
computer generated special effects sequences of any movie.  However,
the barrage of effects and visual imagination cannot distract from the
fundamental lack of a clear narrative - even a week later I was still
scratching my head trying to puzzle it out.  At first I thought it was
because I saw The Matrix at 10.00 am on a Saturday morning, and I was
still slightly hung-over from the night before.  Then I realised that
my sore head was not the problem - it is the film itself that has some
serious problems.
Film making siblings Andy and Larry Wachowski have an
idiosyncratic style that was used to great effect in the gritty, tough
independent thriller Bound.  However, working with a large budget and
the latest in computer generated technology seems to have overwhelmed
them a little.  Filmed at the new Fox studio complex in Sydney, The
Matrix is a film of style and great ambition, but very little
substance.  All the money seems to have been lavished on the visual
effects, with little thought given to the actual plot that holds it
together.  It pales when compared to the recent Dark City, another big
budget, special effects driven sci-fi thriller shot in Sydney using
Hollywood know-how, money and stars.
The Matrix is set in a not too distant future, where the world
is seemingly controlled by computers.  Morpheus (played in grim and
humourless fashion by Laurence Fishburne) is the head of an army
battling to save the world from the domination of the computers.  They
can transport themselves between their bleak future world and our
present through a series of special telephones located throughout the
city.  Their nemesis are sinister men in black suits, led by the
enigmatic Mr Smith (Hugo Weaving, complete with glaringly phoney
American accent).  These characters are able to assume other
identities and are seemingly invincible.  Weaving seems to be enjoying
himself immensely here, and his performance at least seems to capture
the spirit of the film.
Keanu Reeves returns to action hero mode as Neo, a computer
hacker reluctantly drawn into this battle for the future of the world.
Reeve's sudden transformation from computer nerd into
Schwarzenegger-like action hero is not credible for an instant, and
this mish-mash unfortunately recalls his disastrous Johnny Mnemonic.
The Matrix ultimately seems jigged together using elements
from a number of other sci-fi thrillers, and if you take the time you
could probably identify all of the influences.  The very busy plot
throws together martial arts, slow motion shoot-outs, teleportation,
nasty alien creatures, sinister men in black, people leaping between
city skyscrapers, and frantic chases through the streets of some dark,
sinister city.  Ultimately, the disappointing lack of any intelligible
plot or genuine emotions will prove too alienating for audiences.
"No-one can tell you what the matrix is," declares the tag
line for the film.  I somehow suspect that includes even the writers,
directors and most of the crew.

Title
Review for Deep End of the Ocean, The (1999)
THE DEEP END OF THE OCEAN (M).  
(Columbia/Manadaly/Village Roadshow)
Director: Ulu Grosbard
Stars: Michelle Pfeiffer, Treat Williams, Whoopi Goldberg, Jonathan 
Jackson, Ryan Merriman, John 
Kapelos, Cory Buck, Alexa Vega, Michael McGrady, Tony Musante
Running time: 108 minutes.
Writer Stephen Schiff (Lolita, the recent True Crime, etc) has
done a good job of adapting Jacquelyn Mitchard's best-selling novel
for the screen, and he turns the film into a compelling study of the
psychological damage a family can inflict upon itself under times of
great emotional stress.
The film opens in 1988, when photographer Beth Cappadora
(Michelle Pfeiffer) heads off to a school reunion in Chicago with her
three young children in tow.  In the hotel lobby though her son Ben
mysteriously disappears.  Despite an intense police search and
investigation, the boy is never found.
Nine years later, the family has got on with their lives,
although the tensions, guilt and doubts are still simmering away just
beneath the surface.  The Cappadoras have permanently moved to
Chicago, where Pat (Treat Williams, from The Prince Of The City, etc)
has opened a restaurant with his father and Beth has re-established
her career as a photographer.  Then one day a boy knocks on their
door, offering to cut their lawn.  Beth immediately recognises him as
Ben.
At first, The Deep End Of the Ocean's premise reads a little
like that of Olivier, Olivier, the 1993 French film in which a teenage
hustler tries to convince a family that he is their missing son.
However, in this solid and touching drama, the twist is the boy is
really the Cappadora's missing son.  Ben, or Sam as he is now known,
has been raised by his adoptive father George (John Kapelos), who was
unaware of his origins.
Sam's return brings with it a whole new set of complications,
and the emotional ripples further threaten the family.  Sam's presence
also begins the healing process between Beth and her strangely
disturbed teenage son Vincent (Jonathan Jackson, a star of tv soap
General Hospital), who is consumed by his own guilty secrets.
Another intriguing aspect of the film is the way in which the
characters have changed during the decade.  The only member of the
family who seems unaffected by these events is daughter Kerry (Alexa
Vega), who is given little screen time anyway.
Pfeiffer delivers an unusually strong and emotionally
demanding performance as Beth, who grows stronger and more confident
and controlled.  Jackson is excellent as Vincent, while Williams is
also surprisingly good as he portrays Pat's slow disintegration.
Whoopi Goldberg brings unusual restraint to her smaller role as a
sympathetic detective who befriends the Cappadora family.
Hailing from a theatrical background, Ulu Grosbard is a
director known for his solid character driven films (Straight Time,
Georgia, etc), and he brings a deep emotional resonance to this study
of a family in crisis.  He explores this emotionally complex and rich
material without becoming too manipulative, and keeps the mood
deliberately restrained and understated.  While Grosbard effectively
pushes a number of buttons, The Deep End Of The Ocean is never quite
the tear jerker that it could have been.

Title
Review for Felicia's Journey (1999)
FELICIA'S JOURNEY (M).  
(Icon/Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Atom Egoyan
Stars: Bob Hoskins, Elaine Cassidy, Peter McDonald, Arsinee Khanjian, 
Gerard McSorley, Brid Brennan, Peter Turner, Calire Benedict
Running time: 116 minutes.
Atom Egoyan leaves behind his native Canada to tackle this
chilling, suspenseful psychological thriller about obsession and a
uniquely fascinating and charismatic serial killer.  Felicia's Journey
is set against the background of the bleak urban wasteland of
Britain's post industrial north, and Egoyan and regular
cinematographer Paul Sargossy capture some haunting images and superb
contrasts that beautifully underscore the themes of the grim
narrative.
Felicia (Elaine Cassidy), a naive and shy young Irish lass who
has a brief fling with Johnny (Peter McDonald), a local boy, who heads
south to seek employment in Birmingham.  That's the last she hears of
him, and any efforts to forward letters to him are thwarted by
Johnny's stonily resolute mother.  When she learns that she is
pregnant, Felicia sets off to find Johnny and determine their future
together.
Her search is a futile one, until she meets Hilditch (Bob
Hoskins), a lonely, middle aged catering supervisor at a large
foundry.  The son of a famous former television cook, with whom he
still seems obsessed, Hilditch lives alone in a big empty house that
resonates with anachronistic touches from the '50's.  He initially
offers Felicia some sympathetic advice, and agrees to help her in her
search.  But Hilditch has another reason for helping this lonely, lost
and frightened young woman, which is teasingly made clear through a
series of flashbacks and video recordings.
Egoyan draws some unnerving parallels between these two
lonely, tainted people, who are, in many ways, outcasts from the
regular world.
Hoskins plays Hilditch with remarkable understatement and
poise, giving him a sympathetic edge and atmosphere of compassion that
belies his monstrous nature.  Not since Norman Bates has the screen
produced a cinematic psycho who has been so traumatised by his
overbearing and suffocating mother as Hilditch.  Cassidy's strong
performance imbues the confused Felicia with a touching naivete and
a vulnerability, yet also gives her a hidden strength that slowly
emerges as the full impact of her betrayal sinks in.
Felicia's Journey is based on a novel by William Trevor, and
it seems to resonate with many of those themes common to Egoyan's past
films (The Sweet Hereafter, Exotica, etc).  Egoyan shapes the
narrative with his usual distinctive style, creating an unnerving and
disturbing atmosphere.  Felicia's Journey is far more chilling in what
it suggests than in what it shows.  The restraint with which Egoyan
directs serves as an example for many other contemporary directors,
who equate horror with explicit depictions of blood and gore,
dismembered bodies and lots of graphic, gory effects.  He teasingly
merges the past with the present to inform audiences about the
characters and their motivations.

Title
Review for American Movie: The Making of Northwestern (1999)
The trailer for this low budget, independently financed
documentary made it appear as if American Movie was a po-faced
piss-take on the making of The Blair Witch Project.  But it is so much
more.  The brainchild of Chris Smith, American Movie is a journey
through the frustrations and anguish of the low budget film maker.  It
is enough to either inspire all young hopeful film makers that hope
and naiveté can eventually triumph over adversity and inexperience,
or else it will send them and their cameras packing fearing that the
task of making a low budget film is almost impossible in today's
climate.
Smith documents the trials and tribulations of Mark Borchardt,
an aspiring young film maker from Wisconsin, as he tries to get his
masterpiece Northwestern up and running.  To raise the finance for his
feature film though he first has to complete work on his short film
Coven and then sell 3000 units on video.
American Movie is an up-close and intimately personal portrait
of Borchardt's struggle, both financially and spiritually, to achieve
his dream.  This film was nearly three years in the making, as Smith
followed Borchardt around, recording his frustrating efforts to
complete his film without compromising his vision or artistic
integrity.  We follow Borchardt through film festivals, trying to hype
interest in his project, as well as his endeavours to cast and
complete his short horror film.  When the going gets tough,
Borchardt's relatives, including the unforgettable 82 year old Uncle
Bill, come to the rescue, with funding and physical assistance.
But the most amazing character we meet here is Mike Schank,
who has provided the film's music as well as doubling as a production
assistant.  If anyone can come close to stealing a documentary then it
is the intriguing Schank, whose deadpan style and earnestness are
unforced yet endearingly hilarious.  The film also blurs the
distinction between the film maker and his subjects, as Smith and
Borchardt become friends off camera, adding yet another more intimate
dimension to the documentary.
So cleverly put together is this off beat film that, at times,
it is hard to tell whether American Movie is the genuine article or
yet another of the increasing series of mock documentaries (like
Bigger Than Tina, etc) that have recently hit our screens.  The
background notes certainly make it appear real!
Throughout the film Smith displays a dry and very droll sense
of humour, although not everyone will find the film particularly
funny.  American Movie has an almost unstructured narrative style and
many self indulgent passages that will probably appall as many as it
pleases.  American Movie will not be to everyone's tastes.  This is a
film that you will either love or hate!

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
A recent resurgence of interest in creature features has given
us a huge snake in the risible Anaconda and super smart deadly Mako
sharks in Deep Blue Sea.  Now comes a giant 30 foot man eating
crocodile terrorising a peaceful lakeside community in upstate Maine.
When a deputy is mysteriously bitten in half on the lake, the
local sheriff calls for some assistance.  Nervous palaeontologist
Kelly Scott (Bridget Fonda) arrives from New York, hoping to escape an
office romance gone wrong.  Fisheries and game warden Jack Wells (Bill
Pullman) also arrives to either capture or kill the beast.  Laconic
local sheriff Hank Keogh (Brendan Gleeson, from The General, etc) is
initially resentful of their interference and their big city ways.
But the strangest expert to arrive on the scene is Hector Cyr (a
wonderfully over the top Oliver Platt), an eccentric mythology
professor who prefers to swim with the crocodiles.  He says that most
ancient civilisations deified the crocodile.  However, he and Keogh do
not exactly get along, and their disdain for each other adds another,
more comic dimension to the film.
Having established these colourful if somewhat clichéd
characters, the film then moves onto the water and the hunt for the
crocodile.  The thin plot climaxes in a wonderfully bizarre finale as
these odd ball characters try to trap the huge crocodile using a cow
suspended from a helicopter as bait.  It's just one of many quite
hilarious moments in a film that is surprisingly entertaining.
Lake Placid refuses to take itself seriously, and its
irreverent tone works a treat!  In some ways, this fanciful,
entertaining piece of hokum also reminded me a little of Alligator,
the early 1980's B-grade creature feature written by John Sayles.
Lake Placid comes from the pen of David E Kelley, the creator
of some of this decade's best and most offbeat tv shows (Picket
Fences, Ally McBeal, The Practice, etc).  Kelley's strengths lie in
his ability to create quirky characters and his gift at writing smart,
witty dialogue.  The film just crackles with sly asides and a
sarcastic humour that alleviates the tension.  In particular, the
barbed exchanges between Keogh and Cyr are a delight.
Gleeson's wonderfully droll, sarcastic performance easily
steals the honours here, although tv veteran Betty White (The Mary
Tyler Moore Show, etc) is also a delight as a foul mouthed widow who
knows more about the unusual inhabitant of the lake than she lets on.
The slowly developing romance between Scott and Wells doesn't always
work, and just slows down the action.
Veteran horror director Steve Miner (the original Friday The
13th, the recent Halloween H20, etc) handles the film with assurance,
although it's obvious he has taken a few pointers from the classic
Jaws in his staging of early crocodile attacks.  Some superb,
impressive special effects have created a realistic and frightening
crocodile.
But the strongest impression one takes away from Lake Placid
is Kelley's smart, clever dialogue, which has more bite than the
crocodile itself!

Title
Review for Three Seasons (1999)
This sublime and beautiful looking low budget feature is the
first American film to be shot in Vietnam since the end of the war.
In his assured first feature, director Tony Bui pays homage to his
native country, shaped by massive destruction and upheaval.  Even two
decades later, the country is still undergoing an enormous period of
cultural, social and political change, and trying to come to terms
with its legacy.
Born in Vietnam but raised in America, Bui's dual background
gives him a rare insight into this sense of uncertainty, of being
caught between two cultures.  He directs with a sense of compassion
and insight, and puts a human face on this tortured country.  The
movie is filled with a sense of despair and loss, but it also
resonates with a spirit of optimism and a very real humanity.
Three Seasons actually consists of three or four tales, all
loosely woven together by the subtext of a nation's search for its own
identity.  The central characters of these stories come to
symbolically represent Vietnam's past, present and future.
Kien An (Ngoc Hiep) works on a farm, where she picks lotuses
which she sells on the streets of Saigon.  She also captures the
attention of Dao (Manh Cuong), a reclusive poet who suffers from
disfiguring leprosy and has lost his inspiration to write.  She soon
becomes his muse, and inspires him to write again.  Hai (Don Duong)
drives his cyclo through Saigon, and falls in love with Lan (Zoe Bui),
a prostitute who plies her trade at some of the city's most luxurious
hotels.  Woody (Nguyen Huu Doc) is a young boy who braves even the
foulest weather to sell trinkets to tourists at hotels.  When his bag
goes missing, he suspects an American (Harvey Keitel) of stealing it.
Keitel, who is also credited as one of the executive
producers, delivers a more restrained performance than usual as an
American who has returned to Saigon to find the daughter he fathered
during the war.  Apart from Keitel, the cast comprises solely of
Vietnamese actors who do not speak English, while the crew is made up
of a combination of American and Vietnamese technicians.  Lisa
Rinzler's gorgeous cinematography creates some exquisite visuals and
lyrical images, and deservedly won a prize at this year's Sundance
Film Festival.  Richard Horowitz's music beautifully complements the
evocative visuals, adding to the film's haunting quality.
But, while Three Seasons is visually quite rich, the movie is,
at times, a little dull and slow paced, and may not appeal to all
tastes.

Title
Review for Teaching Mrs. Tingle (1999)
TEACHING MRS TINGLE (M).  
(Miramax/Dimension Films/Village Roadshow)
Director: Kevin Williamson
Stars: Helen Mirren, Katie Holmes, Barry Watson, Marisa Couglan, Jeffrey 
Tambor, Liz Stauber, Molly 
Ringwald, Michael McKean, Vivica A Fox, lesley Ann Warren (uncredited)
Running time: 95 minutes.
Kevin Williamson is one of the hottest writers in Hollywood at
the moment.  He reinvigorated the slasher genre with Scream, and gave
us the intelligent, articulate, but typically angst-ridden teens of
the popular tv soap Dawson's Creek.  It seems he can do little wrong -
which is probably why the brains behind Miramax optimistically allowed
him to direct this screen adaptation based on the first screenplay he
wrote.
Williamson's main strengths as a writer are his sense of irony
and his ability to subvert genre clichés, and although many of
those typical touches are in evidence here, there is also something
lacking.  As a director, Williamson fails to make the grade with this
inauspicious debut.  The pacing is uneven, and the dialogue often
banal.  His direction is laboured and uninspired.  One feels
Williamson would have been better off leaving the directorial duties
to someone else.
The eponymous Mrs Tingle (Helen Mirren, from Prime Suspect,
etc) is a history teacher and a humourless curmudgeon who has been a
fixture at Grandsboro High for twenty years.  Far from inspiring her
students, she belittles their endeavours at every opportunity and
ruthlessly tramples over their ambitions and aspirations.  But now she
is about to get her comeuppance.
 
Leigh Ann Watson (Katie Holmes, from Dawson's Creek and the
recent Go, etc) is a top student, who has pinned her hopes on earning
a scholarship to college, thus enabling her to escape this dead end
town.  But Mrs Tingle puts a crimp in her hopes of becoming school
valedictorian by giving her a low grade for her history project.  Then
when Mrs Tingle catches Leigh Ann with a copy of the forthcoming exam
paper in her possession, she faces expulsion and humiliation.  In
desperation, Leigh Ann and her two friends, Jo (Marisa Coughlan) and
Luke (Barry Watson), the handsome but dumb jock, visit Mrs Tingle at
home and try to explain the misunderstanding.  Things quickly get out
of hand, and before long they have their unforgiving teacher tied to a
bed.
Even though helplessly bound, Mrs Tingle musters all the
skills developed over twenty years of negotiating the blackboard
jungle to unnerve her three captors and slowly turn them against each
other.  What begins as a promising scenario quickly degenerates into
unconvincing farce.  The ending itself is contrived and makes no real
sense dramatically, especially given the events that preceded it.
Although she spends a good deal of time uncomfortably tied to
a bed, Mirren still manages to steal the film with a polished
performance.  She delivers her acerbic one-liners and venomous put
downs with a relish that comprehensively outshines her adolescent
co-stars.
Williamson has cast '80's icon Molly Ringwald (a veteran of
John Hughes early comedies like The Breakfast Club, etc) in a small
role as the school assistant who briefly takes over Mrs Tingle's class
and becomes something of a hero to her students with her irreverent
interpretation of historical events.
Originally entitled Killing Mrs Tingle, the film underwent a
name change following the last high school massacre in the States to
the more inoffensive Teaching Mrs Tingle.  Under any title this is
still a rather tired blend of black comedy, horror and typical
adolescent high school drama that will only appeal to undemanding
teens.

Title
Review for Hurlyburly (1998)
Those audiences who relished the abrasive In The Company Of
Men will probably find much to enjoy about Hurlyburly, an
uncomfortably vicious comedy that shares a similarly wicked
misanthropic streak.  Others will find it a distinctly unsatisfying
and disturbing experience.
In this screen adaptation of his Tony award winning play,
writer David Rabe strips away the gloss and glitter behind the
American Dream to find a more disturbing reality.  Rabe exposes a
hidden, sordid underbelly of male bonding, power games, drugs, and a
group of thoroughly unsavoury characters adrift in a sea of sharks.
The film is set against the background of Hollywood during the
hedonistic '80's, when the excesses and the gratuitous abuse of sex,
alcohol and cocaine were more acceptable.
Hurlyburly traces the downward spiral of Eddie (Sean Penn), a
former high flying casting agent on a path to oblivion.  His room mate
and business partner Mickey (Kevin Spacey) watches Eddie's self
destructive path with equal parts bemusement and scorn.  To make
matters worse, the pair are both involved in a relationship with the
same woman, Darlene (Robin Wright Penn, recently seen in She's So
Lovely, etc).
Director Anthony Drazan (the little seen drama Imaginary
Crimes, etc) fails to open the material up from its stage origins.
The dialogue remains horribly pretentious and artificial.  Most of the
action occurs within the confines of Eddie's ugly, modern,
glass-walled Hollywood Hills pad, and the film becomes claustrophobic
and uncomfortable.  Chinese born cinematographer Gu Chang Wei (who has
worked with acclaimed directors of the calibre of Chen Kaige and Zhang
Yimou) effectively uses uncompromising close-ups to capture the
disintegration of these unlikeable characters.  Both Penn and Spacey
performed their roles in various stage incarnations of Hurlyburly.
They slip comfortably into their familiar roles, revealing an
understanding of these unsavoury characters and their shallow
emotional ties.  Penn seems to have cornered the niche in playing
intensely neurotic characters lately, and he brings a certain
desperation and manic quality to his performance as the pitiful Eddie.
Spacey is at his silky smooth, sarcastic and droll best here, and
relishes the occasionally caustic and bitchy dialogue.
Chazz Palminteri brings a volatile edge to his performance as
Phil, the former jail bird and wannabe actor, unaware of his
limitations and his aggressive demeanour.  Largely cast against type,
Meg Ryan brings a vulnerability to her role as Bonnie, the hooker who
is briefly brought into this turbulent environment as a blind date for
Phil.  Tv comic Garry Shandling is wonderfully sleazy as an amoral
producer.  Anna Paquin has certainly grown up since winning an Oscar
for The Piano, and her performance as Donna, the sexually precocious,
street wise teenage drifter, may shock and surprise.
The uniformly strong performances from the ensemble cast lift
the material.  But, ultimately, one can't escape the feeling that
Hurlyburly is little more than a filmed play, and one with a rather
bleak and probably unpalatable viewpoint at that.

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
GIRL, INTERRUPTED (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: James Mangold
Stars: Winona Ryder, Angelina Jolie, Clea Duvall, Brittany Murphy,
Elisabeth Moss, Jared Leto, Whoopi Goldberg, Vanessa Redgrave, Jeffrey
Tambor, Travis Fine, Jillian Armenante, Angela Bettis, Joanna Kerns,
Mary Kay Place, Kurtwood Smith, Bruce Altman
Running time: 127 minutes.
This adolescent female version of One Flew Over the Cuckoo's
Nest is a bit of a grim ordeal, although, ultimately, it is uplifting.
Susanna Kaysen (Winona Ryder) is a victim of the '60's, a time
when America was undergoing its own identity crisis.  Vietnam, sex,
drugs, rock 'n' roll, youth rebellion were all helping to shape a new
generation, largely misunderstood and misjudged by parents and
authority figures.  This was a time when women were also seeking out a
more significant role for themselves beyond merely becoming dutiful
wives and mothers.
Because Susanna had no real idea of what she wanted to do with
her future, apart from some vague notion of becoming a writer, her
concerned parents sent her to a psychiatrist.  She diagnosed with a
Borderline Personality Disorder, a vague clinical analysis that could
apply to almost any troubled teenager at that time, and sent to
Claymoore, a local sanatorium, for a couple of years.  There she met a
number of other young women with various mental disorders, against
which she tries to judge her own problems.
For nearly two years Susanna tries not to succumb to her grim
environment and the general air of despair and hopelessness that
pervades the hospital.  Throughout the film Susanna is depicted as a
sort of latter day Dorothy trapped in her own bizarre Oz but trying to
find her way home, and the film draws some obvious parallels.  The
inmate who has the biggest impact on her though is Lisa (Angelina
Jolie, from The Bone Collector, etc), the self destructive but somehow
charming and persuasive sociopath who is constantly escaping from
Claymoore.  Fittingly, Jolie dominates the film with a combustible,
volatile and dynamic performance.
Ryder delivers a solid, but introspective and soulful
performance as the bewildered, passive Susanna, who finds a sort of
sanity in her writing.  For Ryder, this film has been something of a
labour of love, and has some personal resonances for her.  For the
past six years, she has nurtured the project, and has been largely
instrumental in helping to bring Susanna's inspiring story to the
screen.
Writer/director James Mangold (Heavy, Copland) is a dab hand
at character driven dramas, and he does a fine job of adapting
Kaysen's rather episodic book for the screen.  He eschews any sense of
saccharine sentimentality, giving this roller coaster ride a hard edge
that occasionally makes for harrowing viewing.  He has assembled a
solid ensemble supporting cast to help bring these disturbed but
fascinating characters to life.
Brittany Murphy plays the pampered, tragic Daisy, while
Elisabeth Moss brings a poignant quality to her role as burns victim
Polly, whose spirit remains unscarred.  Vanessa Redgrave has a small
role as Dr Wick, the understanding head psychiatrist, while Whoopi
Goldberg delivers one of her more earnest and less irritating
performances as Valerie, the understanding, compassionate nurse.

Title
Review for Life (1999)
LIFE (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Ted Demme
Stars: Eddie Murphy, Martin Lawrence, Obba Babatunde, Nick Cassavetes,
Bokeem Woodbine, Ned Beatty, R Lee Ermey, Ned Vaughn, Clarence
Williams III, Anthony Anderson, Rick James, Barry Shabaka Henley,
Brent Jennings, Bernie Mac, Miguel A Nunez jr, Michael Taliferro, Guy
Torry, Noah Emmerich, Poppy Montgomery
Running time: 108 minutes.
Eddie Murphy teams up with fellow comic Martin Lawrence (Bad
Boys, and the upcoming Blue Streak) for this comedy/drama about two
black men imprisoned for life on a Mississippi prison camp.
The film opens in New York, in 1932, during prohibition.  Ray
(Murphy) is a smooth, fast talking con man with big dreams.  Claude
(Lawrence) is straight laced and honest, and due to start work as a
bank teller.  The two men meet at a night club run by notorious
gangster Spanky (Rick James).  But when both men owe Spanky money,
they are forced to drive to Mississippi and bring back a truckload of
moonshine liquor.  While in Mississippi the pair find themselves
framed for a murder they didn't commit, and are sentenced to life with
hard labour on a prison camp.  The two spend most of their time
bickering, but over the course of their incarceration, a bond of
friendship slowly develops.
For much of its duration, Life falls back upon the tired and
predictable formula of the odd couple-buddy comedy, as the two stars
trade barbs and one-liners.  The comic elements at times recall the
antics of Stir Crazy (1981).  But amongst the generous dollops of
humour there is also a more serious side to Life.  Writers Robert
Ramsey and Matthew Stone (the little seen comedy Destiny Turns On The
Radio) attempt to portray the hardship and brutality of life for
blacks on the chain gangs in America's deep south during the '40's and
'50's.  However, noble ambition is let down by a rather superficial
script that tends to soft pedal for much of the time.
Life spans some five decades, although the most effective
sequence is that in which the film cleverly traces the passage of time
and the changing face of America during this time.  Make up genius
Rick Baker brilliantly ages his two stars.
Director Ted Demme (Beautiful Girls, etc) manages to draw a
more restrained performance out of the usually exuberant Murphy, who
seems perfectly at home with the seemingly tailor-made role of the
charismatic, fast talking Ray.  Lawrence brings a touch of overwrought
energy and compassion to his role as Claude, the truly innocent victim
of blind justice.  The two develop a strong rapport that carries the
movie.  Life also wastes a solid ensemble supporting cast in roles
that amount to little more than familiar cliches of the prison
movie genre.
While Life has some quite funny and touching moments,
ultimately the film proves a little disappointing.

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
EYES WIDE SHUT (R).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Stanley Kubrick
Stars: Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman, Sydney Pollack, Marie Richardson, 
Thomas Gibson, Todd Field, 
Rade Serbedgia, Leelee Sobieski, Fay masterson, Alan Cumming, Vinessa 
Shaw
Running time: 159 minutes.
It has taken nearly twelve years for director Stanley Kubrick
to produce his eagerly awaited follow up to his previous film, the
powerful anti-war film Full Metal Jacket.  Because it was shot over a
gruelling 18 month schedule and amidst incredible secrecy, and
completed just before his death earlier this year, Eyes Wide Shut has
become the most anticipated film of the year, after The Phantom
Menace.  That it is also this respected director's final film means
that Eyes Wide Shut will probably be analysed from a misleading
perspective.  Many commentators will be tempted to read more into the
film's themes and meaning than was intended.
Based on an obscure short story by German author Arthur
Schnitzler, Eyes Wide Shut is a sombre and deeply personal exploration
of sexual obsession, intimacy, fidelity, temptation, and jealousy.
The film basically follows a 72 hour period in the lives of Dr William
Harford (Tom Cruise) and his beautiful, stay at home wife Alice
(Nicole Kidman), who live in splendid comfort in a luxurious New York
apartment.  However, after nine years their marriage has grown stale,
predictable and even boring as their daily routine seems to drive them
further apart.
But then, during a lavish Christmas party thrown by one of
Harford's wealthy patients (director Sydney Pollack), the couple
inexplicably flirt openly with strangers.  This leads to a
surprisingly intimate revelation from Alice, when she admits to having
sexual fantasies about a handsome sailor she met on their last
holiday.  Bill is shocked, and his anger leads him to wander the
streets in frustration and confusion.  He has a number of casual,
sexually charged encounters that actually lead nowhere.  His
wanderings lead him to a secret, ritualistic-like orgy, in which all
of the participants wear masks and cloaks.  He is left shaken and
deeply disturbed by this experience and its unsettling aftermath.
However, his experiences also serve to bring him and Alice to a
greater understanding of what has been lacking in their relationship.
Kubrick and co-writer Frederic Raphael draw some striking
parallels between Alice's lurid sexual fantasies and Bill's
encounters, and offer some deep psychological insights into the nature
of modern relationships.  Its exploration of sexual relationships and
sexual attraction is unusually personal territory for a director
renowned for his aloofness and distance, and Eyes Wide Shut has a more
sympathetic view of women than many of Kubrick's previous films.
Despite its subject matter though, the film is tastefully done, and is
neither particularly pornographic nor erotic.
The cinematography is typically stylish and lavish.  As usual,
Kubrick also effectively uses music to underscore the film's moods.
Jocelyn Pook's disturbing and deliberately discordant piano-driven
score adds to the unsettling atmosphere of the film's second half.
However, the careful build up of tension and atmosphere ultimately
leads nowhere.  Like his earlier Barry Lyndon, Eyes Wide Shut is
visually quite stunning, superbly crafted and beautifully acted, but
it is also slow moving, ponderous and pretentious.
It bears all Kubrick's usual trademark touches, although it's
sometimes hard to see why this notorious perfectionist spent 18 months
crafting the film.  (A sound technician can be seen reflected in an
early bathroom scene, a mistake that seems to have slipped by the
notoriously perfectionist film maker.)
Over the 18 month shoot, Kubrick has teased out of his two
stars their most complex, intriguing and mature performances yet.
Having this popular and highly visible married couple play the leads
in the film adds a further nuance and emotional depth to the on-screen
intimacy that would be hard to replicate.  Cruise, who is on screen
for most of the film's overly generous 160 minutes, surprises with his
most confident yet insightful performance yet.  Although the usual
mannerisms are present, Kubrick has been able to shape a more complex
performance from Cruise.  Although she has far less screen time, it is
Kidman who grabs the acting honours with a gutsy, revealing and
painfully emotional performance.
There seems little justification for the highly publicised
replacement of Jennifer Jason Leigh, who was unavailable for
re-shooting.  Marie Richardson takes over her role, for what is little
more than a cameo appearance.  The performances from the ensemble
supporting cast are all superb, with Alan Cumming a stand out for his
delightfully sly turn as a hotel concierge.

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
RANDOM HEARTS (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Sydney Pollack
Stars: Harrison Ford, Kristin Scott Thomas, Charles S Dutton, Bonnie
Hunt, Richard Jenkins, Sydney Pollack, Paul Guilfoyle, Peter Coyote,
Dylan Baker, Susanna Thompson, Susan Floyd, Lynne Thigpen, Kate Mara,
Ariana Thomas, Bill Cobbs
Running time: 131 minutes.
It was obviously the clout of Oscar winning director Sydney
Pollack (Out Of Africa, Tootsie, etc) that got this rather predictable
and unconvincing romantic drama a green light from the studios after
several years in pre-production and numerous script rewrites.  It was
obviously the presence of Harrison Ford, the box office star of the
century, that has given this tired drama legs at the box office.
However, it will be poor word of mouth that will kill it within a
couple of weeks.
Despite his impressive string of box office hits, even Ford
occasionally picks a project that fails to live up to expectations.
Random Hearts is a disappointment, particularly given the calibre of
creative personnel involved.
The film centres around two people from different social
environments who are brought together in the aftermath of a plane
crash that kills their respective spouses.  Dutch Van Der Broek (Ford)
is a tough, no-nonsense internal affairs officer with the Washington
DC police department.  When his wife is killed in a tragic plane
crash, Van Der Broek learns that his wife had been deceiving him.  She
had been travelling under an alias with a married man with whom she
was having an affair.  Driven both by his personal sense of betrayal
and his policeman's instincts, Van Der Broek pursues his own personal
investigation into his wife's life, trying to piece together details
of her affair.
He finally uncovers the identity of her illicit lover, and
learns that he is the husband of Kay Chandler (Kristin Scott Thomas),
a congresswoman running for re-election.  Kay, on the other hand, is
aware of the potential damage that could result from the affair
becoming public, and tries to squash the investigation.  But sparks
soon fly between the pair, and they attempt to deal with their
confused emotions and sense of hurt and betrayal.
Unfortunately, the two leads lack any real chemistry, and
their romance lacks any genuine sense of passion.  Ford gives a rather
tired, almost bored performance here, and he lacks the dynamism of
earlier films.  Thomas is a veteran of epic romances (The English
Patient, The Horse Whisperer, etc), and her usual cold and aloof
persona is perfectly suited to her role here.  She gives the stronger
performance of the two leads, although even she lacks any real depth.
Pollack has also wasted a strong ensemble cast in dull, mainly one
dimensional supporting roles.
Pollack's direction has rarely been as pedestrian or as
uninspired as it is here.  The film is a good half hour too long for
its rather slim scenario, and the pace is often a little sluggish.
The rather clichéd subplot concerning Ford's investigation of a
rather sticky murder and a corrupt cop jars with the romance.  It
seems tacked on almost as an afterthought, a desperate attempt to beef
up a thin plot that is clearly struggling to sustain interest.

Title
Review for Yi ge dou bu neng shao (1999)
In criticising the failures of contemporary Chinese society,
director Zhang Yimou (Raise The Red Lantern, etc) prefers to use an
iron fist enclosed in a velvet glove.
Although his films have been widely acclaimed internationally,
they have been less than favourably received at home by his political
masters, who have banned them in China.  His latest film is also bound
to earn the wrath of Chinese authorities, wary of any overt criticism
or hint of failure of their great social revolution.
Based on a true story, Not One Less depicts the very real
problems facing China's education system.  Much of the film is set in
the primary school of the rural village of Shuiguan.  The school
itself is run down and under-resourced, and the teacher is badly paid.
The teacher even has to carefully ration chalk and other supplies to
make them last.  Thirty students are crammed into one dilapidated
classroom.  Alarming statistics tell us that 1.5 million Chinese
children are forced to leave school every year, many at a young age,
to find work to help their parents pay off their mounting debts.
When the school's regular teacher Gao has to go to the city to
visit his sick mother, the mayor appoints thirteen year old Wei Minzhi
as his replacement.  Because of declining class sizes, Gao promises
her a bonus if no student leaves the school during his absence.
Barely older than her charges, and lacking a university education
herself, Wei has little idea of what to do, and seems unconcerned with
whether the students actually learn anything or not.
Then Zhang Huike, one of her students, is forced to head off
to the city to find work to support his desperately impoverished
family.  Wei heads off to the city to find him and bring him home.
But in the harsh, unfamiliar environment of the sprawling city, Wei's
task is not an easy one.  Initially it is unclear whether Wei is
acting out of genuine concern for the welfare of her charge or out of
personal self interest.
Yimou beautifully draws a sharp contrast between the
prosperity of the modern cities and the abject poverty rife throughout
much of rural China.  Although young Zhang is impressed by the beauty
and prosperity of the city, his most indelible memory is that he had
to beg for food.
This is a simple story, elegantly and beautifully told.  Not
One Less lacks the histrionics of most American films depicting the
decline of the education system (187, The Principal, The Substitute,
etc) and painting American schools as some sort of urban battle zone
in which there are few winners.  Yimou's sense of restraint and
understatement is evident in the deceptively gentle pace and rhythm of
the film.  The film also looks gorgeous, thanks to the cinematography
of Hou Yong.
Yimou deliberately uses non professional actors here, with
many of the performers virtually playing themselves, which adds to the
overall sense of realism.  The young Huike has a natural, appealing
screen presence, while Wei captures the petulance, naivete and
desperation of her character beautifully.  There is often a telling
self consciousness about some of the performances, while others seem
remarkably relaxed, unrehearsed and natural.

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
TRUE CRIME (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Clint Eastwood
Stars: Clint Eastwood, Isaiah Washington, Lisa Gay Hamilton, Denis
Leary, James Woods, Diane Venora, Bernard Hill, Michael McKean,
Michael Jeter, Mary McCormack, Hattie Winston, Frances Fisher, Anthony
Zerbe, William Windom, Penny Bae Bridges
Running time: 129 minutes.
Clint Eastwood seems to be choosing vastly different material,
moving away from the straight forward action adventures in which he
established his reputation to far more interesting, intelligent
character driven pieces.  His latest offering is True Crime, a rather
conventional crime drama that takes us onto death row and a race
against time to prevent an execution.  We've been down this path
before, most recently with James Foley's The Chamber, Bruce
Beresford's Last Dance, and Tim Robbins' powerful Dead Man Walking.
However, Eastwood brings an unexpected emotional depth to the material
which makes for gripping viewing.
Like his last few movies, True Crime has also been adapted
from a best selling novel.  Writers Larry Gross (48 Hours, etc), Paul
Brickman (Risky Business, etc) and Stephen Schiff (the recent
controversial adaptation of Lolita, etc) bring a rich emotional
texture to the multi-layered drama.
Eastwood plays Steve Everett, a stereotypical hard-drinking,
womanising rogue journalist whose private life is careening out of
control.  He finds one last chance at redemption when assigned to take
over a human interest story about Frank Beachum (Isaiah Washington), a
convicted murderer due to be executed later that night by lethal
injection.  Beachum, a black mechanic, was accused of murdering a
pregnant, young, white shop assistant who owed him money.  Everett
discovers that Beachum may in fact be innocent, and sets out to prove
it.
True Crime primarily explores how justice is sometimes blind.
This is a more low key and surprisingly restrained film from Eastwood,
but he directs with his usual assurance and no-nonsense, economical
style.  Eastwood turns up the suspense in the film's latter portion as
he deftly intercuts between Everett's desperate search to uncover the
vital evidence that will prove his claims, and the prison, where
Beachum is being prepared for execution.  This injects a potent
emotional punch into the material.
The film also draws a nicely ironic contrast between Everett's
chaotic domestic life and Beachum's family, which brings an added
dimension to the drama.  However, some of the scenes in which Everett
attempts to spend quality time with his daughter (played by Eastwood's
real life daughter Francesca) do not add much to the drama, and only
serve to slow down the film.  Eastwood injects some light humour into
the film through Everett's heated clashes with his editors (a
wonderfully edgy Denis Leary and a gruff James Woods).
Eastwood himself delivers a solid performance as the cynical,
determined reporter, a role that perfectly suits his laconic screen
persona.  In one of his more subtle performances he gives the flawed
Everett a certain credibility.  Washington is superb and lends dignity
to his portrayal of Beachum, while Lisa Gay Hamilton (recently seen in
Beloved) is touching as his wife.  Bernard Hill (last seen as the
captain of the doomed Titanic) brings a sense of compassion to his
role as the prison warder.

Title
Review for Idioterne (1998)
Pioneered by Danish enfant terrible Lars Von Trier, the Dogma
manifesto represents a back to basics style of film making.  The
manifesto stipulates that films made under its guidelines are truly
collaborative efforts, without individual recognition or credit given
to cast and crew.  Under this code of practice, films are shot on
location using hand held cameras and natural lighting, and attempt to
draw out the natural emotional elements of a specific scenario rather
than rely on artificially created action.  The Idiots (Idioterne) is
the first film produced under this manifesto to reach Australian
screens, and it is something of an eye opener.
The Idiots is a challenging, provocative and outrageous film
about a group of middle class friends who "spass" - pretend to be
mentally handicapped in public places.  Spassing allows them to get
free meals from restaurants and enables them to get away with
behaviour that would normally be greeted with condemnation.  People
are prepared to tolerate and accept certain standards of behaviour,
and make allowances for the handicapped, but this group callously
trade on their generosity and faith.  The group live in a communal
arrangement in the house owned by Stoffer's uncle.  The loosely
structured plot follows them through a number of public encounters - a
factory tour, a swimming lesson, a meeting with a couple of bikies -
and explores the hypocrisy of society when it comes to dealing with
mental illness.  There are some hilarious sequences throughout, but
there is also an uncomfortably vicious tone to some of the group's
antics.  In one scene, Stoffer introduces his friends to some
potential buyers who have come to check out his uncle's house.  While
the couple profess to be comfortable with their handicaps, they can't
wait to get away.
The lonely and troubled Karen (Bodil Jorgensen) briefly joins
the group, and finds solace and escape from the harsh reality of her
life.  But slowly the group begins to fall apart as their spassing
gets out of control.  The Idiots explores the dynamics of group
behaviour, and depicts how the selfish actions of one person can
impact on the harmony and unity of the rest.
The film's content may well offend many in the audience, but
one suspects this is what Von Trier deliberately set out to achieve.
Some eight seconds worth of footage have been deleted from the
climactic orgy scene.  Von Trier has always been a provocative and
challenging director, but here he is also pushing aesthetic and
ethical boundaries to the limit.  With its naturalistic,
quasi-documentary style, Von Trier also seems to be deliberately
turning his back on those earlier stylish films that established his
reputation as one of Europe's finest and most inventive young
directors (Europa, etc).  Some scenes seem improvised, and the
performances are natural and spontaneous.  There is something of an
amateurish look to the film as boom microphones keep dropping into the
shot, and crew members can be seen walking around in the background on
several occasions.  The jerky, hand held camera movements and the
fuzzy, out of focus shots eventually become irritating.  Ultimately,
this style of cinema verite becomes an artifice rather than a genuine
advance in cinematic technique.
Von Trier gives The Idiots a sort of warts-and-all
documentary-style feels, as he features talking heads interviews with
the principal characters to disguise the technical blemishes.
Brimming with contentious ideas, The Idiots offers a
challenging time at the cinema that many within the audience will not
feel entirely comfortable with.  The film will certainly polarise
audiences, and many may not last the distance.  While The Idiots lacks
the raw emotional power of Von Trier's Breaking The Waves, it will
still move audiences in other ways.

Title
Review for Amantes del Círculo Polar, Los (1998)
LOVERS OF THE ARCTIC CIRCLE (M).  
(Dendy)
Director: Julio Medem
Stars: Fele Martinez, Najwa Nimri, Nancho Novo, Maru Valivielso, Peru 
Medem, Sara Valiente, Victor 
Hugo Oliviera, Kristel Diaz, Pep Munne, Jaroslaw Bielski, Joost Siedhoff, 
Beate Jensen
Running time: 112 minutes.
Gorgeous scenery and superb cinematography are not enough to
prevent this new film by Spanish director Julio Medem (The Red
Squirrel, etc) from becoming something of a gloomfest.  This is a love
story spanning some 25 years, and following two people whose lives are
governed by coincidence and chance.  It bears a vague resemblance to
Vincent Ward's dream-like Map Of The Human Heart.  But in that film
the lovers were separated by the gulf of international events like a
world war; here they are merely separated by personal problems,
misunderstandings and jealousy.
Otto (Fele Martinez) and Ana (Najwa Nimri) first meet as eight
year olds attending neighbouring schools.  They are intrigued by the
fact that both their names are palindromes.  But the pair soon share
more, as Otto's father falls in love with Ana's widowed mother.  As
they reach adolescence, Ana and Otto become illicit lovers.  When
Otto's mother dies, he is consumed by guilt and runs away to find his
destiny as a mail pilot flying to remote corners.  Ana follows her own
path, but the pair can never quite forget each other.  As their lives
take them in different directions, their paths occasionally cross even
though they are unaware of it.  Finally, Ana moves to a remote cabin
on the Arctic circle where she awaits an ill-fated reconciliation with
Otto.
The philosophy behind Lovers Of The Arctic Circle seems to be
that life goes in cycles, and everything follows a predetermined
pattern.  The film's structure unfolds in a neat circle as Medem takes
us from the opening prologue back to the same events, and there is a
lot of repetition of smaller and insignificant events.  Medem's
sometimes allusive style sees events unfold from the different
perspectives of its two central characters.
Medem takes his time in allowing the story to unfold, and
often Lovers Of the Arctic Circle seems to be going in circles,
heading nowhere fast.  Medem uses ominous symbolism and obtuse
narrative styles to tell his epic tale, and the result is occasionally
boring and repetitive.  There seems to be a lack of real passion here,
and a suspension of disbelief is required to accept some of Medem's
more fanciful coincidences.  However, Gonzalo F Berridi's
cinematography is sumptuous, creating a series of haunting images, and
he brings a rich visual quality to the film.  The stunning locations,
ranging from Madrid to Helsinki, also enrich the movie.
The cast give solid performances, although newcomer Peru
Medem, who plays Otto as an 8 year old, is a standout and brings a
seriousness and soulfulness beyond his years to the role.

Title
Review for Celebrity (1998)
CELEBRITY (M).  
(Sweetland Films/Village Roadshow)
Director: Woody Allen
Stars: Kenneth Branagh, Judy Davis, Joe Mantegna, Melanie Griffith,
Famke Janssen, Winona Ryder, Leonardo DiCaprio, Charlize Theron, Hank
Azaria, Michael Lerner, Gretchen Mol, Bebe Neuwirth, Greg Mottola,
Monique Fowler, Isaac Mizrahi, Dylan Baker, Patti D'Arbanville, Sam
Rockwell, Ned Eisenberg, Aida Turturro
Running time: 113 minutes.
In his 28th film as director, Woody Allen gives us his own
cynical take on Andy Warhol's famous line that everyone will find
their fifteen minutes of fame.  For him, fame is a double edged sword.
While some people desperately crave fame and are prepared to do
virtually anything to achieve it, there are others who are content to
worship celebrities from afar.  Celebrity proves to be Allen's most
satisfying and entertaining film for quite some time.
Although full of his usual trade mark quips, self-effacing
one-liners, and familiar neurotic characters, it also marks something
of a minor departure.  He seems to be moving away from increasingly
bland, introspective examinations of his own troubled private life to
tackle broader, more mainstream subject matter.  However, many within
the audience will still try to read between the lines and identify
which characters are drawn from Allen's own life.  He has also
returned to filming in black and white, which somehow suits the film's
melancholic mood.
The film follows the parallel fortunes of frustrated,
egotistical writer Lee Simon (Kenneth Branagh) and Robin (Judy Davis),
his ex-wife.  Their relationship is explored through a series of
flashbacks, and accidental encounters at various social gatherings in
Manhattan.  A journalist who is attracted by the allure of the rich
and famous, Simon seems destined to always remain on the periphery of
the world he so desperately craves.  His conquests (including Charlize
Theron, former Bond girl Famke Janssen, and Winona Ryder) all end
badly.
Robin however has grown disillusioned at his womanising and
lack of success and divorced him.  We first meet her at a religious
retreat where she has gone, reluctantly looking for spiritual
guidance.  She later meets television producer Tony Gardella (Joe
Mantegna), and finds love and happiness all over again.  However,
while Robin is confidently building a new life and a new career, the
shallow, womanising Simon seems to be standing still, repeating his
mistakes all over again.
As usual, Allen crams the film full of famous faces, many
wasted in fleeting cameos and small roles that really don't allow them
to do much.
Playing Allen's alter-ego here, Branagh does an uncanny job of
channelling his usual persona through his superbly realised
performance.  He brilliantly assumes his mannerisms, his inflections
and his nervous speech rhythms to a tee.  Allen always seems to draw
the best out of Davis, and she is superb here.  Her wonderfully comic
performance brings some fire and passion to the material.
Leonardo DiCaprio is also good in a smaller role as the brash,
hot young actor who abuses his status, while Melanie Griffith brings a
certain style to her role as a famous film actress.

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
THE CIDER HOUSE RULES (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Lasse Hallstrom
Stars: Tobey Maguire, Charlize Theron, Michael Caine, Paul Rudd, Delroy 
Lindo, Erykah Badu, Jane Alexander, Kathy Baker, Kieran Culkin,
Heavy D, Kate Nelligan
Running time: 125 minutes.
John Irving's sprawling novels have mainly followed the quest
of a misunderstood youth to find his own place in the world (The World
According To Garp, Simon Birch, etc).  But they have never been easy
to adapt for the screen, with many subplots and characters being
ditched altogether.  The Cider House Rules however marks the first
time that Irving has adapted one of his own novels for the screen.
This brings a reverence to its treatment of the text, the characters
and the themes.  However, Irving's screenplay is still too literary,
and he tends to down play many of the darker elements of the story -
abortion, incest, etc.  The narrative also unfolds at a rather
ponderous pace that eventually diminishes much of its emotional
impact.
This charming coming of age story takes place in Maine during
the early 1940's.  The hero, Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire, from
Pleasantville, etc), has been raised in St Clouds orphanage.  Dr Larch
(Michael Caine, in one of his best performances for years) takes an
almost paternal interest in the welfare of his charges, but he has a
soft spot for Homer, whom he trains as his assistant.  Dr Larch also
performs abortions on demand, even though they are illegal.
But Homer feels that there is more to life than helping Larch
at the orphanage and decides to strike out on his own, hoping to
experience more of the world.  When the beautiful Candy (Charlize
Theron, from The Astronaut's Wife, etc) and her fighter pilot
boyfriend (Paul Rudd, from Clueless, etc) come to the orphanage for an
abortion, Homer leaves with them.  He works in an apple orchard.
There he slowly falls in love with Candy, and is also drawn into the
personal lives of his fellow workers.  During his mini-odyssey, Homer
comes to realise his destiny and find his place in the world.  He
ultimately learns that, unlike his time at the orphanage, life and
love do not always follow a neatly ordered set of rules.  Indeed, some
rules were meant to be broken.
The ensemble cast deliver solid performances.  Maguire
delivers a mature and subtle performance in the central role of Homer,
and one can see his character grow in strength and self confidence as
the film develops.  However, it is Caine who is most impressive.  He
just seems to get better with age, and delivers one of his more well
rounded characterisations as the unhappy but deeply caring Dr Larch.
Swedish director Lasse Hallstom (My Life As A Dog, What's
Eating Gilbert Grape, etc) handles the material with intelligence, but
without any real sense of compassion or warmth.  Hallstrom only came
aboard when original director Phillip Borsos died of leukaemia and
Michael Winterbottom departed, citing creative differences with
Irving.  However, Oliver Stapleton's cinematography is gorgeous, and
visually the film is a joy to watch.  
*** 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
THE OTHER SISTER (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Garry Marshall
Stars: Diane Keaton, Juliette Lewis, Tom Skerritt, Giovanni Ribisi, Poppy 
Montgomery, Hector Elizondo, 
Juliet Mills, Linda Thorson
Running time: 129 minutes.
This romantic comedy about two intellectually handicapped
people who fall in love is also cloaked with the melodramatic excesses
of the typical dysfunctional family drama.  This results in a film
that is manipulative, overly sentimental, saccharine and mawkish.  But
The Other Sister will also have audiences unashamedly blubbering in
the aisles.
The Tate family is the scion of the local community.  However,
the three Tate sisters are something of a disappointment, particularly
to their mother Elizabeth (Diane Keaton), who is aware of her
prominent position in the social elite.  One of her daughters is a
workaholic lesbian, one is a determined under achiever, while the
other sister, Carla (Juliette Lewis), is intellectually handicapped.
For ten years, Carla has been shut away in an exclusive special
school, but now she has returned home.
Carla is determined to live life on her own terms, with
independence from her over protective family.  But first she has to
escape from her domineering, smothering mother, who is too wrapped up
in her social status to really listen to the concerns of her three
daughters or share in their experiences.  Father Radley (Tom Skerritt)
is more sympathetic to their needs, but finds it hard to accede to
their wishes without some sort of conflict.
Carla wants to attend a local school, so that she can learn
vital skills and further cement her independence.  At the polytech,
she meets Danny McMann (Giovanni Ribisi, from Saving Private Ryan,
etc), who is also intellectually handicapped.  He loves brass bands,
but is not quite as self confident as Carla.  He lives in a small
apartment, begrudgingly funded by his father, but is watched over by
the sympathetic caretaker Jerry (Hector Elizondo).  Romance slowly
blossoms between the two, but it is not always a smooth or happy path.
This awkwardly titled film gives Keaton and a surprisingly
strong Lewis plenty of big scenes in which they can emote for all
they're worth, and their clashes fire up the screen.  An often under
rated actor, Skerritt plays the stereotypical, understanding father
with compassion, although the script doesn't give him much to work
with.  Ribisi is also solid, although his mannered performance
occasionally reminds audiences of his character from the sitcom
Friends.  The rest of the cast, including Aussie actress Poppy
Montgomery (recently seen in Dead Man On Campus), seem to get lost and
fail to leave much of an impression on the material.
Director Garry Marshall (Pretty Woman, etc) gives audiences a
roller coaster ride of emotions, mixing humorous scenes with revealing
emotional moments, to great effect.  Although he comes from a
background in television sitcoms, Marshall is no slouch when it comes
to tugging the heart strings of his audience either (check out
Beaches, etc).  Marshall and co-writer Bob Bruner throw everything
into the mix of this uneven and over long film, and there is plenty of
unnecessary padding.  Some scenes seem embarrassing and uncomfortable,
while others work beautifully.  The film is often quite predictable,
and numerous references to the seminal The Graduate also telegraph
several key plot developments.
Nonetheless, The Other Sister is a wonderful example of the
sort of sentimental weepie that Hollywood does so well.  But not often
enough!

Title
Review for Mighty, The (1998)
THE MIGHTY (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Peter Chelsom
Stars: Sharon Stone, Gena Rowlands, Harry Dean Stanton, James Gandolfini, 
Gillian Anderson, Meatloaf, Keiran Culkin, Elden Henson, Joe Perrino,
Jennifer Lewis
Running time: 100 minutes.
This moving and ultimately uplifting tale explores the unusual
friendship that develops between two twelve year old outcasts.  The
Mighty is also an inspiring fable about the power of the imagination
and friendship to heal scars, both emotional and physical.  Based on
the book by Rodman Philbrick, The Mighty is also free of the
excessively saccharine and overtly manipulative narrative structure of
the recent Simon Birch.  While the two films share a number of themes,
The Mighty is by far the warmer and more broadly appealing film.
However, the later stages may prove a little too intense for younger
children.
Max (Elden Henson) lives with his grandparents (Gena Rowlands
and Harry Dean Stanton).  Because of his hulking size he is the object
of much fun at school.  His new next door neighbour is Gwen (Sharon
Stone), a single mother, and her crippled son Kevin (Keiran Culkin),
who suffers from a degenerative wasting disease.  Gwen has raised
Kevin alone ever since his father ran out on them as soon as the
doctor announced that the child was suffering from a genetic disorder.
Despite their initial mistrust of each other, Max and Kevin quickly
develop a strong friendship when they realise that they can each offer
the other something.
Kevin teaches Max to read and helps him appreciate the world
through the power of imagination.  Max is afraid that he will turn out
to be a vicious killer just like his father (James Gandolfini), but
Kevin calms his fears.  In return, Max provides Kevin with a pair of
legs and helps him travel around the city, taking in the sights and
enjoying activities that would normally be beyond his grasp.
Eventually their friendship opens up new worlds of possibility for
both of them, and together they take on the world like modern day
counterparts of King Arthur and his legendary knights of the round
table.
But events take a nasty turn when Max's father suddenly
reappears and takes his son away.  The crippled Kevin charges to the
rescue.  These scenes may prove a little too intense and scary for
some audiences.
British director Peter Chelsom (Funny Bones, etc) has a
feeling for the offbeat and the unusual, but he handles the material
with insight and compassion.  A former director of commercials he
brings a strong visual style to the movie without sacrificing the
emotional content of Charles Leavitt's screenplay.  He injects a sense
of realism into the movie through clever use of locations around
Toronto and Cincinnati.
Stone is impressive in a smaller role, and delivers one of her
better screen performances.  The film boasts strong supporting
performances from a truly scary Gandolfini, veterans Rowlands and
Stanton, and The X Files' Gillian Anderson, playing against type in a
more down beat role.  However, it is the solid and likeable
performances of Culkin and Henson that carry the film and provide its
emotional punch.  The pair, both of whom are also featured in the
recent She's All That, are enormously appealing, and deliver heartfelt
and natural performances.
This mighty film is much better than the recent Simon Birch,
as it explores how friendship and the power of the imagination help
our two off beat heroes transcend their harsh environment.  Its quaint
flights of fancy prove surprisingly effective!

Title
Review for Speedway Junky (1999)
This grim tale of street wise hustlers plying their trade on
the neon lit streets and back alleys of Las Vegas ultimately smacks of
a teenage version of Midnight Cowboy.
Teenage runaways are drawn to the glittering dreams and neon
lit promises of Las Vegas, only to find that the reality fails to live
up to the promises.  Many struggle to survive, and turn to hustling
tourists for quick money.  New to this unfamiliar and dangerous world
is Johnny (Jesse Bradford, from Far From Home, etc), an army brat who
has run away from home, hoping to gain work with the pit crew of a
NASCAR car racing team.
He lands in Vegas for a temporary stop, but a series of
misadventures sees him stranded without any money or clothes.  He is
taken in by Eric (Jordan Brower), a gay teenage hustler who works as
part of a street gang.  Eric also introduces him to the world of
casual sex for money.  Johnny just wants to make some quick scores so
he can leave Vegas and follow his dream.  He also meets Veronica
(Daryl Hannah, cast against type), a drug addict and hooker with a
heart of gold, who is something of a surrogate mother to Eric.
Johnny is initially uncomfortable with Eric and his preference
for casual, meaningless gay sex, but slowly a strong friendship
develops between the pair.  However, their involvement with Steven
(Home Improvement's wise cracking Jonathan Taylor Thomas), the street
wise, bisexual hustler who owes money, eventually brings about
tragedy.  The downbeat climax is inspired by Midnight Cowboy.
Speedway Junky is the first film from writer/director Nikolas
Perry, a former post-production assistant who worked on films such as
Bram Stoker's Dracula.  Perry's direction is quite restrained, and
there's no hint of unnecessary exploitation here.  This low budget
tale of gay teen hustlers ventures into territory made familiar by
Star Maps and the little seen Johns.  However, Perry doesn't provide
many insights into this sleazy world, nor does he pass judgement on
the actions or decisions of his characters.
Perry imbues the film with a seedy ambience and squalid
reality, but there is also a vague sense of unreality to the whole
thing.  Speedway Junky is a more sanitised view of life on the mean
streets than the provocative Hustler White.  The involvement of Gus
Van Sant as executive producer also lends the film overtones of My Own
Private Idaho.
Van Sant's involvement has enabled the tyro director to
attract a stronger cast than one would otherwise find in a low budget
feature dealing with such subject matter.
Most surprising of all is the casting of Thomas, whose
swaggering performance is a far cry from his previous roles.  Patsy
Kensit (Lethal Weapon 2, etc) is wasted in what amounts to little more
than a brief cameo.
Despite some solid performances and some great location work
on the streets of Las Vegas, this sordid and uncomfortably seedy drama
ultimately lacks appeal.

Title
Review for Drop Dead Gorgeous (1999)
Like the wonderful, and superior, Waiting For Guffman, this
mock documentary exploring what goes on behind the scenes of a beauty
pageant pricks the pretensions and narrow attitudes of small town
America.  First time feature director Michael Patrick Jann uses the
tired fake documentary formula to explore the bitchiness, ruthless
ambition and drive that occurs backstage at a beauty pageant.
However, this satire of what actually happens behind the scenes of
beauty pageants lacks the sharp writing, biting humour, and genuine
wit that shaped Michael Ritchie's under rated Smile (1975), which
explored similar material.
For fifty years the Miss Mount Rose Beauty pageant has been a
highlight of this small rural township in Minnesota.  But this year
seems to bring out the worst in its competitors.  A string of
mysterious fatal accidents knock some of the early competitors out of
the race, even before the judging starts.  And a film crew is there to
capture it all.
In this year's pageant, the competition for first prize ends
up as a two horse race between two girls from different backgrounds.
Becky Leeman (Denise Richards, from Wild Things, and the forthcoming
new Bond film) is the ambitious and fiercely competitive daughter of
Gladys (Kirstie Alley), herself a former winner and now head of the
organising committee for the pageant.  Becky has had everything
virtually handed to her on a silver platter, and hates losing.  Her
main rival is Amber Atkins (Kirsten Dunst, from Interview With The
Vampire, etc), a "piece of white trash" who lives in a run down
trailer park with her mother (Ellen Barkin), an alcoholic hairdresser.
The differences between these two rivals is explored with the
distinct lack of subtlety that is a hallmark of the film.  The two
younger stars deliver quite engaging performances that lift the film a
notch or two.  They comprehensively outshine the rather tired and
lacklustre performances of veterans Alley and Barkin, neither of whom
seem overly enthusiastic about the material.
There are some genuinely funny moments in this black comedy,
but they are far and few between.  Instead, Jann offers us some
tasteless running gags and a number of gross-out gags that would seem
second rate even to the Farrelly brothers.
Like the recent Election, Drop Dead Gorgeous also offers a
comment on the American ethos of success and winning, whatever the
cost.  Jann's direction lacks focus, although some of the film's barbs
manage to strike home.  Drop Dead Gorgeous also offers a quick,
stereotyped portrait of small town America and its inhabitants, and
little escapes unscathed.  Ultimately, though, is seems that the
filmmakers are mainly retreading familiar territory without offering
anything fresh or original.

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
        Just how well do we know our neighbours?  Is a psychopathic
murderer lurking in the house just across the road?  David Lynch often
provides a shattering and unsettling exploration of the bizarre and
sleazy underbelly that lies beyond the comfortable images of the
quaint picket fences and neatly maintained housing lots of suburbia.
Joe Dante brought a more comic approach to the theme with his black
comedy the 'Burbs.
Arlington Road takes this basic theme and neatly marries it
with a touch of the paranoia and cynicism that shaped the best
political thrillers of the '70's, such as The Parallax View and All
The President's Men, etc.  Overtones of both the Oklahoma City and
World Trade Towers bombings also permeate this taut, tense and topical
thriller exploring domestic terrorism in the US.
Jeff Bridges delivers his usual solid performance as Michael
Faraday, a lecturer at George Washington University, who is still
coming to terms with the death of his wife, an FBI agent who was
killed three years ago during a botched raid on a suspected terrorist
encampment.  Obsessed with the nature of terrorism as a political
tool, the embittered Faraday lectures on the topic as part of his
popular course on American history.
One day while returning home to his quiet suburban street he
comes across a teenage boy staggering down the road, with his arm
badly burnt.  Michael rushes the bleeding and dazed boy to hospital
for treatment.  There he meets the boy's concerned parents, Oliver and
Cheryl Lange (Tim Robbins and Joan Cusack), who happen to be his new
neighbours.  They explain that the boy's arm was injured while playing
with fireworks in the park with some friends.
Michael and the Langes become friends, but Michael soon grows
suspicious of Oliver.  His belief that Oliver is lying and hiding
something leads Michael to an obsessive search into his neighbour's
past.  As he races against time to prove that his neighbour is
actually a terrorist with an advanced degree in explosives, most of
his acquaintances think that the strain is beginning to take its toll.
Is Michael right, or have recent tragic events jaded his perspective?
Bridges brings an intense, wary and highly strung neurotic
edge to his performance.  Robbins delivers a superbly malevolent
performance as Oliver, while Cusack is icily creepy as his wife.
This chilling paranoid thriller from writer Ehren Kruger and
director Mark Pellington efficiently taps into the mind set of most
ordinary Americans, who prefer the comfort of believing in the
officially promulgated theories of lone gunmen and lone terrorist
bombers rather than shadowy high level conspiracies.  Pellington, a
former director of rock videos who made his feature debut with the
disappointing '50's coming of age tale Going All The Way, effectively
tightens the suspense as the film races towards its surprising climax.
Arlington Road doesn't always follow a nicely formulaic path,
and Pellington and Kruger manage to pack in a couple of surprising
twists.  Pellington demonstrates a dazzling visual style that
effectively captures Faraday's increasingly compulsive behaviour, and
bring a nicely neurotic edge to the film.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
FINAL DESTINATION (M).  
(New Line Cinema/Village Roadshow)
Director: James Wong
Stars: Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Kerr Smith, Tony Todd, Kristen Cloke, 
Seann William Scott, Chad E Donella, Amanda Detmer, Daniel Roebuck,
Roger Guenveur Smith.
Teen hunk Devon Sawa (Wild America, Casper, etc) seems keen on
carving out a little niche for himself in the teen horror genre.
First there was the decidedly juvenile Idle Hands, and now there's the
formulaic Final Destination, a teen slasher film that seems influenced
by The Twilight Zone.  Final Destination also owes a lot to films like
Friday The Thirteenth and the Scream series, albeit without the
knowing genre references and irreverent style.
Sawa plays Alex Browning, who seems blessed, or cursed, with
the ability to see death coming.  When he and several class mates are
setting off for a trip to Paris, Alex has a premonition that the plane
will explode in spectacular fashion immediately after take off.  He
creates a panic, resulting in him, five friends and a teacher being
thrown off the plane.  Soon after, the plane does explode, and Alex
falls under FBI suspicion.  The seven survivors try to deal with their
guilt and sense of loss in different ways.  But it soon seems that the
seven have only temporarily escaped fate, as one after another they
begin to perish in bloody and mysterious circumstances.  Alex believes
that the deaths are following a pattern and desperately tries to save
his friends and cheat fate once again.  Under the guise of the
formulaic teen supernatural slasher genre, co-writers James Wong and
Glen Morgan (who contributed to episodes of spooky tv series like The
X Files) explore some important philosophical questions.  Is there a
pattern to the way we lead our lives and the manner and timing of our
deaths?  Can we really cheat death if our time is up?  Is Alex
deluding himself into believing that events are following a pattern,
and that he holds the power of life over death in his hands?  However,
many of these themes become a little loss amongst the gore and
bloodletting.
The symbolism during the opening scenes is heavy handed, but
Wong's handling of several scenes throughout injects some suspense, a
sense of dread and even some unexpected touches of humour into the
proceedings.  His direction sometimes shows flair and invention, and
an understanding of the demands and limitations of this genre.  He
maintains a fast pace throughout that, albeit temporarily, glosses
over many of the implausibilities, inconsistencies and gaping holes in
the narrative.  The performances of the mainly young and unknown cast
are more than adequate for this type of film.  Fans of the genre will
recognise Tony Todd, the original Candyman, in a cameo as an unnerving
mortician.
Final Destination may not be a classic of the genre, but it
delivers enough thrills and shocks to satisfy its target audience!

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
MISSION TO MARS (M).  
(Hollywood Pictures/Buena Vista International)
Director: Brian De Palma
stars: Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Jerry O'Connell, Connie Nielsen, Don 
Cheadle, Armin Mueller-Stahl (uncredited)
running time: 113 minutes.
A poor man's 2001?  Despite having a larger budget than
Stanley Kubrick and access to more modern technology, Brian De Palma's
sci-fi thriller about the first manned space mission to Mars seems
disappointingly second rate.
In the year 2020, NASA sends the first manned space mission to
explore the surface of Mars.  But when an inexplicable disaster wipes
out the crew, a hastily assembled rescue mission is launched.
Astronauts Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins and Jerry O'Connell (from Sliders,
etc) lead the mission under the watchful eye of an uncredited Armin
Mueller-Stahl.  Even their mission does not proceed smoothly as a
variety of disasters befall them before they uncover the secret of
what happened to the first landing crew.  They also encounter
intelligent alien life and learn the secret of life on earth.
Something of a cross between Chariots Of the Gods, Close Encounters Of
The Third Kind and 2001: A Space Odyssey, Mission To Mars aims to be
more of a serious sci-fi adventure exploring grand themes rather than
the typical action film with spectacular space battles and exploding
death stars.  This leads to some rather boring moments throughout that
will test the patience of many within the audience.
The script, from Jim and John Thomas (Predator, etc) and
Graham Yost (Speed, etc), occasionally becomes laden with excessive
jingoism and schmaltz.  The special effects are sometimes quite
impressive, and the visual effects from the ILM team are stunning. It
is obvious that De Palma and his production crew have studied
Kubrick's classic, as some elements here (such as the revolving
spaceships) echo 2001.  They get the nuts and bolts and intricate
technical details of space travel right.  But the brilliant visuals
are small compensation for the overall lack of pace and excitement.
De Palma's direction here lacks his usual intensity, and it seems as
if he is uncomfortable with the demands of a special effects driven
film.  Even normally strong performers of the calibre of Sinise and
Robbins seem confused and ultimately defeated by the demands of the
film and the cluttered narrative.
Mission To Mars explores questions regarding the origins of
life on earth, but somehow it lacks the vision, complexity, cinematic
style and sense of extraordinary wonder of Kubrick's seminal classic.

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
NEVER BEEN KISSED (PG).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Raja Gosnell
Stars: Drew Barrymore, David Arquette, Michael Vartan, Leelee
Sobieski, Jeremy Jordan, John C Reilly, Molly Shannon, Garry Marshall,
Jessica Alba, Marley Shelton, Jordan Ladd, James Edward Franco,
Branden Williams
Running time: 107 minutes.
Chicago reporter Josie Geller (Drew Barrymore) returns to high
school on an undercover assignment to report about modern adolescents.
In her high school days, Josie was a geek with an uncool dress sense
and braces, and was the butt of many cruel practical jokes.  In short,
her school years were a nightmare, and she is not exactly keen on
repeating it.  But in returning to school and trying to fit in again,
the 25 year old misfit eventually finds herself and true love.
Never Been Kissed features the usual cliches of the typical
American high school comedy - the cliques, the nerds and the jocks,
the outcasts, the bitchy politics, and the climactic prom night - and
explores territory that will be familiar to audiences through a recent
spate of adolescent comedies (She's All That, Jawbreaker, Ten Things I
Hate About You, etc), albeit without the mean spirited streak.  Never
Been Kissed also owes a huge debt to the films of John Hughes, which
virtually established the teen genre for the '80's.
However, the formula has also been cleverly dressed in the
familiar trappings of the romantic comedy, as the clueless Josie
discovers the pangs of first love.  First time writers Abby Kohn and
Marc Silverstein have drawn upon their own experiences at high school
for much of the material, which adds a more personal element to some
of the action.  The pair draw out some underlying sexual tension in
the growing attraction between Josie and handsome English teacher Sam
Coulson (Michael Vartan, from The Myth Of Fingerprints, etc).
Coulson's lectures on Shakespeare's As You Like It, and its themes of
masks and deception, underscore one of the principal themes of this
surprisingly entertaining and charming comedy.
Former editor Raja Gosnell, who made his directorial debut on
the formula-driven sequel Home Alone 3, is able to leave more of a
personal impression on this material.
         Barrymore is not a conventional beauty, but the former wild
child has recently reinvented herself as a romantic lead with films
such as Ever After, the contemporary flavoured reworking of
Cinderella.  Barrymore's willingness to play the awkward geek in
several scenes also adds a touching element to the film that works a
treat, and her enthusiastic performance lifts the film.  She is well
supported by Leelee Sobieski (Deep Impact, etc), Vartan, and former
pin up idol Jeremy Jordan, who plays the school hunk.  David Arquette
provides the comic relief as Josie's brother Rob, the former jock and
high school drop out, who reluctantly returns to school to help boost
her popularity.  Unlike some recent romantic comedies, Never Been
Kissed actually manages to offer a perfectly satisfying conclusion
that will have audiences leaving the cinema smiling.  
*** 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
THE GREEN MILE (M).  
(Castle Rock/Universal/UIP)
Director: Frank Darabont
Stars: Tom Hanks, David Morse, James Cromwell, Michael Clarke Duncan, 
Michael Jeter, Barry Pepper, Doug Hutchison, Bonnie Hunt, Patricia
Clarkson, Sam Rockwell, Graham Greene, Jeffrey DeMunn, Harry Dean
Stanton, Gary Sinise, William Sadler, Dabbs Greer, Eve Brent
Running time: 189 minutes.
Writer/director Frank Darabont previously gave us the superb
The Shawshank Redemption, one of the truly great films of the '90's.
He has followed it with yet another prison drama that is every bit as
moving and inspiring and, yes, damn good.
The Green Mile beautifully and brilliantly transcends the
limitations and usual cliches of the genre.  Although set on death
row, the film is suffused with a humanity and warmth of spirit that is
both surprising and unexpected, and ultimately elevates the
potentially bleak material into another sphere.  This also has more of
an element of fantasy to it.
Like its predecessor, The Green Mile is based on a non-horror
story from Stephen King, and proves that he is a strong writer when he
moves away from the genre that made his name.  In fact, it is King's
non-horror stories that have translated best into great films (Stand
By Me, Misery, Dolores Claiborne, etc).
The film is set on Cold Mountain Penitentiary's death row
(affectionately nick-named "the green mile" because of the colour of
its floor) during the bleak depression years.  In 1936, John Coffey
(Michael Clarke Duncan, from Armageddon, etc), a giant, barely
literate black itinerant, was convicted of raping and murdering two
nine year old girls and imprisoned in Cold Mountain.  Coffey possessed
a special gift that eventually transformed the lives of other
prisoners and even his hardened, cynical guards, who had become
desensitised to the worst atrocities committed by men.  Eventually
even the guards begin to believe in the innocence of this gentle
giant.
There is something of an obvious religious metaphor to the
story for those who care to look below the surface.  Darabont doesn't
overly sentimentalise the material, although the more cynical will
probably dismiss the whole thing as being shamelessly manipulative.
Darabont's direction is beautifully restrained and understated.
Although The Green Mile runs for just over three hours, there is
little wasted screen time and few slack moments.  There is a wealth of
incidents here that keeps the audience engrossed, and most will
willingly suspend disbelief for the duration.
The characters are all strongly drawn, and given depth by the
uniformly rich performances from the ensemble cast.  Tom Hanks gives a
compassionate performance as head guard Paul Edgecombe, a man
ultimately torn between his beliefs and his duty.  Duncan brings an
unexpected dignity and grace to his role as the enigmatic Coffey.  The
always excellent David Morse brings restraint to his superb
performance as "Brutal" Howell, Edgecombe's second in command.  Doug
Hutchison (best known for his role as Toomes in The X Files) is also
strong as the sadistic and incompetent guard Wetmore, who constantly
flaunts his political connections.
No prison film has yet won an Oscar for Best Picture, but The
Green Mile should prevail if there is any justice.  It's that good!

Title
Review for Get Real (1998/I)
GET REAL (M).  
(NewVision)
Director: Simon Shore
Stars: Ben Silverstone, Brad Gorton, Charlotte Briitain, Stacy A Hart, 
Kate McEnery, Tim Harris, James D White, Patrick Nielsen, Louise J Taylor
Running time: 110 minutes.
Inevitably, it seems that every new British drama exploring
the traumatic coming out experience of gay teens will be compared with
the marvellous Beautiful Thing.  However, Get Real is good enough to
stand on its own, without the baggage that such a lazy and often
odious comparison brings.
Based on Patrick Wilde's semi-autobiographical play What's
Wrong With Angry?, Get Real treats its emotionally charged and
potentially contentious subject matter with wonderful touches of
humour and insight.  This delightful and entertaining film offers a
warm and engaging portrait of teen angst that will also appeal to more
mainstream audiences.  Get Real is also a refreshing change from the
bland high school comedies offered up by Hollywood in recent years.
The film explores the romantic dilemma of 16 year old Stephen
Carter (played with winning charm and style by Ben Silverstone, last
seen briefly as the young Humbert in the controversial remake of
Lolita), who just happens to be gay.  The only person who knows his
secret and his habit of trolling local beats is Linda (Charlotte
Brittain), his next door neighbour and best friend.
Then a chance encounter leads Stephen to discover that John
(newcomer Brad Gorton), the handsome school jock, is also gay.  A
romance develops between the pair, although the need to keep their
affair secret places great pressure on the pair.  But while Stephen
wants to shout his love for John from the rooftops, John is more
cautious, fearing the knowledge he is gay will damage his reputation
and status at school.  Eventually Stephen finally finds the courage to
make a hard choice, one that will shake up the complacency of his
parents and his school mates.
This deftly written film explores issues of peer pressure,
homophobia, prejudice, and questions of sexual identity with the kind
of honesty and understanding that comes from bitter personal
experience.  Get Real contains a number of quite moving moments, but
it is also a remarkably warm and very funny film.  First time feature
director Simon Shore handles the material with a great deal of
understanding and compassion.
The performances from the young and largely unknown cast are
all solid.  Silverstone beautifully captures Stephen's vulnerability,
angst and confusion with a well rounded performance.  Brittain
delivers a wonderfully rich and sympathetic performance as Linda -
fat, frumpy, lonely but filled with generous spirit - and she provides
the film with much of its engaging humour.
An entertaining and compassionate treatment of the
complexities surrounding gay teens and the problems of coming out, Get
Real is a genial, winning comedy that easily overcomes the mistaken
notion that gay themed films are of limited appeal.

Title
Review for Hi-Lo Country, The (1998)
THE HI-LO COUNTRY (M).  
(Polygram/Palace)
Director: Stephen Frears
Stars: Billy Crudup, Woody Harrelson, Patricia Arquette, James Gammon, 
Cole Hauser, Sam Elliott, 
Penelope Cruz, John Diehl, Enrique Castillo, Lane Smith, Rosaleen Linehan
Running time: 129 minutes.
Although The Hi-Lo Country is set in the harsh, untamed cattle
country of New Mexico in the late 1940's, it quickly becomes obvious
that we are venturing into Sam Peckinpah territory here.  The Hi- Lo
Country explores many of those themes common to his movies - the death
of the old west and its values, and that strange code of loyalty that
exists between hard and violent men.
Peckinpah tried in vain for many years to bring Max Evans'
1961 novel to the screen.  Producers Martin Scorsese and Barbara De
Fina have succeeded where Peckinpah failed.  Walon Green (who wrote
The Wild Bunch, one of the all-time classic westerns and one of my
favourite films) has fashioned a grand, sweeping epic from Evans'
novel, although some elements are far less compelling than others.
Scorsese has brought aboard British director Stephen Frears (My
Beautiful Laundrette, etc), with whom he collaborated on the
marvellous noir-like thriller The Grifters.
An outsider, Frears directs the material with unusual
intelligence.  He doesn't romanticise the characters or the setting as
much as Peckinpah would have.  The film also lacks Peckinpah's
characteristic trade mark touches - the graphic violence and the
strong misogynistic streak.  Oliver Stapleton's glorious wide screen
cinematography beautifully brings to life the harsh open spaces of New
Mexico, imbuing the film with an almost epic quality.
Many young men, returning home from Europe following the war,
found the old cattle country had changed drastically during their
absence.  Many families facing hardship and financial ruin had been
forced to sell their farms to wealthy land barons.  Deprived of their
legacy, the young men were often forced to work for these wealthy
ranchers for wages.  Pete Calder (Billy Crudup, from Inventing The
Abbotts, etc) is one such returning soldier, who prefers to work his
own modest 1600 acres, with help from his friend Big Boy Matson (Woody
Harrelson).
Big Boy though is a tough, hard drinking cowboy of the old
school, an embodiment of the old west, who doesn't walk away from a
fight.  He courts trouble when he begins an increasingly public affair
with Mona (Patricia Arquette), the wife of Les Birk (John Diehl),
foreman for ruthless local rancher Jim Ed Love (Sam Elliott).  It's an
affair that can only end in violence and tragedy.
Crudup gives a solid performance as Pete, the laconic,
introspective narrator of this nostalgic tale.  Harrelson somehow
seems miscast here in a role that required an actor with a meaner,
rougher edge.  Arquette lends her sultry presence to the pivotal role
of Mona.
The Hi-Lo Country is best viewed as a poignant, elegiac homage
to both the classic western movies of yesteryear and, ultimately, the
late Peckinpah himself.

Title
Review for Sally Marshall Is Not an Alien (1998)
SALLY MARSHALL IS NOT AN ALIEN (G).  
(UIP)
Director: Mario Andreacchio
Stars: Helen Neville, Natalie Vansier, Glenn McMillan, Thea Gumbert, 
Peter O'Brien, Vince Poletto, Melissa Jaffer
Running time: 95 minutes.
Sally Marshall (played by 12 year old Canadian actress Natalie
Vansier) is the new girl in town, and she seems a little weird.  Her
family move in next door to young Pip Lawson (Helen Neville), who has
an interest in astronomy, and hopes to discover a new comet.  Although
Pip wonders about the strange noises and lights that come from the
Marshall's backyard shed every night, she thinks the new girl is
basically harmless.
But local play ground bully Rhonnie Branson (Thea Gumbert)
decides that someone as weird as Sally must be an alien, and mobilises
her gang against the new girl.  Pip is forced to wager her beloved
telescope in a bet with Rhonnie to prove that Sally is not an alien,
but merely a girl with a few strange habits.  Against her better
judgement, Pip finds herself spying on Sally and her family.
Eventually a friendship develops between these two girls who are
considered misfits by Rhonnie's "in-crowd".
The intriguingly titled Sally Marshall Is Not An Alien deals
with some important issues, such as tolerance, peer group pressure,
the importance of individuality, and friendship.  However, this well
meaning film is let down by some uninspired direction from
Adelaide-born Mario Andreacchio (Napoleon, Paws, etc).  Andreacchio
specialises in entertainment aimed squarely at family audiences, but
apart from the far superior The Real Macaw, his films seem to lack any
sense of sophistication and polish.  When compared to American films
aimed at a similar audience (The Babysitters' Club, Harriet the Spy,
etc) Andreacchio's clumsy approach becomes apparent.  The script is
underdeveloped and several key scenes fall flat.
Most of the young cast are new to feature films, and their
performances are embarrassingly amateurish and over the top.  They
lack the natural charm that most young child actors from Hollywood
seem able to turn on at will, regardless of their lack of experience.
The adult characters fare even worse as they are given little to do.
Former soapy star Peter O'Brien (Neighbours, etc) lacks impact as
Pip's understanding father, while all the others are virtually
relegated to the background, and make little impression on the
material.
Sally Marshall Is Not An Alien is aimed at young female
audiences, who may identify with the two lead characters and their
dilemma.  While it may prove popular amongst pre-teen girls during the
school holidays, this is far from the best film on offer.  Audiences
looking for something a bit more exciting or inspiring would be
advised to give this rather disappointing film a wide berth.

Title
Review for Human Traffic (1999)
This blistering Lost Weekend for the rave generation takes
audiences on a searing, frenetically paced, dazzling, chemically
fuelled journey through Britain's rave culture of the late '90's.
Those looking for a lazy comparison will inevitably compare this film
with Trainspotting.  Admittedly, this energetic, drug fuelled, wildly
cinematic ride through Britain's club scene and rave culture bears
some superficial similarities with that ground breaking Scottish film.
This impressive film debut from writer/director Justin Kerrigan is
imbued with a similar sense of dynamic energy, momentum and bravura
visual flair that cuts to the core of youth consciousness.
Almost plotless, the film follows a group of five
twentysomethings through a weekend of drugs, sex, club crawling and
deals.  It centres around five friends - Jip, Lulu, Koop, Nina and
eager young Cockney lad Moff, the party animal - who use the club
scene as a way to escape the drudgery and boredom of their week day
routine, spent working or bludging on the dole.  The partying begins
on Friday night and they begin to dry out on Sunday afternoon.
The film looks at the sexual hang-ups, the drug induced
paranoia and the attitudes of its protagonists with humour and an
unflinching honesty.  However it's unflinching view of the excesses of
today's youth will not appeal to all audiences.
This is something of a personal film for Kerrigan, who has had
first hand experience of the scene.  He has drawn upon a lot of his
own personal experiences for the characters, and has put himself on
the line with this film.  Kerrigan brings a flamboyant, often surreal,
visual style and cutting humour to the material.  He cleverly uses
monologues and different points-of-view to offer insights into this
scene.
He also draws superbly natural, and largely improvised
performances from his young and enthusiastic, and largely unknown,
cast, most of whom are new to feature films.  Newcomer Danny Dyer is
wonderful as Moff, the youngest member of the group, and his energetic
performance comes close to stealing the film.  Human Traffic does not
really espouse an anti-drugs message.  Rather, it speaks to the
consciousness of its hip young audience.
Whereas films like the classic Saturday Night Fever and the
recent 54, etc, explored the disco scene of the '70's, Human Traffic
has an immediacy and relevance for today's audience, who have
experienced the rave and club scene.  The action is accompanied by a
sizzling soundtrack assembled by noted DJ Peter Tong, and features
artists like C J Bolland, Fat Boy Slim, Orbital, etc.  Human Traffic
goes off, and will likely attain the same sort of cult status as
Trainspotting.

Title
Review for Dear Claudia (1999)
A poor man's variation of Six Days, Seven Nights?  
A plane crash strands Walter (Bryan Brown) and Claudia
(Aleksandra Vujcic, from Broken English) on a remote island.  The two
don't get on.  While his prime concern is ensuring the safety of the
water logged mail, her survival instincts spring into gear.  But,
eventually, an unlikely romance blossoms between the pair during the
month they spend on the island.
Walter has spent most of his life in the small town of Talok
Spring, and his unremarkable life is characterised by his sense of
regret at missed opportunities.  The only joy he finds in life comes
from flying his mail plane on its regular route.  Claudia is a local
bar maid and former street kid with a secret to hide.  She has
smuggled twenty ingots of stolen gold bullion onto Walter's plane and
is anxious to be rescued.  The pair hunt for food, they fight, they
make up, and they read some mail.  And then they do it all over again.
Ad infinitum.
Meanwhile, back in sleepy Talok Spring, the disappearance
becomes the hot topic.  The local newspaper's sensationalist headlines
report the alleged international crime spree of the two castaways.
Walter's two colleagues (Deborah Mailman, from Radiance, and Kim
Hillas) laugh a lot, and continually discuss Walter's absence with the
local cop (Rel Hunt) who desperately wants a transfer out of the dead
end town.  And they do it all over again.  Ad infinitum.
There was possibly the germ of a good idea somewhere in this
scenario, but the dull, clichéd, and underdeveloped script from
first time writer Chris Cudlipp squanders any potential.  There is a
distinct lack of humour to proceedings.  The laughs are forced, and
far and few between.
The central pairing between Brown and Vujcic lacks the sexual
chemistry that eventually developed between Harrison Ford and Anne
Heche in their recent comedy featuring a similar premise.
Croatian-born Vujcic brings fire and passion to her performance, but
she certainly deserves better material than this.
          Cudlipp's direction is also pedestrian and lacks flair.
Cudlipp hails from a background in advertising.  He must have been
good at that job because he sold this stinker to veteran producer Jim
McElroy, describing it as a cross between When Harry Met Sally and
Dirty Rotten Scoundrels.  If only..!  More accurately, this dismal and
disappointingly bland effort is a cross between The Postman and A
Little Bit Of Soul.

Title
Review for Castle, The (1997/I)
The Castle is not another quirky local comedy.  Rather it is a
genuinely funny and touchingly honest tale that is firmly rooted in
the typical Australian spirit of mate ship and barracking for the
underdog, themes that it shares with the criminally ignored Mr
Reliable.
 The first big screen outing for the creators of tv's
Frontline, the popular current affairs satire that has successfully
blended razor sharp humour and biting satire with a format that is
close to straight drama, The Castle is a real winner.  While not quite
as sharply written as Frontline, this simple yet affecting and amusing
comedy taps into readily recognisable and endearing characters, who
are brilliantly created and richly detailed.
The Kerrigans are a typical working class family who enjoy the
simple pleasures of life.  Their modest little home in the northern
suburbs of Melbourne is filled with warmth, humour and love, even if
it does back up to the adjoining runway on the nearby airport.  They
also enjoy the serenity of their small lake side holiday home in
Bonnie Doon, even though it is located beneath high voltage power
cables.  Tow truck driver Darryl Kerrigan (Michael Caton) is the head
of this close knit family of honest battlers, a simple optimist and
philosopher who is constantly full of praise and makes every one in
the family feel important and worthwhile.  Even their wayward jail
bird son Wayne (Wayne Hope) is still considered an important part of
this nuclear family.
When Darryl is served notice that his house is to be
compulsorily acquired to allow for airport extensions he goes in to
fight.  Every man's home is his castle, but for the Kerrigans their
quarter acre block is much more, as their family home is full of
memories and rich resonant echoes of their past, emotional ties that
no amount of money or compensation can replace.  Darryl is not too
sure how to fight for his house, but he knows that it is not right
that anyone can just legally take away a man's home, and although he
suffers some early setbacks in the courts, he is not about to give up.
We see events unfold from the rather naive perspective of Dale
Kerrigan (tv veteran Stephen Curry), the youngest son who idolises his
father and who doesn't always comprehend the intricate machinations of
the complex legal struggle.
In the wrong hands this material could have gone terribly
wrong, and it would have been so easy to laugh at the Kerrigans and
their naive optimism and simple view of life.  But such is the
strength, intelligence and compassion in the marvellous script from
writers and co-creators Jane Kennedy, Tom Gleisner, Santo Cilauro and
Rob Sitch (who also directs) that the Kerrigans become an endearing
lot, and audiences laugh with them and share in their struggle.  We
empathise with the family and their plight and we thrill as they
somewhat foolishly take on greedy developers over a principle.
Much of the film's charm comes from the casting, which is well
nigh perfect, and the natural performances from veteran actors who
were enthusiastically encouraged to improvise and explore their
characters more fully.  Caton (best known for his role as Uncle Harry
in tv's long running soap The Sullivans) is perfectly cast as Darryl,
and he gives a generous and warm performance, maintaining a subtle
balance of understated humour and quiet strength.  Tiriel Mora is
marvellous as Dennis Denuto, the small time lawyer and family friend
who finds himself out of his depth when dealing with the complexities
of constitutional law and high powered corporate lawyers in silk
suits, and he brings dishevelled charm and earthy humour to the film
in a scene stealing performance.  Veteran Charles (Bud) Tingwell, an
old favourite who found a whole new audience through his
collaborations with the film's writers on The Late Show, brings
dignity and intelligence to his role as Lawrence Hamilton, the retired
QC who takes the Kerrigan's fight all the way to the High Court.
         While the emotionally draining Shine is taking Australian
films to the world and reaping richly deserved accolades, this more
modest local production is easily one of the best films produced by
the local industry in quite some time.  The Castle is a simple yet
honest and topical story that audiences can relate easily to, and it
succeeds beautifully through an assured mix of sheer charm, humour and
enthusiasm.

Title
Review for Two Girls and a Guy (1997)
The title says it all, really!  This is a film about two girls
and a guy who share an unusual sexual triangle.
Lou (Natasha Gregson Wagner, daughter of the late Natalie
Wood) and Carla (Heather Graham, from Boogie Nights, etc) meet outside
a New York apartment building.  They are both waiting for their
boyfriend to return from the airport.  During their discussion, they
both discover that they have been sharing a supposedly monogamous
relationship with the same man - Blake Allen (Robert Downey jr), a
struggling actor.  They break into his apartment and prepare to
surprise Blake.  The ensuing confrontation offers insights into
relationships in the '90's, and questions the concept of honesty
between men and women.
This low budget three-hander talk-fest was shot in a New York
loft apartment over a period of eleven days, and its deliberately
minimalist style gives it the look and feel of a filmed play.  The
action takes place on one set, and centres around the three main
characters questioning the dynamics of their relationships.  The film
begins promisingly enough, but after the first twenty minutes or so it
seems to run out of steam.  From then it struggles to retain the
audience's attention.
 There's the gist of a good short 
film struggling to get out here.  
Many of the scenes seem improvised, and it's almost as if
director James Toback (The Pick-Up Artist, etc) shot the actors
work-shopping their characters through various scenarios.  The fairly
straight forward plot is unbalanced by many other elements that jar
and seem misjudged.  There is an unnecessary sex scene that seems
inspired by 9 And 1/2 Weeks.  The dialogue is gratuitously frank, and
peppered with casual obscenities, but lacks genuine wit.
Then there is Blake's ailing mother, who becomes almost a
fourth character in the drama. Although she is never seen or heard
from, her presence is nonetheless felt, and her character often serves
to diffuse many of the volatile tensions and emotions that surface.
The poignant ending also seems like a desperate contrivance to elicit
some sympathy for Blake, a man behaving very badly.
Downey's performance is sensational, which is not surprising
since writer/director Toback created the role especially for him.
However, Toback fails to provide any sort of definite resolution to
the situation he has established, and most audiences will walk away
feeling disappointed.

Title
Review for Winslow Boy, The (1999)
THE WINSLOW BOY (G).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: David Mamet
Stars: Nigel Hawthorne, Rebecca Pidgeon, Jeremy Northam, Gemma Jones, Guy 
Edwards, Matthew 
Pidgeon, Colin Stinton, Aden Gillett, Sarah Flind, Alan Polanski
Running time: 110 minutes.
In 1912, The Winslow family is shattered when their 13 year
old son Ronnie (Guy Edwards) is expelled from naval college after
being convicted of stealing a five pound postal note.  His father
Arthur (Nigel Hawthorne) believes in his innocence and is prepared to
gamble the family's reputation and wealth on establishing his
innocence and righting an obvious injustice.  He hires Sir Robert
Morton (Jeremy Northam, from Emma, etc), one of the country's leading
attorneys, to fight the legal battle.
While the trial is at the centre of the film, the court room
action itself takes place off screen.  This gently paced but incisive
drama concentrates on exploring the effects the trial and the public
notoriety has on this very proper wealthy family.  The Winslow Boy is
also a discreet romance, as the film explores the slowly attraction
that develops between Morton and Catherine (Rebecca Pidgeon), Arthur's
independent minded, suffragette daughter.
Terence Rattigan's 1940's play, based upon a real life trial
that shook up pre-war England, would seem like unusual material for
director David Mamet, the most contemporary of American playwrights.
Mamet is best known for his acerbic and hard hitting explorations of
the American dream turned sour (Glengarry Glen Ross, etc) rather than
sedately paced period pieces.  However, he directs with unusual and
unexpected restraint and insight - and there's not a harsh four letter
word in sight.
The performances from the ensemble cast are all uniformly
flawless.  Hawthorne has rarely been better, and is excellent in a
seemingly tailor made role as the prickly, but determined and
surprisingly sympathetic patriarch.  Pidgeon (Mamet's wife, also seen
in the recent The Spanish Prisoner) delivers an understated
performance that succinctly captures the passion and essence of her
enlightened character.  Northam brings a quiet strength and dignity to
his role as the lawyer who challenges many of the accepted precepts of
British justice.
This beautiful and intelligently crafted film has class
stamped all over it.  More importantly though, it also has a sense of
passion and warmth that seems to be missing from the period films from
the Merchant Ivory team.  Mamet's meticulous attention to the period
detail beautifully recreates Edwardian London, and Benoit Delhomme's
cinematography is simply sumptuous.

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Stars: David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox Arquette, Patrick
Dempsey, Parker Posey, Deon Richmond, Scott Foley, Jenny McCarthy,
Lance Henriksen, Matt Keeslar, Liev Schreiber, Emily Mortimer, Patrick
Warburton, Kelly Rutherford, Carrie Fisher, Roger Corman, Kevin Smith,
Jason Mewes
Running time: 117 minutes.
        The problem with most long running horror series is that they
inevitably have a habit of outstaying their welcome.  Friday The 13th,
Halloween, and Nightmare On Elm Street, etc, quickly deteriorated once
they started producing increasingly ludicrous sequels that moved
further and further away from the original in both flavour and intent.
On the other hand, true movie trilogies seem to fare better.  Star
Wars, the Indiana Jones and Jack Ryan series, and, to a lesser extent,
The Godfather saga maintained the integrity and standards of the
original.
        Similarly, Scream 3, the third instalment in this popular
horror series that revitalised the teen slasher genre, sticks to its
established formula.  Despite the familiarity of the plotting and a
singular lack of originality, though, Scream 3 will not disappoint
fans.
        Scream 3 is set in Hollywood, where a studio, fascinated by
the gruesome Woodsboro slayings, is filming Stab 3, a sequel that
continues the film-within-a-film that opened Scream 2.  But this
triggers off a new killing spree in which the familiar masked psycho
begins killing off the cast in the order that their characters die in
the movie.  The recent low budget Australian teen slasher film Cut
shares a few superficial similarities and may have stolen some of its
thunder, but Scream 3 is still a vastly superior film.
        The brutal murders reunite tenacious reporter Gale Weathers
(Courtney Cox Arquette) and Dewie Riley (David Arquette), who is
working as a technical advisor on the movie.  The key to the killings
again seems to be feisty Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), who has
disappeared into seclusion and now works as a telephone counsellor
from the anonymity of her safe house.  In probing the new series of
murders, the three raise disturbing questions about the past and the
real identity of the Woodsboro killer, long thought to have been
killed.
        While the regular stars merely go through the motions, Scream
3 introduces us to some new protagonists, who become victims or
suspects.  Mark Kincaid (Patrick Dempsey) is a handsome, film literate
homicide detective, the perfect man to help investigate a series of
murders surrounding a movie set, or so one would assume.  And indie
queen Parker Posey is an absolute delight as Jennifer Jolie, the
actress portraying Gale on screen, who throws herself into the role of
playing real life investigative reporter with annoying gusto.
        Scream 3 has not suffered greatly with the departure of
original writer Kevin Williamson, as it manages to retain much of the
same flavour.  The film supposedly plays around with the conventions
of film sequels, and also adds a new dimension to the
film-within-a-film concept.  Scream 3 also manages to generate some
suspense as to which of our three heroes may not survive.  However,
the writing is not as sharp and there is a greater emphasis on gore
here.  Scream 3 also abounds with clever red herrings and artful
misdirection, as well as some spectacular and bloody deaths.
        Ehren Kruger (who wrote the superb paranoid conspiracy
thriller Arlington Road) ups the body count, but still manages to
punctuate the grisly slayings with lashings of humour, dubious film
lore and heaps of sly in-jokes.  Cameo appearances by famed '60's
director and producer Roger Corman, Silent Bob and Jay (aka Kevin
Smith and Jason Mewes) and Carrie Fisher add to the irreverent flavour
of the whole thing.
        Veteran director Wes Craven knows the rhythms and pacing of
the horror genre, and he directs this familiar material with
assurance, deftly punctuating the gore with judiciously timed shocks
and laughs.  Hopefully, though, Craven et al will now quit the Scream
series while they are still ahead.

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
It's easy to see what initially attracted Hugh Grant to this
rather disappointing comedy.  His character, an effete Englishman who
becomes involved with the Mob, is familiar stuff, virtually a
composite of most of the characters he has been playing since his
breakthrough role in Four Weddings And A Funeral.
Grant plays Michael Felgate, an auctioneer with a British firm
operating in New York.  When he proposes to his girlfriend, local
school teacher Gina (Jeanne Tripplehorn), he is disappointed when she
tells him that she can't marry him.  Her father (James Caan, best
known for his role in the classic The Godfather) is a prominent
gangster, and she doesn't want him becoming compromised by that world,
where one small favour leads to another, and so forth.  Michael
convinces her that he will not be seduced by the mob and that he can
refuse any offers they may care to make.  But slowly, he finds himself
drawn into their world.  Before long, Michael finds that the auction
house is being used by the mob for money laundering purposes.
Complications set in when a mobster's son is accidentally murdered,
and Michael finds himself pretending to be a tough gangster from
Kansas.  Eventually he is forced to co-operate with the FBI in order
to survive a mob contract and get to the church on time.
 
Following other comedies that have dealt with the mob and its
murderous ways and codes of honour (Married To The Mob and the recent
Analyze This, etc), Mickey Blue Eyes is a second rate comedy that
struggles for genuine laughs.  Writers Adam Scheinman and Robert Kuhn
lack any sense of irony, and squander many opportunities to send up
the clichés of the genre.  The film becomes less likeable, less
credible and less funny as it unfolds.  Canadian director Kelly Makin
struggles to lift the lacklustre material, which moves along at an
uneven pace.
The performances lack spark.  Grant does his usual by the
numbers performance for much of the film, but he is out of his depth
when called upon to impersonate a gangster.  Even Caan seems
embarrassed here, and he struggles to milk as much ironic humour out
of his comic portrayal of an archetypal gangster as De Niro did in the
far superior Analyze This.  James Fox is totally wasted as Grant's
foppish boss.
Grant has established himself as a likeable star of light
weight romantic comedies, and it will be interesting to see how his
career fares after this disappointing and heavy handed farce.  But,
since he and girl friend Liz Hurley produced the film through their
own production company, they have no-one to blame but themselves for
this disaster.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
THE WATERBOY (M).  
(Touchstone/Buena Vista International)
Director: Frank Coraci
Stars: Adam Sandler, Kathy Bates, Fairuza Balk, Henry Winkler, Jerry 
Reed, Larry Gilliard jr, Blake 
Clark, Peter Dante, Jonathan Loughran, Clint Howard, Rob Schneider, Todd 
Holland, Robert Kokol
Running time: 86 minutes.
With his role as the endearing hero in the wonderful romantic
comedy The Wedding Singer, goofy comic Adam Sandler reached a wider
audience.  His effortless charm won over many who had previously been
immune to his whining, obnoxious, dumb screen persona and his
outrageous brand of manic humour.  His latest comedy has already
proven to be very popular in the States, although it is a backward
step following the broadly appealing The Wedding Singer.  The Waterboy
heralds a return to the sort of crass, unsubtle and juvenile humour
that drove his earlier movies Happy Gilmore and Billy Madison.
In a tailor-made role, Sandler again plays the familiar
gormless loser who eventually triumphs against all odds.  Sandler
plays Billy Boucher, a naive lad from the bayous of Louisiana, who has
been sheltered by his domineering and over possessive mother (Kathy
Bates, from Misery, etc).  No stranger to life's hardships, Mama
Boucher has protected her little boy from the wilder world and its
influences, which she claims are "the devil's work."  Consequently, he
lacks a real education and any social skills.
He works as the water distribution engineer (i.e.; waterboy)
for a local college football team, but he is basically treated as a
joke and constantly put down by the players.  When he is fired by
Beaulieu (Jerry Reed, from the Smokey And The Bandit series, etc), the
arrogant, conniving, and very successful coach, Bobby approaches his
less successful rival coach Klein (Henry Winkler) for a job as the
team's waterboy.  Klein's second rate team has lost the past forty
games, and seems in no danger of turning around its losing streak.
When Klein discovers that Bobby's anger makes him the most
fearsome tackler in the college league, he takes a punt and puts the
waterboy on the team.  Bobby becomes an integral part of the team's
improbable, and fairy tale-like success.  But can he take the team all
the way to the championships without Mama finding out?
Along the way, the shy Bobby finds love with the tough Vicki
Vallencourt (Fairuza Balk, from The Craft, etc), and helps coach Klein
overcome his fear of long time rival Beaulieu.  Sandler has created
The Waterboy with several of his former college friends, including
director Frank Coraci (The Wedding Singer) and regular co-writer and
collaborator Tim Herlihy (who has written his last four movies).  They
seem to have enjoyed themselves enormously making the film, and some
of their infectious humour will spill over onto the audience.
 
The cast also seems to have enjoyed themselves immensely.
Cast largely against type, Oscar winner Bates throws caution to the
winds here.  Her over the top performance lacks restraint, but it
perfectly suits the mood of the film.  Winkler's performance as the
confused and dithering coach Klein is a far cry from the days when he
played the legendary Fonz, two decades ago.
The parade of cameos from American sporting commentators and
real life football identities will largely go unrecognised by
Australian audiences, as will a lot of the parochial humour.  A
passing knowledge of the rules, strategies and complex game plans of
American football would also be a big help in understanding much of
the action here.
The Waterboy is a very silly, very crass film, but it will
undoubtedly prove very popular with Sandler's legion of fans.

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
DEEP BLUE SEA (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Renny Harlin
Stars:  Thomas Jane, Saffron Burrows, Samuel L Jackson, L L Cool J, 
Michael Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgard, Aida Turturro,
Ronny Cox (uncredited)
Running time: 105 minutes.
Jaws with attitude!  There hasn't been a decent shark
adventure since the original Jaws (1975), although there have been
plenty of imitations and cheap rip-offs.  Just when we thought it was
safe to venture back into the water, along comes Deep Blue Sea, an
undeniably trashy but entertaining big budget B-grade thriller from
director Renny Harlin (Die Hard 2, The Long Kiss Goodnight, etc).
Deep Blue Sea hits our screens in the wake of other disappointing
water-bound stinkers, like Kevin Costner's awful Waterworld and the
dire Sphere, but this one works a treat.  If nothing else, this
enjoyable film will turn a number of people away from the beach this
summer.
Scientists at Aquatica, an ocean-based research station that
resembles something left over from the disastrous Waterworld, have
been tampering with Mako sharks in order to find a cure for
degenerative brain diseases, such as Alzheimer's.  As a result their
genetic tampering has turned a natural killing machine into a highly
intelligent, dangerous predator with a thirst for blood.  When a
savage tropical storm hits Aquatica and wrecks the place, the labs are
waterlogged and the sharks get free.  They begin hunting the
scientists as they desperately try to make their way to the surface.
The international cast includes Thomas Jane (who, from a
distance, bears a vague resemblance to Kevin Costner), Aussie actress
Jacqueline McKenzie (Angel Baby), Michael Rapaport, Saffron Burrows
(currently in Wing Commander, etc), rapper L L Cool J (who adds some
humour to the film), and the very busy Samuel L Jackson.  Half the fun
lies in working out which of these stars will become shark food and
who will survive.
The film was shot in the same huge tanks created for Titanic,
and delivers plenty of underwater action.  Special effects technology
and computer generated imaging have advanced since Spielberg's day,
allowing Harlin and his special effects crew to create thoroughly
menacing sharks that move through the water with awesome fluidity.
Harlin is a deft hand at spectacular action sequences, and this fast
paced film certainly delivers plenty of thrills.
Deep Blue Sea deftly combines elements of Jaws, Jurassic Park
and The Poseidon Adventure, as well as many of the clichés of the
popular disaster movie.  It is also reminiscent of the series of films
from the mid-'70's in which nature sought revenge on man for meddling
with the environment.  Many of those films took themselves far too
seriously, and consequently they were pretty silly.  However, the
makers of Deep Blue Sea seem aware of its inherent silliness, and the
film is all the better for it.  The film is cliché- ridden, with
lots of unintentionally corny and banal dialogue, but this all somehow
adds to the enjoyment of the whole thing.  
***1/2 
greg king
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Bedrooms & Hallways (1998)
BEDROOMS AND HALLWAYS (M).  
(NewVision)
Director: Rose Troche
Stars: Kevin McKidd, Tom Hollander, Hugo Weaving, James Purefoy, Jennifer 
Ehle, Julie Graham, Simon Callow, Harriet Walter, Christopher Fulford,
Paul Higgins
Running time: 96 minutes.
This sparkling and very funny romantic comedy from Rose Troche
(Go Fish) explores the issue of sexual identity and the ambiguous
sexuality of gay characters.  This has been the central theme of a
number of recent comedies, such as The Opposite Of Sex, The Object Of
My Affection and Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss, which have also
created sympathetic central characters.  While Bedrooms And Hallways
taps into the same premise, it doesn't really offer a lot that is
particularly new.  However, what this engaging and entertaining
British sex comedy lacks in originality, it more than makes up for
with a sparkling wit and style.
Leo (Trainspotting's Kevin McKidd) is gay, and on his 30th
birthday he despairs of ever finding the right man and settling into a
stable relationship.  His gay flat mate Darren (Tom Hollander,
recently seen in The Very Thought Of You) and next door neighbour
Angie (Julie Graham) offer advice.  However, Darren is busy trying to
sort out his relationship with Jeremy (Aussie actor Hugo Weaving, from
Priscilla, Queen Of The Desert, etc), a real estate agent who likes to
have kinky sex in his client's houses.
Leo's business partner takes him along to a men's therapy
group, hoping that it will help him work out his lack of self
confidence.  Instead, during one bonding session, Leo blurts out that
he is attracted to the handsome Brendan (James Purefoy, a regular with
the Royal Shakespeare Company), another member of this mixed up group.
Brendan has just ended a long relationship with Sally, and is confused
and vulnerable.  Is Leo the right man to help him over the emotional
strain of his break-up?  The question of whether or not Brendan is gay
also brings an element of comic suspense to the film.  Then Sally
(Jennifer Ehle, from Wilde, etc) enters the picture, and Leo is
surprised to realise that she is an old friend from school days.  He
is also slowly attracted to her, and finds himself questioning his own
sexual orientation.
The script from Robert Farrar, who wrote the disappointing spy
spoof The Man Who Knew Too Little, is sophisticated and crackles with
witty dialogue and some quite funny situations.  Troche directs with
flair and she keeps things moving along at a brisk pace.  Some
elements of the film are reminiscent of Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss,
and Bedrooms And Hallways has something of the same flavour and
broadly appealing humour.  However, the characters here have more
depth and seem less like clichés, and the overall quality of the
writing and production is superior.
The wonderful ensemble cast deliver solid performances that
bring these characters to life, and seem to be having a lot of fun.
It is Hollander who gets the best lines and effortlessly steals
scenes.  Simon Callow is also memorable as Keith, the therapist, while
Weaving brings a sly sense of humour to his role.
This is not a gay film, but a film in which some of the main
characters are gay.  As with many recent gay themed comedies, Bedrooms
And Hallways is non-judgmental and broadly appealing.  It's sly sense
of humour should strike a chord with audiences.

Title
Review for Spank (1997)
Set against the colourful background of the cappuccino culture
of Adelaide's fashionable Rundle Street, the low budget comedy Spank!
is both an embarrassment and a disappointment.  The main problem lies
with the underdeveloped script from first time writer David Farrell,
and the lack of control over the material displayed by first time
director Ernie Clark, making an inauspicious debut.
          Nick (Mario Gamma) and his friend Vinny (Checc Musolino)
decide that they want to go into business together and open their own
cafe.  They enter into a partnership with wannabe local wheeler and
dealer Rocky Pisoni (Vince Poletto, recently seen in Jackie Chan's Mr
Nice Guy), who agrees to bankroll the enterprise.  Rocky has power of
attorney over his ailing father's business.  Although he dresses
sharply he has few clues about successfully running a business.  He
uses bully boy tactics to oversee his father's vast investments, but
he is largely ineffectual.
The dubious deal quickly comes unstuck as the characters' egos
and personalities take over.  Nick is lazy and obnoxious, and thinks
he's a real charmer with the ladies.  Vinny lacks money, and turns to
his girl friend Tina (Lucia Mastrantone) for financial help.  She
initially advises him against becoming involved in any dealing with
Nick and Rocky.  Before long there is competition between the various
players to open their own establishments.
Intended as a satire with something constructive to say about
the rich diversity of ethnic culture and experiences in contemporary
Australia, Spank! misfires badly.  Clark has completely misjudged the
tone and mood of the material, and this comedy actually has very
little genuine humour.  Wogs Out Of Work and Head On explored similar
issues and characters in far more emphatic and compelling fashion.
Clark, a former cinematographer, makes good use of locations
to provide the film with atmosphere and character.  But his lack of
experience shows in the quality of performances he draws from his
cast.  The performances are pitched at a hysterically overwrought
level in which stereotypes are reduced to the level of caricature.
Any nuances are bludgeoned into submission.
Poletto gives a completely unbelievable and outrageous
performance as Rocky, and his grating and unbearable character wears
out his welcome even before the film is half over.  Gamma captures
Nick's overbearing personality beautifully with an energetic but
unsubtle performance.  Robert Mammone (Heaven's Burning, etc) plays
Paulie, the film's conscience, although his thoughtful and restrained
performance almost seems to belong in another film.
Jo (Victoria Dixon-Whittle) is a thankless cliché, a woman
who dumps her narcissistic but wealthy lover, who treats her with
contempt, for another man who treats her with respect.  Only theatre
veteran Mastrantone gives a more positive portrayal of a strong,
modern woman with her performance as the independent, assertive and
confident Tina.
For a first feature Spank! lacks spark, polish and spunk.  It
is a huge disappointment, especially when compared to the recent
achievements of Gregor Jordan with his superb debut Two Hands.  Even
the local distributors seem to have recognised its overall lack of
quality and audience appeal, and have decided to release Spank!
straight to video in Melbourne and Sydney.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
PAYBACK (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Brian Helgeland
Stars: Mel Gibson, Gregg Henry, Maria Bello, Kris Kristofferson, James 
Coburn (uncredited), David 
Paymer, Bill Duke, William Devane, Lucy Liu, Deborah Kara Unger
Running time: 104 minutes.
Brian Helgeland, the guy who wrote LA Confidential and
Conspiracy Theory, finally gets the chance to direct, with this
unapologetically tough and amoral crime thriller.
Mel Gibson is largely playing against type as the tough,
repellent anti-hero Porter, a small time criminal who specialises in
payroll heists.  During a payroll robbery, Porter is double crossed by
his wife and her lover and left for dead.  The sleazy Val (Gregg
Henry), who likes his kinky sex with a sadistic edge, owes money to a
shadowy criminal syndicate, known only as The Outfit.
Porter comes looking for vengeance, hoping to recover his half
of the stolen money from Val, who has managed to worm his way back in
with the Outfit.  Porter's quest eventually leads him into an
escalating war with the Outfit and its ultimate supremo Bronson (Kris
Kristofferson, wonderful in a small role).  But Porter has his own
moral code and is only interested in getting his $70,000, whatever it
takes.  "You're doing this for a principle?  For $70,000?" asks an
astonished James Coburn.  "Hell, my suits cost more than that!"
Also caught in the cross fire are the usual underworld low
life denizens, some crooked cops, and Stegman (David Paymer), a slimy
taxi despatcher and small time drug dealer with ambitions to join the
Outfit.  In Porter's world there are no innocent bystanders.  Porter's
only ally is Rosie (ER's Maria Bello), a high priced call girl for
whom he has a soft spot.
Payback is actually a remake of John Boorman's tough and
visually stylish 1967 crime thriller Point Blank, which featured Lee
Marvin.  That film was also again loosely remade in 1974, as The
Outfit, with Robert Duvall playing the role of the vengeance seeking
criminal.  Like its two predecessors, Payback has been based on The
Hunter, a novel written by Richard Stark (a pseudonym used by Donald E
Westlake, when he wanted to break away from comic capers like The Hot
Rock, etc, and write tough, violent, genre thrillers).
And Payback is certainly violent!  Gone is the disposable
comic book like violence of Gibson's Lethal Weapon series, replaced
with a more disconcerting, vicious, callous and gratuitous violence.
Helgeland's direction is certainly proficient and pacy, and he revels
in the graphic blood letting.  Helgeland peppers the film with many
noir like touches, and Payback also has a deliberately old fashioned,
'70's look about it.  Helgeland also adds a touch of dark humour to
proceedings.  He wastes few moments, and his crisp and stylish
direction is the perfect cinematic equivalent of Stark's terse prose.
Gibson was apparently unhappy with the tyro director's
finished film, and reshot about 30%, including the final scenes,
giving Helgeland's original vision a darker tone.  Gibson also brought
in Kristofferson to play the mob boss.
Gibson brings a hard, unforgiving edge and weary quality to
his performance as a ruthless criminal, although his unsympathetic
choice of role here may come as something of a surprise to many of his
fans.  The performances of the supporting cast are solid, with
Kristofferson, an uncredited Coburn, and William Devane oozing smarmy
sincerity as the triumvirate who rule the Outfit.
Although a slickly produced crime thriller, Payback is also
very violent, and one of Gibson's nastier and more disposable efforts.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
This violent, confronting and unrelentingly sleazy crime
thriller ultimately seems like Hardcore crossed with the more violent
elements of Death Wish.
Pennsylvania based private investigator Tom Welles (Nicolas
Cage) is hired to investigate a spool of 8mm film that turns up in the
belongings of a dead industrialist.  The film is a "snuff" movie, in
which a young girl is brutally murdered on camera by a man in a
leather mask.  Welles is hired to trace the movie's origins, and
determine whether the girl was actually murdered or not.
What begins as a seemingly conventional detective thriller
soon descends into a heart of darkness as Welles is drawn into the
unfamiliar, sordid pornographic underworld of Los Angeles and New
York.  This is a world where teenage runaways and hopeful starlets
become the innocent prey of amoral predators, and indecently wealthy
and powerful businessmen can afford to have snuff films made purely
for their own vicarious pleasure.
The more Welles learns about this amoral world, the further he
finds himself drifting away from his comfortable domestic life with
his wife (Catherine Keener) and baby daughter.  He feels that the only
way he can cleanse himself of this grubby environment is through
killing the pornographers themselves.  The fact that Welles can only
find redemption for his lost soul by becoming a vigilante raises a
number of dubious moral issues.  However, unlike the controversial
Lolita, which at least makes an effort to explore tricky moral issues,
8MM steadfastly remains a blank page, almost as though it lacks the
courage of its convictions.
Even though 8MM is undeniably and hypnotically compelling,
despite its repellent subject matter, it certainly does not make for
an entertaining time at the movies.  But then again, we wouldn't
expect something light from Andrew Kevin Walker, who previously wrote
the gritty thriller Seven.  Walker seems to have a predilection for
exploring moral corruption and twisted psychopaths.
          This is an uncharacteristically dark and disturbing thriller
from Joel Schumacher, whose previous films (The Client, Batman
Forever, etc) have always had a glossy surface and a slick,
accomplished feel.  8MM is deliberately shot in dark tones by
cinematographer Robert Elswit, creating an even more oppressive and
sinister atmosphere.
Cage brings an intensity to his role here, and does a quite
convincing job of portraying Welles' growing sense of anger and
outrage.  Joaquim Phoenix brings a welcome touch of comic relief to
the film as Max, the punkish adult book store clerk, who becomes
Welles' guide into the sordid back streets inhabited by the illicit
porno dealers.
8MM is not pleasant viewing, and it leaves a nasty aftertaste 
that takes a long while to disappear.

Title
Review for Craic, The (1999)
Taking its quaint title from Irish slang for a good time, The
Craic delivers just that.  This enjoyable enough film is likely to be
the most popular home grown comedy to hit our screens since The
Castle.  It has a similar likeable humour and unassuming style.
Popular Irish comedian Jimeoin makes his film debut with this
wonderfully entertaining but slightly off beat tale following the
adventures of two Irish larrikins on the run from the Australian
immigration authorities.  The success of the film depends largely upon
his own popularity.
Jimeoin plays Fergus, a fun loving Irishman who visits
Australia to escape retribution from Colin (Robert Morgan, also
currently appearing in Redball), a tough Irish thug whom he has
insulted.  His friend Wesley (Alan McKee) joins him for fun times down
under.  But when they outstay their visa, the immigration department
tracks them down.  On the run, the pair journey through many out of
the way places that the average tourist doesn't get to see.  These two
likely lads discover that we are indeed a weird mob.
Complicating matters is the arrival of Colin, who has been
"relocated" to a remote location in Australia, as part of a witness
protection scheme.  Eventually, their paths will cross with
unpredictable results.
The Craic combines warm Irish blarney with coarse Australian
humour to good effect.  Jimeoin turns an outsider's eye on our culture
and our idiosyncrasies, wringing many laughs out of some obvious
targets.  He takes a sledgehammer to the usual stereotypes, but he
also reveals a deep affection for the Australian way of life.
Unfortunately, The Craic seems episodic in nature, almost like a
collection of amusing anecdotes that Jimeoin has fashioned together.
Many of the incidents are actually drawn from Jimeoin's own
experiences living and working in Australia in the early '80's, which
gives the film a strong autobiographical bent.  Even his appearance on
the tacky game show The Meet Market is based on Jimeoin's appearance
on the popular '80's show Perfect Match.  Former host Greg Evans
contributes a droll cameo as himself.
Many of the peripheral characters are quite interesting, but
remain under developed.  McKee delivers a quite boisterous and
energetic performance, and he effortlessly steals most of his scenes.
Colin Hay, former lead singer of Men At Work, is good as the tough SAS
soldier assigned to protect Colin while hiding out down under.
Veteran Charles Tingwell contributes an amusing cameo as a foul
mouthed farmer.
Director Ted Emery cut his teeth on television shows like the
seminal Countdown and Fast Forward, and he brings pace and energy to
the material.  He keeps things moving along at a nice pace.  John
Wheeler's beautiful cinematography captures the wonderful locations in
all their glory.  The main complaint about The Craic is that it seems
to run out of energy and inspiration towards the end, and finishes on
a vaguely unsatisfying note.

Title
Review for Forces of Nature (1999)
Sandra Bullock seems intent on establishing herself as
Hollywood's queen of romantic comedies.  However, she is hampered by
the fact that most of her films seem to come from the scripts that Meg
Ryan rejects.  Such is the case with Forces Of Nature, an
unspectacular romantic comedy exploring the attraction between
opposites and the role that fate and destiny play in changing our
lives.  In many ways, it also seems like an unsatisfactory version of
Planes, Trains, And Automobiles.  Mild mannered and straight laced Ben
Holmes (Ben Affleck) is about to be married to Bridget (Maura Tierney,
from Liar Liar, etc).  Unfortunately, his plane crashes on take-off,
stranding Ben in New York, with only a couple of days left to get to
the wedding.  That's when he meets the free spirited and
unconventional Sarah (Bullock), whose life has been shaped by a lack
of commitment and responsibility.  She offers to get him to the church
on time if he will agree to perform one small favour in return.
This mismatched couple share a journey, fraught with tension
and strange encounters, which also redefines their unfulfilled lives.
Ben learns to lighten up and have some fun in his routine life, while
Sarah is brought to a realisation of what she has missed due to her
lack of commitment.  Meanwhile in Savannah, the wedding preparations
are further threatened by rising hurricane force winds and imminent
marital storms.  Bridget also learns that her parents' seemingly happy
marriage is a little more unsteady than she thought.
The forces of nature seem to be conspiring to tell Ben something. 
 If only he can take the hints and learn which way the wind is blowing
(metaphorically speaking) he may be able to make the right decision
that will shape his future.
Writer Marc Lawrence (Life With Mikey, the upcoming remake of
The Out Of Towners) throws in a number of mixed messages about the
institution of marriage.  However, Forces Of Nature offers little that
is new to the basic formula.  This is only a moderately entertaining
film that will leave many in the audience feeling vaguely unsatisfied,
especially with the rather conventional ending.  The film is patchy,
and ultimately fails to follow through with its interesting premise.
Director Bronwen Hughes (Harriet The Spy) brings little subtlety to
the material, and there are a number of scenes that misfire.
Affleck is rather good as the stiff and initially humourless
Ben who learns to unwind and treat life as an adventure.  Bullock
brings energy and enthusiasm to her role, and seems more comfortable
here than she has for some time.  The film relies heavily upon its
star power to succeed, but unfortunately that just isn't enough here!

Title
Review for Tarzan (1999)
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Organization: None
Approved: graham@ee.washington.edu
X-Questions-to: movie-rev-mod@www.ee.washington.edu
X-Submissions-to: movie-reviews@www.ee.washington.edu
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Summary: r.a.m.r. #20303
Keywords: author=king
Author: Greg King 
Subject: Review: Tarzan (1999)
TARZAN (PG).  
(Disney/Buena Vista International)
Directors: Kevin Lima and Chris Buck
Stars: voices of Tony Goldwyn, Minnie Driver, Glenn Close, Nigel 
Hawthorne, Brian Blessed, Lance 
Henriksen, Wayne Knight, Rosie O'Donnell, Alex D Linz, Jim Cummings.
Along with Dracula and Sherlock Holmes, Edgar Rice Burroughs'
Tarzan is one of the most filmed of all fictitious literary
characters, with nearly 50 films and tv series exploring the
adventures of the legendary loin-clothed jungle hero.  However, more
recent versions have ventured further away from the spirit of
Burroughs' novels, and the character seems to have lost much of its
appeal.
This ambitious Disney feature is the first animated film to
depict the adventures of Tarzan, and remains fairly faithful to
Burroughs' original vision.  Tarzan easily lends itself to the Disney
style of family oriented animation, and this is one of their better
features of recent years.  Tarzan took three years to make, and as
expected, the animation is superb.  With sophisticated computer
generated animation techniques, the jungle has been superbly brought
to life.  Animation also allows our hero to swing through the jungle
with a fluidity not permitted in live action filming, which provides
some exciting action sequences.
The narrative itself traces Tarzan's origins.  Following a
ship wreck, the baby Tarzan and his family are left stranded in a
jungle wilderness.  When a leopard kills his parents, the orphaned
Tarzan is adopted by the gorilla Kala (Glenn Close) and Kerchak
(Millennium's Lance Henriksen), who have lost their own child and
raise the boy as their own.  As he grows, the only family that Tarzan
knows are the wild animals.
The arrival of the beautiful Jane (Minnie Driver) and her
anthropologist father Professor Porter (Nigel Hawthorne) raises
strange feelings that Tarzan has to deal with.  The film follows the
dilemma that Tarzan faces as he is torn between two cultures.
Although the Porters have come to study the gorillas in their natural
habitat, their guide Clayton (Brian Blessed) has other ideas.  Tarzan
has to fight to defend his adopted family from the cruel intentions of
poachers.
Thankfully, unlike most Disney films, the characters here
don't burst into bland songs every other scene.  Former Genesis
drummer and singer Phil Collins provides an appropriately primitive
sounding percussion-driven score, and five new songs, which seem to
propel the narrative along.  Typically, a strong vocal cast has been
assembled.  Alex D Linz (Home Alone 3) provides the voice of the young
Tarzan, while Tony Goldwyn (Ghost, etc) voices the adult Tarzan.
Driver once again proves that she does a superb British accent and
makes for an appealing and feisty Jane.
This is the second time Close has loaned her voice to a Tarzan
film, having previously redubbed Andie McDowell's voice for Hugh
Hudson's Greystoke all those years ago.  Wayne Knight and Rosie
O'Donnell bring humour to the film as Tarzan's animal pals Tantor, a
neurotic and accident prone elephant, and Terk, the wise cracking ape.
The whole concept easily lends itself to cute animal antics
that will appeal to younger audiences, and the producers have taken
full advantage of the opportunities.  The highlight is when the
animals invade the Porters' camp and stage an impromptu orchestra.
This easy going and enjoyable enough film will inevitably invite
comparisons with Disney's 1967 classic animated adaptation of The
Jungle Book, with which it shares a number of superficial
similarities.  However, in terms of both story telling and standard of
computer generated animation, this '90's version is far more
sophisticated.
For many, Beauty And The Beast, Aladdin and The Lion King
represent the peak of Disney's recent achievements in animation.
Tarzan is not quite in the same league, lacking the irreverent humour,
sly in-jokes and winning style.  However, there is more than enough
humour and action to please both adults as well as children, and this
film should be a big hit during the holiday season.

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
AMERICAN PIE (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Paul Weitz
Stars: Jason Biggs, Chris Klein, Thomas Ian Nicholas, Natasha Lyonne, 
Tara Reid, Eddie Kaye Thomas, Mena Suvari, Eugene Levy, Shannon Elizabeth,
Chris Owen, Seann William Scott.
        A Porky's for the '90's?  Although this raunchy but very funny
adolescent comedy explores problems of adolescent angst and the sexual
follies of youth, it does so with more honesty, intelligence, sympathy
and insight than one expects from a movie squarely aimed at the MTV
generation.
The plot centres around four high school seniors who make a
pact to lose their virginity by prom night - a mere three weeks away.
After all, if Sherman (Chris Owen, from the coming of age drama
October Sky), the school's biggest geek, can get laid, why can't these
four handsome studs?  Although sex is the prime object of their quest,
the four lads end up discovering more important values, such as
friendship, honesty, and love, along the way.
The closest thing American Pie has to a central character is
Jim (Jason Biggs), who finds his sexual awakening has also become a
matter of major concern to his overly concerned father (a droll Eugene
Levy).  Jim's stocks plunge to an all time low when his humiliating
attempt to seduce a foreign exchange student is broadcast to the
entire school body over the internet.  Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas)
finds his long-term relationship with Vicky (Tara Reid) threatened by
the sudden pressure to have sex.  The hygiene-conscious Finch (Eddie
Kaye Thomas) circulates rumours concerning his sexual prowess in order
to make himself more appealing, but comes unstuck after an
embarrassing prank.  Meanwhile Oz (Chris Klein) joins the singing club
to impress Heather (Mena Suvari), and ultimately finds he has to
choose between his jock friends and a chance at happiness with her.
American Pie thankfully avoids the cliché of having the prom night
become the climactic moment of the film, and opts for a far less
formulaic way of resolving its plot.  The largely unknown cast throw
themselves into the material with enthusiasm, and their performances
bring the characters alive nicely.
First time film makers, writer Adam Herz and director Paul
Weitz, deliberately push the boundaries of good taste here, but
nowhere near as relentlessly as did the Farrelly brothers with last
year's enormously enjoyable but tasteless There's Something About
Mary.  American Pie features some of the best, and grossest, visual
gags since Cameron Diaz tried out a new brand of hair gel, and should
prove a real winner with adolescent audiences.
This is essentially a bloke's movie, about secret men's
business and featuring plenty of locker room humour - but it's all
done with a modicum of sensitivity that, strangely enough, appeals to
broader audiences.  At the preview I attended, teenage girls were
laughing just as hard as the guys, while many teenage boys were
shrinking with knowing embarrassment.

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
When it was revealed that Universal studios and Gus Van Sant
were planning to remake Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 classic Psycho the
initial reaction was "Why?"  The only legitimate reasons for remaking
a film are to add something fresh and original to a film that is old
and very dated, or because the technology has enabled directors to
create effects that weren't possible way back when. There is a
precedent for Hollywood remaking films.  Most notably a number of
European comedies and dramas have been remade by Hollywood, ostensibly
bringing art house films to a multiplex crowd.  Recently, Dutch
director George Sluizer remade his The Vanishing for Hollywood, and
John Badham directed The Assassin (aka The Point Of No return), a
slavish shot by shot remake of Luc Besson's tough thriller La Femme
Nikita.  Hitchcock himself has been remade several times, from The 39
Steps, The Lady Vanishes, and Dial M For Murder, to his own remake of
The Man Who Knew Too Much.  Brian De Palma successfully reworked
Vertigo with his thriller Obsession, which perfectly captured
Hitchcock's style.
This workmanlike and unnecessary remake of Psycho seems to
exist for no other reason that to introduce this classic to a whole
new generation of film goers who have never seen the original in a
cinema, or who can't be bothered to sit through a black and white
film.  It is indicative of the bankruptcy of ideas within Hollywood
when a director has to remake a classic film virtually shot for shot.
It is an interesting cinematic exercise, true, but it fails to add
anything fresh or interesting to the film, and Van Sant fails to stamp
his own style upon it.
Original writer Joseph Stefano has been hired to rework his
screenplay, but he adds little to the film.  Psycho is a curiously old
fashioned and dated film, and a number of anachronisms creep into the
action and the dialogue.
Van Sant adds nothing of his personality to the film, and
instead he seems to have replicated Hitchcock's style, right down to
the close-ups and dazzling camera angles, without capturing the uneasy
atmosphere.  He even uses the original Bernard Hermann score to
underscore the tension.  But somehow, even the famed shower scene
doesn't seem quite as frightening here.  Van Sant (Good Will Hunting,
etc) is the wrong director for this project - it probably required
someone who reveres Hitchcock.
The biggest problem with the film lies in the casting of the
central character, the unforgettable Norman Bates.  Anthony Perkins
had the nervous tics, the unnerving edginess, the haunted, gaunt
visage, and the disturbing air that made him seem nuts.  Vince Vaughn
(recently seen playing another psychotic killer in Clay Pigeons) on
the other hand is far too butch and masculine, and hardly seems
convincing.
Anne Heche is fine as Marion Crane, the embezzler who checks
into Bates' motel, for a night, and finds more than she bargained for.
The supporting cast is fleshed out with solid performances from
William H Macy in the Martin Balsam role as the private investigator,
Julianne Moore as Marion's sister, and Robert Forster (from Jackie
Brown, etc) as the psychiatrist.
 
The cinematography from Chris Doyle, the Sydney born
photographer who is a favourite of Wong Kar-wai, often appears
suitably washed out and drained, giving the film an aged look.
However, Universal could have saved themselves a lot of money and
critical anguish by re-releasing the original Psycho in a brand new,
restored, pristine print.  No matter what happens with this remake,
this film will always be remembered as Hitchcock's Psycho, not Van
Sant's.  Aye, and there's the rub!

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
FOR LOVE OF THE GAME (M).  
(Universal/UIP)
Director: Sam Raimi
Stars: Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, John C Reilly, Jena Malone, Brian 
Cox, J K Simmons, Carmine D Giovinazzo, Larry Joshua
Running time: 137 minutes.
For the first time in a decade Kevin Costner returns to the
baseball diamond.  One would assume it's a sure-fire recipe for
success as two of his better movies - Field Of Dreams and Bull Durham
- have involved the sport of baseball.  While he may not exactly hit a
home run with his third time at the plate he doesn't strike out
either!
For Love Of The Game is almost two movies in one as it mixes
some exciting baseball action with the formula of the romantic drama.
It's a mix that proves unexpectedly compelling for much of its length,
but at over 130 minutes it loses momentum.  You don't need a detailed
knowledge of the intricacies of baseball to appreciate For Love Of the
Game, but you do need a bit of patience to endure the long and
eventually tedious flashback sequences tracing the romantic saga that
occupies half of the film's running time.
For nearly twenty years pitcher Billy Chapel (Costner) has
been the heart and soul of the Detroit Tigers.  A horrific injury to
his arm threatened to cut short his career, and he has only recently
returned to the team.  The long time owner is selling the team, citing
corruption and the increasing corporatisation that is destroying the
game as reasons for his departure.  Part of the deal involves trading
Chapel to arch rivals, the New York Yankees.
In possibly his final game in the sport to which he has
virtually sacrificed everything, Chapel has to make a momentous
decision - to quit while still on top or to continue with another team
and possibly watch his career decline.  Can Billy's ageing body and
aching arm also stand up to the strain to allow him to pitch the
perfect game and go out on a high?
The film unfolds in two strands - the defining baseball match,
and a series of flashbacks charting the romance between Billy and Jane
(Kelly Preston), a journalist who provided him with a perspective of a
normal life outside the game.  However, Billy's single minded
determination to heal his wound and return to the game eventually
created a rift in the relationship as Jane grew tired of coming second
to his love of the game.
Costner gives one of his best performances for some time here,
and projects the type of heroic brooding image with which he first
established himself.  He's more credible in roles like this than as
the saviour of a post-apocalyptic world!
For Love Of The Game is an uncharacteristic film from Sam
Raimi, a director better known for his gloriously apocryphylic horror
movies (The Evil Dead, etc) and his flashy, comic book-like visual
style.  Raimi's direction here is unusually restrained.  He manages to
suffuse the narrative with plenty of suspense as he takes us inside
Chapel's head for the strategy of this crucial game.  Raimi manages to
bring his usual visual flourishes to the film, and brings the baseball
sequences alive.  For Love Of The Game is quite manipulative,
especially in its use of Basil Poledouris' evocative, occasionally
stirring score.
Even those not normally fond of sports themed movies may find
themselves sucked in by the suspense and the rich emotional
undercurrents at play.

Title
Review for King and I, The (1999)
Rogers and Hammerstein's enduring musical about the prim
English governess who tamed the humourless king of Siam returns to the
screen in this animated tale from Warner Brothers.  For most, the role
of the stern but enlightened king is indelibly associated with the
late Yul Brynner, who performed it countless times on stage, in the
film version (for which he won an Oscar), and even in the short-lived
tv series.  Although he does a moderate job of voicing the character
here, Martin Vidnovic lacks Brynner's commanding presence.
Miranda Richardson provides the voice of Anna, the English
widow who travels to Siam in the 1860's to educate the king's
children.  She unwittingly becomes caught up in the intrigues of the
villainous Kralahome (voiced with sinister relish by Ian Richardson,
from Dark City).  With his incompetent, overweight sidekick Master
Little (Darrell Hammond), the Kralahome attempts to usurp the throne
away from the king.  It is this character who provides the bulk of the
film's humour.  Anna also helps the king see the error of following
traditional ways when his attitude threatens the romance between the
crown prince and a slave girl.
Created mainly in Asian studios under the direction of Richard
Rich, the standard of animation is largely uninspiring and fairly
straightforward, and the film lacks real impact.  The King And I
follows the formula for this type of animated film long set by Disney,
but without the same sense of flair or imagination.  Amazingly, there
are numerous continuity goofs throughout the film.  The producers have
deliberately aimed it more at juvenile audiences, who will probably be
unaware of the original movie.  Many of the familiar songs (including
Getting To Know You and Shall We Dance?) remain, but there have been
numerous other changes made to accommodate younger audiences.  Thus,
in true Disney fashion, we get a number of cute animals, including a
troublesome monkey, a black panther, and a pair of rare white
elephants, which will appeal to children.  Adult audiences will find
little here to excite or entertain.
For the most part, this version of The King And I is rather
dull stuff, and many in the audience will quickly tire of it.

Title
Review for Among Giants (1998)
AMONG GIANTS (M).  
(Fox Searchlight/Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Sam Miller
Stars: Pete Postlethwaite, Rachel Griffiths, James Thornton, Lennie 
James, Andy Serkis, Rob Jarvis, Alan 
Williams, Sharon Bower, Steve Huison
Running time: 94 minutes.
Simon Beaufoy, writer of The Full Monty, knows the depressing
working class areas of northern England quite well, and he returns to
this familiar background for the setting of his latest film.  However,
Among Giants is a decidedly inferior film, lacking the charm, warmth,
gritty honesty, and winning humour that made that modest film a crowd
pleaser.
Actually written before The Full Monty, Among Giants deals
with a team of unemployed painters who land a covert contract to paint
a series of electricity pylons spanning the Yorkshire hills during the
summer.  It's a job of high risks, uncertain payments and plenty of
challenges.  The foreman of this motley group is the hard-as-nails Ray
(Pete Postlethwaite, from The Usual Suspects, etc).  Ray is divorced
and shares a house with his younger work mate Steven (James Thornton).
Their friendship is shaken up by the arrival of Gerry (Rachel
Griffiths), a nomadic Australian who has spent most of her adult life
backpacking around the world.  On a whim, Ray hires the feisty
Australian to work as part of the crew.
Romance slowly develops between Ray and Gerry, much to the
consternation of Steve.  This odd couple romance is the least credible
part of the film, and, despite the solid performances of the two
leads, it never really works or sets the screen on fire.  This
mismatched pair also engage in a bit of gratuitous full frontal nudity
for a scene set in an abandoned water tower that is far from erotic.
Gerry's sudden and uncharacteristic decision to settle down and
establish roots with Ray is also unconvincing, and never totally
works.
Among Giants is a fairly conventional and shallow film that is
at its best when exploring the camaraderie between the work crew as
they undertake the challenge of painting 150 steel towers in a couple
of months.  Beaufoy's script is also at its best as it explores the
humour, mateship and sense of identity that unites the working class
in this bleak post-Thatcher Britain.
Among Giants is not a film for those who suffer from vertigo
as there are many scenes set high above the ground.  At times Witold
Stok's camera whirls with dizzying speed through the countryside.
Director Sam Miller hails from a television background, and he handles
his first feature film in a fairly straight forward and uninspired
fashion.
The solid cast try hard, and bring a bristling energy to the
material.  Postlethwaite in particular seems uncomfortable in the role
of a romantic lead.  Newcomer Thornton delivers a sympathetic
performance as Steven and establishes himself as an actor to watch in
the future.
But, otherwise, this unspectacular and often pedestrian
romantic drama seems little more than a high class, big budget
television movie.

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
RAVENOUS (M).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: Antonia Bird
Stars: Guy Pearce, Robert Carlyle, Jeffrey Jones, Jeremy Davies, David
Arquette, Stephen Spinella, Neal McDonough, John Spencer
Running time: 101 minutes.
British director Antonia Bird's second American feature,
following the disappointingly formulaic Mad Love, is a strange hybrid
western cum horror tale involving cannibals and ancient Indian myths.
Ravenous is set in 1847, during the westward expansion that
preceded the gold rush.  Captain John Boyd (Guy Pearce, in his first
role since LA Confidential) has been awarded a medal for bravery
during the Mexican-American War.  Because the true circumstances of
his heroism are actually a little embarrassing for the US Army, Boyd
is banished to a small outpost in California, which is manned by a
small unit of drunkards and misfits.
Into the camp stumbles the nearly dead Colqhoun (Robert
Carlyle), who claims to be one of the few survivors of a strange
expedition stranded in the Sierra Nevada mountains.  Colqhoun tells
how his band of settlers turned to cannibalism in order to survive.
His tale shocks the soldiers.  The camp's Indian guide raises the
spectre of an ancient myth in which cannibals mysteriously gain the
strength of their victims.  As Colqhoun reveals his true nature and
begins slaughtering the soldiers, Boyd is faced with a horrible
decision - to eat or be eaten.
Ravenous is the first script from writer Ted Griffin, and is
ludicrously full of holes.  The whole thing grows sillier as it
progresses.  The injection of modern throw away humour further
unbalances the tone of the film.
Ravenous is the fourth collaboration between Bird and Carlyle,
but it is also the least compelling.  The pair seem to enjoy working
together, and obviously had fun making this film, but unfortunately
the result is not so pleasant for the audience.  Carlyle seems to be
enjoying himself with this rather risible role, and he overacts
wonderfully in a manner reminiscent of Gary Oldman when he is slumming
it.  Pearce brings a brooding quality to his role, but he always seems
to a little uncomfortable.
The supporting cast includes a number of character actors who
have made their mark playing quirky characters in smaller, independent
films.  However, they all have little impact on this preposterous
material.  David Arquette (Scream, etc) is wasted in a silly, almost
contemporary flavoured role as Cleaves, a soldier perpetually doped up
from smoking a peace pipe.  Jeremy Davies (Spanking The Monkey, Going
All The Way, etc) has recently cornered the market with edgy, neurotic
adolescents on the cusp of sexual maturity, but is given little to do
in a fairly straightforward role as the religious Toffler.  Veteran
Jeffrey Jones (Ferris Bueller's Day Off, etc) lands the meatier role
as the fort's eccentric commander, and he hams it up accordingly.
The film has been handsomely shot by cinematographer Anthony B
Richmond, and the snow covered locations are quite beautiful.  (Prague
actually doubles for 18th century California!)
Bird directs with a lack of subtlety, emphasising the gore.
Anyone who has seen her tough and confronting British films (Face,
Priest, etc) will know that she makes few concessions for being a
member of the fairer sex.  However, when crossing the Atlantic, her
Hollywood projects have been bland and fallen short of expectations.
With this nasty, tasteless piece of nonsense about cannibals in the
old west she seems to have bitten off more than she can chew.
Ravenous is a twisted and unsatisfactory experience that will leave a
bitter aftertaste in the mouth.
Whatever was Bird thinking at the time?  It must have been
something she ate!

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Stars: John Travolta, Robert Duvall, William H Macy, Tony Shalhoub,
Zeljko Ivanek, Kathleen Quinlan, Bruce Norris, John Lithgow, Stephen
Fry, James Gandolfini, Dan Hedaya, David Thornton, Sydney Pollack,
Daniel Von Bargen, Peter Jacobson, Mary Mara, Ned Eisenberg, Kathy
Bates (uncredited)
Running time: 115 minutes.
        "Justice is a game," says Bob Dylan in his hit song Hurricane.
That sentiment is borne out in this new legal drama from Oscar winning
writer Steven Zaillian (Schindler's List, etc).  Zaillian steps behind
the camera for the first time since 1993's Searching For Bobby Fischer
to direct this fact based drama that criticises the much vaunted
American legal system, where justice comes at a huge price, and the
only winners are the lawyers.
        A Civil Action is based on a true story about a complex
environmental court case in the 1980's that eventually took eight
years to resolve.  The water supply of the town of Woburn,
Massachusetts, has been polluted and poisoned, resulting in a
disproportionately high rate of deaths from leukemia.  However, the
grieving families have found little help in their attempts to seek
legal redress and damages from the factory and tannery they believe
are responsible.
        The case is known in legal terms as "an orphan."  With no high
profile defendant to try and little likelihood of gaining a huge
compensation pay-out, no law firm has bothered to take on the case.
The plaintiffs have been shunted from one reluctant law firm to
another, until they finally end up with the small firm run by Jan
Schlichtmann (John Travolta).  A personal injury lawyer has earned a
lucrative living from exploiting the pain and suffering and misery of
accident victims, Schlichtmann is initially reluctant to tackle the
case.  Then he discovers a link to two of the nation's largest
corporations, and the battle lines are drawn.
        The case becomes something of a David and Goliath-like
struggle as Schlichtmann's small firm takes on a battery of high
priced, slick lawyers well versed in delaying tactics and every dirty
legal trick in the statute books.  However, Schlichtmann's pride and
determination to reveal the truth and gain what he believes is an
adequate settlement takes his firm to bankruptcy and destroys
everything that he had worked for.
        A Civil Action is not your typical John Grisham-like legal
thriller.  There are no courtroom pyrotechnics here, no explosive
revelations, or dramatic confrontations; not even an idealistic young
lawyer tackling a difficult case on principle.  Rather this is a study
of how the epic case affected the lives of all who were involved.  A
Civil Action is a provocative, cynical and engrossing examination of
the flawed legal system in America.  Its outcome will leave audiences
dismayed at the patent injustices inherent in a system that can be so
easily manipulated by the powerful and the wealthy.  Zaillian's
intelligent and sympathetic direction is perfectly suited to the
material, and he avoids becoming too bogged down in legal detail.
        Zaillian has assembled a top notch ensemble cast, who deliver
solid performances that bring the flawed characters to life.  Travolta
is impressive as the tenacious, driven Schlichtmann, who is willing to
risk everything.  He delivers his best performance since Get Shorty.
The very busy William H Macy (Boogie Nights, etc) is excellent as
Schlichtmann's beleaguered accountant, whose desperate attempts to
stave off bankruptcy bring a measure of humour to the film.
        But stealing the acting honours is veteran Robert Duvall, who
delivers a marvellous performance as Facher, one of the opposing
attorneys.  Duvall beautifully plays him as a Columbo-like character,
whose down trodden demeanour, distracted manner and idiosyncrasies
hide a steel trap mind and a thorough working knowledge of the
intricacies of the law.
        Kathleen Quinlan, Tony Shalhoub, James Gandolfini, Dan Hedaya,
Stephen Fry, John Lithgow, and an uncredited Kathy Bates round out the
impressive cast.  Robert Redford, well known for his environmental
concerns, is one of the producers.

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
STUART LITTLE (G).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Rob Minkoff
Stars: Geena Davis, Hugh Laurie, Jonathan Lipnicki, voices of Michael
J Fox, Nathan Lane, Chazz Palminteri, Steve Zahn, Jim Doughan, David
Alan Grier, Bruno Kirby, Jennifer Tilley, with Jeffrey Jones, Connie
Ray, Allyce Beasley, Brian Doyle-Murray, Estelle Getty, Harold Gould,
Dabney Coleman, Jon Polito, Taylor Negron, Julia Sweeney
Running time: 85 minutes.
Based on the popular children's book written by Charlotte's
Web author E B White, Stuart Little is an absolute charmer of a film
that will appeal to audiences of all ages.
When the Littles (Geena Davis and Hugh Laurie) visit the local
orphanage to find a brother for their only son George (Jonathan
Lipnicki, the terminally cute kid from Jerry Maguire, etc), they
return home with a cute, wise cracking little mouse named Stuart.
However, acceptance as part of the family is not quite so
easy, as initially George resents his new brother.  As does Snowbell
(voiced by Nathan Lane), the family cat, who feels neglected since
Stuart's acceptance into the family home.  He arranges with a pack of
alley cats (voiced by Chazz Palminteri and Steve Zahn, et al) to
dispose of the pesky Stuart.  The determined Stuart has to find his
way back home through the hidden dangers of a big city, least of which
is the treacherous Central Park.
Brilliant animatronics and computer generated imagery make it
seem as if the animals are really talking, and enable Stuart to
interact convincingly with his human family.  The clever script, from
M Night Shyamalan (the superb The Sixth Sense) and Gregory J Brooker,
taps into notions of family and that sense of belonging.  The clever
production design gives the movie some wonderful contrasts that
reinforce the fairy tale nature of the whole thing.
Michael J Fox is wonderful, and lends his cheeky presence and
superb sense of comic timing to the voice of Stuart, making him an
appealing, witty character who will easily ingratiate himself into the
audience's affections.  But some of the film's best lines belong to
Lane, who seems destined to always be hunting mice, as the mischievous
feline who plots to get rid of our hero.
Director Rob Minkoff (better known for his animated Disney
features like The Lion King) maintains a cracking pace throughout, and
brings to the material an astute mix of broad slapstick comedy and
pathos.
Although enjoyable enough, this genial little film about a
charming rodent is not in the same league as the wonderful Mouse Hunt.
Nonetheless, it is perfect family entertainment for the holidays!
While the younger fry will enjoy the antics of the animals and the
visual humour, older audiences will appreciate the intelligent
handling of some important themes.

Title
Review for Phörpa (1999)
There have been a number of recent films exploring the plight
of Tibet and the systematic destruction of its culture since the
Chinese invasion in 1959.  The Cup is another film to explore this
fertile territory, but it does so with a deceptive gentleness.
The action of The Cup takes place in a Tibetan
monastery-in-exile in the foothills of the Himalayas, where the monks
try to instil in their younger charges a sense of the traditions of
their ancient culture.  But the old ways are under siege from modern
influences - Coca Cola, and now the World Cup.
Thanks to the infectious enthusiasm of Orygen, a 14 year old
soccer fan, the whole monastery is slowly caught up in the excitement
and suspense of the 1998 world cup.  They plan to bring a television
and satellite dish into the monastery so that everyone can watch the
final.  Even Palden and Nyima, two novice monks smuggled out of
Chinese occupied Tibet to continue their studies, eventually become
involved in their efforts.  Gecko, the Abbott's respected offsider and
disciplinarian, observes the monks' fervent efforts to reconcile their
religious devotion with more secular activities with a mixture of
bemusement and humour.
The Cup is a simple story, beautifully and efficiently told.
The film explores themes of exile and the inevitability of change, and
draws a delightful contrast between the monks' efforts to teach
discipline and tradition to their charges and their pragmatic need to
embrace some elements of modern culture.  This unexpected gem of a
film also contains subtle political undercurrents, critical of the
continued Chinese occupation of Tibet.
The Cup is an unusual co-production between Australia and
Bhutan, a small Asian country not known for its film production.  The
Cup is also the first feature film from Khyentse Norbu, a monk with a
passion for film, who learnt his craft as a production assistant on
Bertolucci's Little Buddha.
Norbu has assembled his cast from amongst the monks at the
monastery where it was shot.  All of the performers here are new to
film, and have little understanding of English, but they are
intimately familiar with the characters they are playing.  The cast
were given their lines only hours before filming, with little time for
polishing their delivery.  However, the tentative and hesitant
approach of these non- professional actors is sometimes apparent.
Consequently they suffuse the material with a natural, spontaneous
feel, which somehow adds to the charm of this off beat but ultimately
endearing film.
In keeping with the international nature of the production,
Norbu has employed the talents of a largely Australian crew, with Paul
Warren's cinematography particularly striking.

Title
Review for Windhorse (1998)
WINDHORSE (M).  
(Gil Scrine Films)
Directors: Paul Wagner and Thupten Tsering
Stars: Dadon, Jampa Kelsang, Richard Chang, Lu Yu, Taije Silverman, Gelek
Running time: 97 minutes.
Unlike recent big budget Hollywood productions dealing with
Tibet, the low budget Windhorse relentlessly pricks away at the
audiences' conscience by exposing the plight of the Tibetan people in
the years since the Chinese occupation.  Set in contemporary Tibet,
Windhorse shows the systematic repression and destruction of the
country's religion and culture in the forty years since the Chinese
invasion.
This is the first feature film from Oscar winning documentary
director Paul Wagner (The Stone Carvers, etc), but it has been largely
shaped by his years of documenting unpalatable truths for the camera.
Wagner's camera unflinchingly captures the depressing poverty of the
capital Lhasa, and depicts the many temples that have been laid to
waste.  However, the film also captures the resilient spirit and
character of the Tibetan people.  The title itself comes from the
Tibetan tradition of inscribing prayers of hope and freedom on little
bits of paper and letting them float through the air. Wagner has also
incorporated traditional Tibetan music into the evocative and haunting
soundtrack, which further enriches the film.
Unlike the lavish, albeit sanitised Kundun and Seven Years In
Tibet, much of Windhorse was actually clandestinely shot inside Tibet
itself, using hand held cameras smuggled into Tibet while posing as
tourists.  Wagner and his crew shot many of the important background
locations under the noses of the Chinese security forces, at great
personal risk.  (The remainder of the film was shot in nearby
Kathmandu.)  The gritty visual style gives the film a sense of urgency
and immediacy missing from those other productions.
Wagner paints a grim picture of contemporary Tibet, one in
which the people are constantly watched by the vigilant Chinese, who
ruthlessly suppress any hint of rebellion or dissension.  Images of
the Dalai Lama are forbidden, and the consequences for protest or
disobedience are severe.  In the past four decades, over one million
Tibetans have mysteriously disappeared, or been tortured, murdered or
exiled by the Chinese secret police.
Windhorse centres around three twenty something Tibetans who
have thus far managed to survive in this dangerous climate by avoiding
any sort of conflict with the Chinese authorities.  Eighteen years
earlier the three witnessed the brutal execution of their grandfather
by the Chinese.  Although the incident has left deep psychological
scars, they have come to believe that any thoughts of resistance are
futile.  Dolkar (Tibetan singer Dadon) sings karaoke in a night-club,
and eventually secures a recording contract singing propaganda for her
Chinese masters.  Her unemployed brother Dorjee (Jampa Kolsangi) is
resentful of the Chinese, but refuses to join the underground
resistance movement.  Their cousin Pema has become a nun.  But when
Pema is arrested for daring to protest against the Chinese occupation
in a market, Dolkar and Dorjee are finally forced to take action that
will forever change their lives.
Windhorse is a confronting, powerfully moving and insightful
film that boldly and openly criticises the harsh Chinese regime.
Wagner and his co-director Thupten Tsering used a cast and crew
comprising of Tibetan exiles, many of whom have withheld their names
from the production for fear of Chinese reprisals.  This gives a
poignancy to their natural and realistic performances, and further
adds to the overall feeling of authenticity that permeates the film.
However, the film is not without its technical flaws, most of
them a result of Wagner's lack of resources.

Title
Review for Marius et Jeannette (1997)
MARIUS AND JEANNETTE (M).  
(Gil Scrine Films)
Director: Robert Guediguian
Stars: Ariane Ascaride, Gerard Meylan, Pascale Roberts, Jacques
Boudet, Frederique Bonnal, Jean-Pierre Darroussin, Laetitia Pesenti,
Miloud Nacer
Running time: 101 minutes
(French with English subtitles).
Writer/director Robert Guediguian was born and raised in
Marseilles, and has an affinity for the tough working class area and
its characters.  Guediguian has set his previous films in this same
area, somehow finding beauty and inspiration in the harsh environment.
A contemporary romantic comedy about the relationship between two
middle aged people touched by tragedy, Marius And Jeannette is
Guediguian's seventh film, but the first to be released locally.
This enormously appealing film has no real plot to speak of,
but is driven along by its wonderful cast of characters.
Jeannette (beautifully played by the director's wife Ariane
Ascaride) has been scarred by tragedy all her life.  Her father died
when she was nine, and she has lost two husbands.  One died in an
accident, the other walked out on the family and never returned.
However, she has a feisty, uncompromising attitude and tackles life on
her terms.  She has raised her two children, and worked a succession
of thankless jobs to pay the bills.  Marius (Gerard Meylan) is a shy
gentle giant who works as a security guard at the local cement works,
which are being demolished to make way for new developments.  He also
carries around with him the tragic loss of a wife and two children,
although his grief has been bottled up inside.
This lonely and scarred pair meet after Jeannette scales a
fence at the dilapidated concrete factory to steal a couple of paint
cans.  Marius drives her away, but the next day shows up at her place
with a couple of cans and an apology for his rough attitude.  He helps
Jeannette paint the house, and a strong affection develops between the
pair.  However, they have to overcome their own personal demons before
they can be truly happy.
There is plenty of advice and support for Jeannette from her
eccentric ensemble of neighbours, who share a courtyard.  While this
charming obviously concentrates on the developing romance between
Marius and Jeannette, Guediguian also devotes some screen time to
exploring her colourful neighbours, who are sketched in economical
fashion.  Caroline (Pascale Roberts) is a survivor of the Nazi
concentration camps, but has a healthy appetite for life and a
generous spirit, while Justin (Jacques Boudet) is a retired teacher
who is in love with her.  Monique (Frederique Bonnal) and Dede (Jean-
Pierre Darrousin) are a married couple constantly fighting over his
radical politics.
But, at the heart of the film is an exploration of the healing
power of love, and how people find their own happiness despite the
hardships they encounter.  However, there are a few moments that
misfire - such as Justin's political discourses, which are largely
irrelevant, and an unusual bar room brawl.  There is also a delightful
running joke, in which Jeannette constantly encounters her former boss
forced to undertake a variety of menial jobs.
Guediguian always works with the same ensemble group of
actors, who bring the characters to life with compassion,
understanding and humour.  Their familiarity and easy going affinity
with his laid back style is reflected in the film's realistic and
natural style.  Meylan gives a soulful performance as the haunted
Marius, while Ascaride brings fire and verve to her role.
Marius And Jeannette is suffused with a generous spirit, a
relaxed charm, and a genuine sense of warmth.  Guediguian maintains a
gentle rhythm throughout.  The film's upbeat and optimistic nature
will strike a more responsive chord with audiences who found the
recent Gallic drama Dream Life Of Angels a little too bleak and grim
for their tastes.

Title
Review for Cube (1997)
Ever since he first picked up a video camera and started
making his own short films at the tender age of eleven, Canadian
writer/director Vincenzo Natali has been intrigued with macabre
fantasy worlds and the darker side of human nature.  These same
elements shape his strikingly original debut feature film, the
visually stunning and imaginative sci-fi thriller Cube.
Six strangers wake up inside a surreal chamber.  It is part of
a labyrinthine system of interlocked chambers and passage ways.  But
some of the rooms are booby trapped.
Quentin (Maurice Dean Wint) is a street wise cop, who brings
with him all the fears, prejudices and suspicions that have become
ingrained over the years.  Leaven (Nicole de Boer, a regular guest
star on tv) is a mathematics student who deciphers the code that
guards each portal.  Holloway (Nicky Guadagni, from Crash, etc) is a
doctor whose intuitive insights into her fellow hostages unlocks their
potential.  Worth (David Hewlett, from The Boys Of St Vincent) is an
architect who suffers from low self esteem and a sense of guilt,
knowing that he unwittingly contributed to the construction of this
insidious structure.  Rennes (veteran actor Wayne Robson) is an
escaped convict whose knowledge is instrumental in helping them
navigate the intricate series of interlocked chambers.  The autistic
Kazan (Andrew Miller) is initially seen as a danger to the other
prisoners, until his hidden abilities come in useful.
These six very different people have to work together as a
group in order to survive.  But, inevitably, personality conflicts and
self interest surface, adding to the air of tension that already
exists.  Cube is a story about survival and human nature.  It cleverly
forces the audience to ponder the question of how they would react if
placed in a similar situation, in an unfamiliar and dangerous
environment with total strangers.
In Cube, Natali (a former story board artist on films like
Johnny Mnemonic, etc) and his collaborators deftly tap into our own
nascent paranoia.  We don't learn who built this formidable structure
- was it the shadowy military/industrial complex, or is it grotesque
joke from some alien intelligence?  We don't learn its purpose, and
the lack of logic is somehow even more frightening.  Nor do we learn
why these six people were chosen to run the gauntlet of this lethal
labyrinth, or indeed, if other people have fallen foul of its booby
trapped chambers.  It is these unanswered questions that contribute to
the film's menacing air.
Natali suffuses the film with an uneasy, claustrophobic
atmosphere.  The opening sequence itself is certainly quite impressive
and grabs the audience's attention.  The set design and visual style
of Cube is impressive, and belie its low budget origins.  This
ambitious film goes far beyond anything achieved by the fecund
imagination behind the recent Dark City, which inevitably disappointed
with its contrived and conventional ending.

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
SHE'S ALL THAT (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Robert Iscove
Stars: Freddie prinze jr, Rachael Leigh Cook, Matthew Lillard, Paul 
Walker, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe, Kevin 
Pollack, Keiran Culkin, Elden Henson, Anna Paquin, Usher Raymond, 
Kimberley Jones, Debbi Morgan, 
Tim Matheson, Gabrielle Union, Dale Hull
Running time: 95 minutes. 
If John Hughes had made a version of Pygmalion, then chances
are that it would resemble She's All That.  First time feature
director Robert Iscove takes the basic plot, updates it to an American
high school setting, and gives it a contemporary soundtrack.  Iscove,
who hails from a background in television and live theatre, gives the
familiar concept a new spin, making it fresh and relevant for younger
audiences.
Zack Siler (Freddie Prinze jr, from I Know What You Did Last
Summer, etc) is the most popular guy at school - a sports star,
brilliant student, and president of the student body, he seems to have
it all.  But then his long time girl friend Taylor Vaughan (Jodi Lyn
O'Keefe, from Halloween H20) dumps him for the improbably named Brock
Hudson (Matthew Lillard, from Hackers, etc), the narcissistic and
dopey star of a tv sitcom.  Crestfallen and humiliated, Zack enters
into a bet with fellow jock Dean Sampson (Paul Walker, recently seen
in Varsity Blues) that he can transform any girl in the school into a
beauty and potential prom queen in just six weeks.
The chosen subject turns out to be Laney Boggs (newcomer
Rachael Leigh Cook), the elusive, uptight outcast.  Under Zack's
attention, Laney slowly blossoms into a beauty, and gains a new lease
on life.  Romance also blossoms, as the shallow Zack finds himself
drawn by Laney's combination of intelligence and good looks, hidden
beneath her usually dowdy exterior.  But the transformation is not
without its set backs, as jealousy and rivalry raise their ugly heads
as the prom night approaches.
The primarily youthful cast mixes fresh young faces, many of
whom have appeared in a number of recent teen slasher flicks, with a
couple of rap stars (Usher and Kimberley "Li'l Kim" Jones).  Their
performances are solid, although Prinze, Cook and a wonderfully bitchy
O'Keefe are the standouts.  Kevin Pollack (The Usual Suspects, etc)
also delivers a nicely underplayed performance as Laney's father, who
initially seems to live in a different world from his two children,
but who ultimately turns out to be sympathetic and understanding.
She's All That is a teen movie that doesn't always resort to
the usual clichés or stereotypes of the genre, nor does it
patronise its audience.  It's all the better for this.  There are a
few gross out moments along the way, but overall She's All That is
more entertaining than one would expect.  Somewhat surprisingly, this
film comes from successful independent studio Miramax.  Not content
with the room full of Oscars their films have earned, the Weinstein
brothers seem to be moving away from the strictly art house movies of
the past to embrace more shamelessly commercial, mainstream product.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
SOUTH PARK: BIGGER, LONGER AND UNCUT (M).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Trey Parker
Stars: voices of Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes, 
George Clooney, Minnie 
Driver, Brent Spiner, Eric Idle, Dave Foley, Mike Judge, Stewart 
Copeland, Jennifer Howell
Running time: 80 minutes.
With this feature length version of the cult animated series
South Park, creators Trey Parker and Matt Stone have deliberately
pushed the envelope.  Although aimed at adult audiences, South Park
has developed a strong following among younger audiences, much to the
horror of parents and cultural experts.  The animation definitely
lacks sophistication, but Parker and Stone more than make up for their
simplistic style with their razor sharp wit and wickedly off beat and
profane sense of humour.
The pair also possess an iconoclastic sense of humour.  In
this energetic and irreverent farce they target a number of familiar
figures, including America's premier acting family the Baldwins,
Winona Ryder, talk show host Conan O'Brien, and billionaire computer
geek Bill Gates.  A heavyweight cast, including George Clooney, Minnie
Driver, Brent Spiner and Eric Idle, also lend their vocal talents to
the film.
The film's defiantly politically incorrect humour is laced
with obvious racist and homophobic overtones.  However, despite its
subversive nature, South Park also resonates with positive messages
about tolerance, understanding and family values.  South Park
highlights the hypocrisy and dichotomy of American movie censorship,
in which massive violence and wanton destruction are okay, but sex and
profanity are a definite no-no.
When the fragile little minds of the children of this sleepy
Colorado mining town are endangered by an adult movie starring cult
heroes Terrance and Philip, South Park is in an uproar.  The disturbed
mothers unite to save their sons' morals and launch a campaign to
blame Canada.  Cartman is even implanted with an electronic chip that
sends out an electrical charge whenever he swears.  However,
censorship and censure soon leads to war between the US and Canada.
Meanwhile, Saddam Hussein and the devil, who are depicted in a cosy
relationship in hell, eagerly await their chance to dominated the
world.  Eventually, common sense prevails and peace returns to this
sleepy little mountain community.
South Park: Bigger, Longer And Uncut also features a number of
superb musical numbers, which is an obvious departure from the tv
series.  This can only be interpreted as a deliberate move by the
creators to send up those quaint and wholesome Disney movies so
admired by the previous generation.  The movie begins innocently
enough with a simple song that seemingly sings the praises of life in
this small mountain town, but it quickly reveals its darker intent.
The film features a number of decidedly catchy tunes that will help
sell soundtrack CDs by the truckload, even if their lyrics ensure they
won't receive commercial airplay.
South Park: Bigger, Longer And Uncut certainly crams plenty
into its brisk 80 minutes.  However, this hugely entertaining but
ribald film never outstays its welcome.  Even those unacquainted with
the popular series will find a lot to enjoy in this hilarious feature
length version.

Title
Review for Outside Providence (1999)
OUTSIDE PROVIDENCE (M).  
(Miramax/Village Roadshow)
Director: Michael Corrente
Stars: Shawn Hatosy, Alec Bladwin, Amy Smart, Tommy Bone, Jonathan 
Brandis, Jon Abrahams, Adam 
La Vorgna, Gabriel Mann, Jack Ferver, Jesse Leach, Kristen Shorten, Alex 
Toma, George Wendt, Tim 
Crowe, George Martin, Richard Jenkins, Mike Cerrone, Robert Turano.
Set in Pawtucket, Rhode Island, in 1974, Outside Providence is
a sensitive but largely uninspiring coming of age tale about a teenage
slacker from the wrong side of the tracks who eventually finds wisdom.
Somewhat surprisingly, this sensitive coming of age tale comes from
Bobby and Peter Farrelly, the film making siblings better known for
their deliberately dumb and low brow sense of humour that shaped the
clever and hilarious There's Something About Mary and Dumb And Dumber.
Outside Providence centres around 17 year old Tim Dunphy
(Shawn Hatosy, recently seen in The Faculty, etc), affectionately
known as "Dildo" by his gruff, embittered, widowed working class
father (Alec Baldwin).  Tim protects his wheelchair-bound younger
brother Jackie (Tommy Bone), and hangs out with his slacker mates
(including an almost unrecognisable Jonathan Brandis, best known for
his role in SeaQuest).  His father plays cards and drinks beers with
his close mates, while they discuss such world shattering events as
Watergate and whether or not Rock Hudson is gay.
Following a minor traffic accident in which he rear ends a
police car while driving without a licence and engulfed in a fugue of
drug smoke, Tim is promptly packed off to Cornwall, an exclusive
preparatory academy.  A misfit and a rebel, he struggles against the
strict rules and regulations of the college, and clashes with his
humourless dormitory head.  Much of the film also focuses on his
developing relationship with the beautiful Jane (Amy Smart, from
Varsity Blues, etc), who attends the nearby girl's school.
  Outside Providence is based on Peter Farrelly's own
semi-autobiographical novel, although the material lacks anything of
real substance or interest to say.  The brothers put their
predilection for crass toilet humour and hilarious sight gags on hold,
for the duration.  They have handed over directorial chores to
co-writer Michael Corrente (American Buffalo, etc), who brings a touch
of restraint and sensitivity to the material.  Lacking eye catching
gags about zippers, hair gel, flatulence and dead dogs, Outside
Providence is a rather straightforward and bland tale that ultimately
lacks broad appeal.  It's difficult to feel any sense of empathy
towards the characters and their exploits.
The performances from the young, largely unknown cast are
solid.  Hatosy makes the most of his role as the likeable rogue, but
he occasionally struggles with the uninteresting material.  Cast
largely against type, Baldwin delivers a restrained but insightful and
sensitive performance as Tim's gruff but ultimately understanding
father, and he brings more complexity to the role than was originally
on paper.
Outside Providence is strongly reminiscent of Richard
Linklater's 1993 slacker generation comedy Dazed And Confused,
although it lacks the same wicked, anarchic edge.  The film also lacks
anything of real substance or interest to say.  Director Corrente
fails to imbue this disappointing blend of comedy and drama with any
real sense of nostalgia, apart from the superb soundtrack of early
'70's hits that will strike a chord with audiences old enough to
remember those halcyon days.  

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
STIGMATA (M).  
(MGM/UIP)
Director: Rupert Wainwright
Stars: Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Enrico 
Colantoni, Dick Latessa, Thomas Kopache, Ann Cusack, Portia De Rossi,
Patrick Muldoon, Rade Sherbedgia
Running time: 102 minutes.
It's rare to find a spooky religious thriller that is also
quite intelligent and doesn't lose the plot amidst a welter of
meaningless effects and nonsense.  Admittedly, Stigmata is often
reminiscent of earlier films like The Exorcist, The Omen and the
risible Demi Moore thriller The Seventh Sign, but this thriller about
possession is grounded in some solid concepts and ideas that push the
material in different directions.
Although primarily a supernatural thriller, Stigmata also
deals with themes of organised religion versus true faith, and is
shaped by some in-depth research into the Bible and Biblical history.
It also explores internal politics and corruption within the Vatican,
where cliques of ambitious priests have built their own solid power
base.  But these potentially contentious and worthwhile ideas are
occasionally let down by some cliched, Exorcist inspired touches,
such as possessed people speaking in strange voices, levitation,
spontaneously moving furniture, etc.
Gabriel Byrne (recently seen as the devil in End Of Days)
plays Father Andrew Kiernan, a Vatican priest with a scientific
background, who travels the world disproving so-called miracles.  He
is sent to Pittsburgh to handle the case of a young woman who is
reportedly afflicted with "stigmata" - unexplained, bloody marks
corresponding with the wounds suffered by Christ on the cross.
Frankie (Patricia Arquette, from True Romance, etc) is a young
hairdresser, who is not particularly religious, and who is bewildered
and scared by the mysterious events that have suddenly haunted her.
Kiernan discovers that she is possessed by the spirit of a devout
South American priest who recently died.  But there are some within
the church who would rather silence Frankie than have what she
represents revealed to the world.  Kiernan finds his own beliefs
tested by helping Frankie.
In a physically demanding role, Arquette is superb, capturing
both a vulnerability and inner strength that grounds her performance
in reality.  Byrne is also very good, and he gives a much more
intelligent and restrained performance here than in End Of Days.
British-born director Rupert Wainwright (the bland Disney
comedy Blank Check, etc) hails from a background in commercials and
music videos, and these origins are evident in the distinctive and
stylish visuals and overall production design.  Especially striking is
the opening credit sequence, which combines the back story to Stigmata
with eerie visuals, and which has become almost commonplace now
through films like Seven, Resurrection and End Of Days, etc.
The film is also heavily drenched in symbolism - dripping
water, fire, blood, breaking glass, and flying doves - all filmed in
slow motion and close up, and accompanied by an evocative music score
by Billy Corgan, from The Smashing Pumpkins.  Jeffrey Kimball's
cinematography is also beautifully moody and adds to the edgy quality
of this effective and surprisingly entertaining horror thriller.

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
FIGHT CLUB (R).  
(Twentieth Century Fox)
Director: David Fincher
Stars: Brad Pitt, Edward Norton, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat Loaf, Zach 
Grenier, Thom Gossom jr, 
Jared Leto
Running time: 141 minutes.
        David Fincher (Alien 3, Seven, etc) makes dark edged, gritty
contemporary tales exploring the dark soul of man, and Fight Club is
no exception.  There is a bleak, nihilistic undertone to this cynical
and subversive movie, which espouses violence and aggression as a
solution to the systematic emasculation of men and their struggle to
find their role in society as we move into the next century.
        Edward Norton plays the anonymous hero and narrator of this
disturbing tale.  An insurance adjuster, he is disillusioned and bored
with his unfulfilling life, and feels he is slowly dying, one day at a
time.  He briefly finds solace and catharsis by attending a series of
self help groups, where he finds compassion and warmth.  These
meetings become something of an addiction, until the presence of Marla
(Helena Bonham Carter), also a serial attendee, proves to be
off-putting.
        Enter Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt) a charismatic but anarchistic
soap salesman, whom he meets on a flight.  Durden befriends Norton and
initiates him into the fight club, a place where men can vent their
frustration, rage and humiliation by punching the living daylights out
of each other.  Eventually though the club seems to take on a life of
its own and develops into some sort of urban terrorist group with a
far more sinister agenda.  However as Norton races against time to
prevent a disaster he discovers more about his true nature than he is
prepared for.
        Based on Chuck Palahniuk's 1996 novel, Fight Club is a
challenging and visceral film that defies mainstream conventions and
pushes the cinematic envelope a little further.  Visually, this is a
stunning film, and Fincher certainly dazzles us with his cinematic
pyrotechnics here.  He fills the screen with a veritable montage of
images and ideas, and the film's somewhat chaotic, frantic structure
enriches its disturbing vision of modern society characterised by
disharmony and confusion.  Fincher doesn't pull his punches, and this
is one of the more brutal and violent films you'll see this year.
There is a sadistic edge to much of the confronting violence.
However, the film is also tempered with a bleak, very twisted sense of
humour.  There is also a subtle homo-erotic touch to the relationship
between Pitt and Norton, especially evident in the bruising scenes set
inside the fight club itself, which is full of sweating, semi-naked
men beating each other up.
        Somehow Fincher seems to get the best out of Pitt.  He gives
another cocky, brash, jerky and mannered, occasionally narcissistic
performance that lies somewhere between his misunderstood lunatic from
Twelve Monkeys and his seductive psychopath from kalifornia.  He gives
the complex character a dangerous but charismatic edge.  Norton, who
has proved himself one of the more consistently interesting actors
around, delivers another solid performance in a demanding role.  But,
at times, his sense of confusion at the dizzying events overtaking him
seems to be too real.  As the woman caught between Tyler and our hero,
Bonham Carter gives one of her more ambivalent but sexually
uninhibited performances.
        But somehow the film seems to run out of ideas towards the end
and, like Fincher's previous film The Game, limps to a vaguely
unsatisfactory conclusion.  Ultimately Fight Club seems like a triumph
of style over substance.  While the film is visually impressive and
provocative, many in the audience will be disturbed by its themes and
find it more frightening than inspiring.

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
THE THIRTEENTH FLOOR (M).  
(Columbia Tristar)
Director: Josef Rusnak
Stars: Craig Bierko, Gretchen Mol, Vincent D'Onofrio, Armin 
Mueller-Stahl, Dennis Haysbert, Steven Schub, Leon Rippy
Running time: 100 minutes.
Michael Crichton's Westworld sounded the first cautionary
warning about the possibilities of what could happen when a
computerised theme park ran out of control.  His Jurassic Park updated
the concept, with its additional theme of man tampering with nature.
Tron further blurred the distinctions between reality and virtual
reality within the framework of a computer game out of control.  The
Lawnmower Man and its hideous sequel explored the potential of virtual
reality, as did the nasty, straight- to-video thriller Brainscan.
David Cronenberg's upcoming Existenz also taps into a similar theme,
albeit from a more intellectual perspective.
But it was the recent and ambitious, high-tech The Matrix that
brilliantly blurred the distinction between the real world and a
computer generated virtual world with a barrage of the best cinematic
special effects seen this year.  This new thriller from producer
Roland Emmerich (Independence Day, Godzilla, etc) and colleague Josef
Rusnak, who worked as second-unit director on Godzilla, also explores
a similar theme.  However, The Thirteenth Floor is a high concept idea
given a low brow execution, and it will leave most audiences feeling
even more confused than The Matrix.  At least The Matrix was
sufficiently intriguing and dazzling that it drew many back for a
second viewing to puzzle out its intricacies.  The Thirteenth Floor is
unlikely to have the same effect, as once is definitely enough for
this disappointing blend of sci-fi and murder mystery.
Computer genius and soft-ware developer Hannon Fuller (Armin
Mueller-Stahl) has developed a virtual reality program that enables
him to recreate his own imaginary world.  He has recreated his own
vision of Los Angeles, circa 1937, which he visits at regular
intervals through this new technology.  But then something goes wrong
and subjects from his virtual reality world become able to interact
with his real world, with devastating results.
When Fuller is brutally murdered, his collaborator Douglas
Hall (Craig Bierko, from The Long Kiss Goodnight, etc) becomes the
chief suspect.  His attempts to understand what has gone wrong lead
him and his technical programmer Whitney (Vincent D'Onofrio) into a
world of danger, murder and technological mayhem.  It also leads him
to the beautiful but elusive Jane (Gretchen Mol, from Rounders, etc).
But Hall soon discovers that Fuller's artificial world may not be the
only one, and that other people, with more sinister agendas, are also
able to move between worlds, manipulating events to their own perverse
design.
Eventually, this complex film raises a few questions about
technology out of control, and even forces us to question what is real
and what is not.  Ultimately though, the plot has a number of holes
that can't be disguised by technology or whiz bang effects, and
director Rusnak fails to create a genuinely unnerving atmosphere.
Even the special effects here are rather routine, given recent
achievements in sophisticated computer generated imagery.  However,
the recreation of Los Angeles of yesteryear is quite spectacularly
done, and Wedigo von Schultzendorff's muted, washed-out cinematography
is quite atmospheric.
The performances throughout are rather bland.  Mol looks as
though she is sleepwalking through her dual role, while D'Onofrio does
his usual angry young man thing with a frightening intensity and
flair.  Even they seem as unconvinced by all this nonsense as the
audience!

Title
Review for Stepmom (1998)
Those who believe that Hollywood doesn't create strong roles
for female actors anymore should look closely at the new film Stepmom.
This emotionally charged drama gives two popular actresses an
opportunity to sink their teeth into a pair of strongly drawn, juicy,
challenging and interesting female roles that move beyond the normal
stereotypes.
Jackie Harrison (Susan Sarandon) is a divorced mother who is
still protective and possessive of her two children.  When her former
husband Luke (the always solid Ed Harris), a workaholic lawyer,
settles into a relationship with fashion photographer Isabel (Julia
Roberts), she feels resentment and hurt.  Isabel is unprepared for the
instant demands of temporary motherhood thrust upon her.  The
unforgiving Jackie is quick to point out her shortcomings, and
constantly belittles her efforts in front of the two children.  When
Jackie is diagnosed with terminal cancer, though, the two women are
forced to bury their enmity towards each other and establish a united
front for the sake of the children.  Out of bitterness slowly grows an
unexpected friendship.
It would be too easy to dismiss this manipulative tear jerker
as a melodramatic "women's film", but that is both patronising and
condescending.  Stepmom is a well acted, deftly written, entertaining,
and broadly appealing drama that explores some important themes, with
a mixture of compassion, insight and humour.
Five writers laboured over this poignant drama about families,
divorce, the love and pain of relationships, but it is Oscar winner
Ron Bass (Rain Man, Waiting To Exhale, etc) who gives the multi-
layered material its warmth and honesty.
Sarandon and Roberts also co-produced the film, and their
empathy for the characters and its themes is evident in their sterling
performances.  Sarandon has the meatier role, one that allows her to
run the gamut of emotions, which she does with style.  She also says
more with inflections and her facial expressions than most actresses
say with pages of dialogue.  She is excellent, bringing an innate
intelligence and compassion to this wonderful role, and her
beautifully nuanced performance should ensure she starts front-runner
to win a well-deserved second Oscar.  Roberts' solid and emotionally
rich performance is something of a stretch, and should also come as a
revelation to those who have previously dismissed her as a light
weight actress of little depth.
As the self-absorbed and resentful Anna, Jena Malone (who
played the young Jodie Foster in Contact) captures all the pain,
confusion and anger of children caught in the bitter cross fire of a
divorce, and delivers a quite mature performance.  Liam Aiken (from
The Object Of My Affection, etc) is heartbreakingly cute and
unaffectedly natural as younger son Ben.  In one eloquent scene in
which Jackie is sharing some time with her two children, he turns to
her and says: "If you really want me to, mum, I'll hate her."  Harris
is fine and restrained, and brings dignity to his smaller role.
Director Christopher Columbus is better known for his slapstick
comedies of the juvenile Home Alone variety.  But he also brought a
sympathetic touch and compassion to films like Nine Months and the
hugely successful Mrs Doubtfire.  Those qualities are very much in
evidence in Stepmom, which is also touchingly dedicated to the memory
of his late mother.  
**** 
greg king 
http://www.netau.com.au/gregking

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
RUSHMORE (M).  
(Touchstone/Beuna Vista International)
Director: Wes Anderson
Stars: Jason Schwartzman, Olivia Williams, Bill Murray, Brian Cox, 
Seymour Cassel, Mason Gamble, 
Sara Tanaka, Stephen McCole, Luke Wilson, Connie Nielsen, Ronnie 
McCawley, Keith McCawley
Running time: 98 minutes.
Writer/director Wes Anderson is an audacious talent who possesses 
an unconventional and off 
beat sensibility.  Rushmore is the second film from Anderson, whose low 
budget, slacker crime caper 
Bottle Rocket was widely acclaimed but performed poorly at the box 
office.  In Rushmore he suffuses the 
typical elements of the dysfunctional teen genre, the coming of age tale, 
and adolescent school comedy 
with a subversive, wickedly anarchic spirit.  The result is a 
refreshingly offbeat and inventive comedy that 
at times becomes a little too clever for its own good.  Rushmore has an 
edgy, surreal quality that sets it 
apart from the puerile humour of most similarly themed comedies.  The 
film's deliberately eccentric style 
will probably hold more appeal to adult audiences.  
Fifteen year old Max Fischer (newcomer Jason Schwartzman) is a 
precocious student at 
Rushmore, a ritzy private school.  Although quite brilliant - he can 
solve complex mathematical equations 
quicker than that other prodigy Will Hunting - Max is also something of 
an obsessive under-achiever.  His 
grades have slipped because of his passion for pursuing extra curricular 
activities.  Max is the president 
and founding member of a number of clubs at Rushmore - bee keeping, 
fencing, chess.  He even formed 
the theatrical group that performs his offbeat plays, including a stage 
adaptation of Serpico and an 
ambitious Apocalypse Now-like scenario.  He is put on "sudden death 
academic probation," which simply 
means that if he fails one more exam he's out.  
Max is sort of like Ferris Bueller's evil brother - a devious, 
shrewd and manipulative schemer, but 
without the charm.  He is a thoroughly despicable character, and is never 
in danger of eliciting sympathy 
from the audience.  At times you want to strangle him, or shake him.  
Max's downfall begins when he falls heavily for Miss Cross 
(Olivia Williams, from The 
Postman), the junior grade teacher.  In an effort to impress her he 
attempts to build an aquarium on the 
edge of one of the school's sporting fields.  He approaches wealthy 
businessman and former alumni Mr 
Blume (Bill Murray) to fund the project.  The plan backfires, and Max is 
temporarily expelled from 
Rushmore.  Blume begins an affair with Miss Cross.  The jealous Max begin 
a vicious campaign of 
vengeance against Blume, which escalates out of control.  It is the 
unlikely relationship between these two 
eccentric characters that provides the film with much of its energy and 
humour.          The wealth of 
colourful incidents and wonderfully quirky characters suggests that 
Rushmore has been partially inspired 
by Anderson's own experiences at school.  Rushmore has a sophisticated 
and decidedly off beat sense of 
humour, although the laughs are not always obvious.  
The performers seem attuned to Anderson's off beat sense of 
humour.  In an impressive debut, 
Schwartzman delivers a strong performance as the thoroughly dislikeable 
Max.  Murray is at his 
smarmy, droll and laconic best, and delivers a wonderfully understated 
performance as the emotionally 
damaged Blume, who is little more than an overgrown child in a man's 
body.  
Anderson has an idiosyncratic visual style, which ensures that 
Rushmore is quite unlike any 
other coming of age tale that you've seen.  The quirkiness and 
originality of the scenario unfortunately 
doesn't last the distance however, as Anderson eventually settles for a 
rather conventional and somewhat 
unsatisfying resolution.
